


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Growth & Income Fund (PRGIX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Growth & Income Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				PRGIX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/21/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$28.36
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.03
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/21/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								13.39%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$25.13
							
							-
							
								$30.47
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$1,793.18

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 05/31/2017



Overall





3 Year





5 Year





10 Year







				Morningstar rated the Growth & Income Fund among 
1222,
1222,
1081
and 
798
Large Blend
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 05/31/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks long-term capital growth and current income primarily through investments in stocks.
		
Average Annual Total Returns 2



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					15.40%
				
			

				
					15.40%
				
			


3 Years

				
					10.01%
				
			

				
					10.01%
				
			


5 Years

				
					14.63%
				
			

				
					14.63%
				
			


10 Years

				
					7.12%
				
			

				
					7.12%
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 9.94%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							9.94%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							December 21, 1982
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.67%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.67%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						N/A
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
						N/A
					
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   								
			



2
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Sun Jul 23 03:03:23 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				









Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services | T. Rowe Price





















 










>
	




Home
Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services












Introducing T. Rowe Price® 
ActivePlus Portfolios.
Save time with a diversified portfolio-powered by our experts.



		                    Get Started
		                    
		                












My Account   





Remember User Name

Log In

Log In



Forgot user name


Register for online access 




Open an Account






















Mutual Funds









We offer over 120 no-load mutual funds to address your specific investing needs.











                        See All Mutual Funds
                    

















Rollover IRAs









Changing jobs or planning for retirement? Our specialists make rolling over your 401(k) account easy.











                        Learn More
                    

















IRA









Plan for retirement with the help of a Roth IRA or Traditional IRA.











                        Learn More
                    

















            
                
                    
                    See all Products and Services
                    
                         


















Find low-cost mutual funds to help you achieve your financial goals.












Search Mutual Funds
























129







No-Load Mutual Funds
Providing a broad set of opportunities



















Historical Performance





Daily Prices





Download a Prospectus
















Mutual Fund Categories





We offer a full range of investment strategies across multiple asset classes, capitalizations, sectors, and styles.







Fund Type
Number Available
Stock Funds
54
Asset Allocation Funds
34
Money Market Funds
8
Target Date Funds
26
Bond Funds
36






















            
                
                    
                    See all Mutual Funds
                    
                         


















Over 80% of our mutual funds beat their 10-year Lipper average as of 3/31/17*











            
                
                    
                    Learn More
                    
                         















T. Rowe Price Insights®





Access our latest investment thinking, information on retirement planning, and perspectives on the markets.







Asset Allocation





An Inside Look at T. Rowe Price® ActivePlus Portfolios

July 13, 2017









Retirement Planning





6 Key Ingredients for Retirement Planning

July 10, 2017









Markets & Economy





Quarterly Market Review

June 30, 2017













            
                
                    
                    See all Articles
                    
                         




















Ready to Get Started?







                        Open an Account
                    










Or Call 1-888-285-2612





















View firm's background on FINRA's BrokerCheck
T. Rowe Price mutual funds are subject to ongoing management fees and may be subject to redemption fees. An IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when an IRA is closed. See prospectus for details.

The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
*144 of our 330 mutual funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes and excludes funds used in insurance products). 122 of these 144 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 204 of 311 (66%), 175 of 213, 140 of 178 (79%), of T. Rowe Price funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
24 of our 39 Retirement Funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes). 23 of these 24 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 38 of 39, 35 of 36, and 35 of 36 of the Retirement Funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
Source: Lipper Inc. 168 of 213 funds (excluding institutional and bank institutional funds as defined by Lipper) more than 6 months old had expense ratios below their Lipper averages based on fiscal year-end data available as of 3/31/17.
The principal value of the Retirement Funds is not guaranteed at any time, including at or after the target date, which is the approximate year an investor plans to retire (assumed to be age 65) and likely stop making new investments in the fund. If an investor plans to retire significantly earlier or later than age 65, the funds may not be an appropriate investment even if the investor is retiring on or near the target date. The funds’ allocations among a broad range of underlying T. Rowe Price stock and bond funds will change over time. The funds emphasize potential capital appreciation during the early phases of retirement asset accumulation, balance the need for appreciation with the need for income as retirement approaches, and focus on supporting an income stream over a long-term postretirement withdrawal horizon. The funds are not designed for a lump-sum redemption at the target date and do not guarantee a particular level of income. The funds maintain a substantial allocation to equities both prior to and after the target date, which can result in greater volatility over shorter time horizons.















x


You are using an unsupported browser version that might prevent you from accessing certain features on our site.
 
We suggest clicking an icon below to download a supported browser version.
 
 

Google Chrome
Mozilla Firefox
Internet Explorer
Safari














Mutual Fund Research Tool - T. Rowe Price















































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	


















Log Out
Log In

Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers













 
 


























Home
      / Mutual Funds


Print
Email
Text size




Mutual Fund Research Tool


Find T. Rowe Price mutual funds that match your investment goals.

Filter funds by category, objective, or Morningstar rating. Select the appropriate box on the far left-hand side of the tool.


Sort by rolling over a mutual fund and using the arrows to find key information.


Compare key information such as performance and asset allocation by rolling over individual funds and clicking the "Add to Compare" box. Once you choose your funds, click "Compare Now" button for results.



 


For detailed information about each fund, including its risks, click on the mutual fund name. For standardized total returns as of the most recent calendar quarter end, click on the Performance link within the chart below.



Call an Investment Specialist at 800-365-7530.











Show All Mutual Funds
	There  that match: 


		For investors who plan to retire close to a certain year, these "all in one" funds 
		adjust the mix of stocks and bonds throughout the investor's retirement horizon.
	

		Offer long-term growth potential by investing primarily in stocks of U.S. companies—ranging 
		from broadly diversified to sector-specific.
	

		For investors interested in regular income, these funds invest in corporate- and/or government-issued bonds. 
	

		Offer income free of federal and sometimes state and local taxes by investing in bonds 
		issued by municipalities.
	

		Pursue opportunities in many of today's fastest-growing foreign markets—ranging from 
		globally diversified to region- or country-specific.
	

		Offer diversification and income by investing in bonds issued outside the U.S.
	

		Stress capital preservation and may provide some income—best suited for money 
		designated for short-term goals. 
	

		Convenient, one-step mutual funds that combine stocks and bonds to provide a broadly 
		diversified investment. 
	

		Stresses capital preservation and are best suited for investors who may need to use 
		their savings within a couple years or to fund an emergency reserve.
	

		Designed to generate income and may be particularly beneficial for investors looking 
		to supplement their retirement income. 
	

		Designed specifically for retirement goals. Just choose the fund with the year closest
		to when you expect to retire. 
	

		Provide long-term capital growth potential while seeking to reduce the long-term tax burden.
	

		Provide current income that is free from federal and possibly state and local taxes. Best 
		suited for investors in higher tax brackets.
	

		Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, uses a five-star value system to 
		rate mutual funds in a category. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating.
	

		Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, uses a five-star value system to
		rate mutual funds in a category. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating.
	

		Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, uses a five-star value system to 
		rate mutual funds in a category. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating.
	

		Independent analysts at Morningstar provide their mutual fund picks on a category-by-category basis.
	

		Long-tenured, well-established mutual funds that investors have chosen for over 15 years.
	

		Funds that charge redemption fees.
	

		Funds that are open to new investors.
	




Category

Target Date Funds
 Domestic Stock Funds
 Domestic Bond Funds
 Tax-Free Bond Funds*
 International &Global Stock Funds
 International &Global Bond Funds
 Money Market Funds1,2
 Asset Allocation Funds

Objective

 Tax-Efficient
 Tax-Exempt*

Ranking
Morningstar Rating:

4 & 5 Star Fundsε
 3 Star Fundsε
 1 & 2 Star Fundsε

Fund Attributes

 Open To New Investors
Redemption Fees

Share Class

Investor Class
I Class







Performance
Ratings + Rankings
Management + Objective
Prices + Yields












1 Retail Funds: You could lose money by investing in the Fund. Although the Fund seeks to preserve the value of your investment at $1.00 per share, it cannot guarantee it will do so. Beginning October 14, 2016, the Fund may impose a fee upon the sale of your shares or may temporarily suspend your ability to sell shares if the Fund's liquidity falls below required minimums because of market conditions or other factors. An investment in the Fund is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. The Fund's sponsor has no legal obligation to provide financial support to the Fund, and you should not expect that the sponsor will provide financial support to the Fund at any time.

2 Government Funds: You could lose money by investing in the Fund. Although the Fund seeks to preserve the value of your investment at $1.00 per share, it cannot guarantee it will do so. An investment in the Fund is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. The Fund's sponsor has no legal obligation to provide financial support to the Fund, and you should not expect that the sponsor will provide financial support to the Fund at any time.


^ The T. Rowe Price Funds-I Class share the portfolio of an existing fund 
(the original share class of the fund is referred to as the "investor class"). 
The total return figures for I Class shares have been calculated using the performance 
data of the investor class up to the inception date of the I Class (shown in the 
performance sub-tab when the fund is hovered over) and the actual performance 
results of the I Class since that date. Because the I Classes are expected to have 
lower expenses than the Investor Classes, the I Class performance, had it existed 
over the periods shown, would have been higher. 
					

						The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
					
* Some income is subject to state and local taxes and the federal alternative minimum tax.


















		Please wait while we load your data.
	





Fund Comparison







 
 


 





















Our Mission Is Simple.
					  Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
					


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement





Feedback

Mobile Solutions
Contact Us








The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

				©Sun Jul 23 18:10:03 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
				All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
			



 
 












Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now







































Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund



















 









































Mutual Funds | American Funds

























       American Funds 
      ®

 


   
 OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠



Capital Group sites








Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other









More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets



American Funds sites







 
INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



 American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


 
 Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide  (corporate site) 
Private Markets 







 



  Welcome to American Funds 
Contact Us
Preferences
  Log In LOG OUT 




American Funds Investors






 User Name or Account Number  
  Remember Me 
  
 Log in for the first time 




 Login Help 

 


 Login Help 


New user? 
Forgot password?
More help
 

 






















Forms


Search










 






    MY ACCOUNTS 





                 MY ACCOUNTS 
                See All

Close x











ACCOUNT INFORMATION




 View Portfolio 
 Portfolio Value History 
 Statements & Tax Forms 
 









FORMS


in Service & Support




 Account Updates 
 Retirement Savings Accounts 
 College Savings Accounts 
 Beneficiary Designations 
 









 
    INVESTMENTS 





                 INVESTMENTS 
                See All

Close x










MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH




 Daily Prices & Yields 
 Returns 
 Compare Funds 
 Prospectuses & Annual Reports 
 









MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES




 Historical Prices 
 Historical Distributions 
 Share Class Information 
 Symbols & Fund Numbers 
 









OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products




 Insurance Series 
 
















  









 
    INSIGHTS 





                 INSIGHTS 
                See All

Close x










CATEGORIES




 Investment Insights 
 Market Commentary 
 









TOPICS




 The Capital Advantage 
 Currencies 
 Developed World 
 Dividends & Income 
 Emerging Markets 
 Global 
 









 




 Innovation 
 International 
 Macroeconomic Outlook 
 Taxable Bonds 
 United States 
 









FEATURED










  2017 Outlook  





  








READ













  The Capital Advantage℠  





  








READ














 
    PRODUCTS 





                 PRODUCTS 
                See All

Close x










INVESTMENT OPTIONS




 Mutual Funds 
 Insurance Series





 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series



 
 









COLLEGE SAVINGS




 CollegeAmerica 529 Plans 
 Coverdell Education Savings Plans 
 UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts 
 









INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT




 Traditional/Roth IRAs 
 









EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS




 401(k) Plans 
 403(b) Plans 
 SIMPLE IRAs 
 SEP Plans 
 Payroll Deduction IRAs 
 
















  









 
    PLANNING 





                 PLANNING 
                See All

Close x










TOPICS




 Investing Fundamentals 
 Mutual Fund Basics 
 Creating a Financial Plan 
 Retirement Planning 
 College Savings 
 Market Fluctuations 
 









TOOLS




 Retirement Planning Calculator 
 Retirement Roadmap 
 College Savings Calculator 
 Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer 
 









 




 Spend It or Save It Calculator 
 Investment Calculator 
 Payroll Deduction Analyzer 
 Taxes and Inflation Calculator 
 









FEATURED














We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
    SERVICE & SUPPORT 





                 SERVICE & SUPPORT 
                See All

Close x










HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT




 Buying Shares 
 Selling Shares 
 Managing Your Account 
 Changing Your Preferences 
 



MORE








FORMS




 Account Updates 
 Retirement Savings Accounts 
 College Savings Accounts 
 Beneficiary Designations 
 









OTHER RESOURCES




 Tax Center 
 Contact Us 
 Search for an Advisor 
 



MORE








 
     
















Forms







  
 MY ACCOUNTS 
 INVESTMENTS 
 INSIGHTS 
 PRODUCTS 
 PLANNING 
 SERVICE & SUPPORT 
  





























Mutual Funds










Our managed equity and fixed-income mutual funds are designed with a long-term focus. 










Mutual Funds
 

Since 1931, we’ve helped investors pursue long-term investment success.
We offer investment options to help investors meet their financial needs.
Our investment process combines individual accountability with teamwork. 


Learn about The Capital Advantage℠. 
            


















  








Investment Spectrum
Our funds offer a spectrum of investment objectives, levels of volatility and asset types.
Note: The mutual funds in American Funds Portfolio SeriesSM, American Funds Retirement Income Portfolio SeriesSM and American Funds College Target Date Series® are not included in this chart.









Growth


Seeks to increase capital long term through growth-oriented companies.
 
 









EuroPacific Growth Fund®
The New Economy Fund®
New Perspective Fund®
AMCAP Fund®
The Growth Fund of America®
SMALLCAP World Fund®
New World Fund® 














Growth-and-Income




Seeks growth of capital and current income through dividend payers.  

 
 




Capital World Growth and Income Fund®
International Growth and Income Fund℠
American Mutual Fund®
Fundamental Investors®
The Investment Company of America®
Washington Mutual Investors Fund℠ 
American Funds Developing World Growth and Income Fund℠







Equity-Income


Seeks income and growth through a mix of dividend-paying stocks and bonds.
 
 





Capital Income Builder®
The Income Fund of America®





Balanced



Seeks long-term growth of capital, conservation of principal and current income through a mix of securities.                              



American Funds Global Balanced Fund℠ 
American Balanced Fund®









Taxable Bond


Seeks current income through various fixed-income securities.  

 
 





American High-Income Trust® 
American Funds Corporate Bond Fund℠
American Funds Emerging Markets Bond Fund℠
American Funds Inflation Linked Bond Fund℠
American Funds Strategic Bond Fund℠



Short-Term Bond Fund of America®
Intermediate Bond Fund of America®
U.S. Government Securities Fund®
American Funds Mortgage Fund®
The Bond Fund of America®
Capital World Bond Fund®





Tax-Exempt Bond


Seeks tax-exempt interest through municipal bonds.  
 
  




American High-Income Municipal Bond Fund®
American Funds Short-Term Tax-Exempt Bond Fund®
American Funds Tax-Exempt Fund of New York®
Limited Term Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America®
The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America®
The Tax-Exempt Fund of California®







Money Market


Seeks stability through highly liquid, short-term securities.  
 

 





American Funds U.S. Government Money Market Fund℠














Other Investment Options




 Portfolio Series 
 Target Date Retirement Series 
 College Target Date Series 
 










Other Resources




 Share Classes & Expenses 
 Compare Funds  
 Investment Calculator 
 


















  























Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing. 













































Closex
 















































































































American Funds®






Home



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets












Welcome to American Funds

Contact Us
Preferences


Log In
LOG OUT





American Funds Investors







User Name or Account Number




Remember Me





Log in for the first time






Login Help







Login Help



New user?

Forgot password?
 
More help
 





























Forms


Search




















 
MY ACCOUNTS






										MY ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x









ACCOUNT INFORMATION





View Portfolio


Portfolio Value History


Statements & Tax Forms











FORMS


in Service & Support





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Prospectuses & Annual Reports











MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Symbols & Fund Numbers











OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products





Insurance Series

































 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global










 





Innovation


International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Taxable Bonds


United States










FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















READ















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















READ
















 
PRODUCTS






										PRODUCTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







INVESTMENT OPTIONS





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series



 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series













COLLEGE SAVINGS





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts










INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT





Traditional/Roth IRAs










EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS





401(k) Plans


403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs































 
PLANNING






										PLANNING
									
										
										See All

Close x







TOPICS





Investing Fundamentals


Mutual Fund Basics


Creating a Financial Plan


Retirement Planning


College Savings


Market Fluctuations










TOOLS





Retirement Planning Calculator


Retirement Roadmap


College Savings Calculator


Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer










 





Spend It or Save It Calculator


Investment Calculator


Payroll Deduction Analyzer


Taxes and Inflation Calculator










FEATURED












We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
SERVICE & SUPPORT






										SERVICE & SUPPORT
									
										
										See All

Close x







HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT





Buying Shares


Selling Shares


Managing Your Account


Changing Your Preferences






MORE






FORMS





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations










OTHER RESOURCES





Tax Center


Contact Us


Search for an Advisor






MORE










 


















Forms











MY ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


INSIGHTS


PRODUCTS


PLANNING


SERVICE & SUPPORT




































Investments


/ The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia                                                ®


















TAX-EXEMPT BOND FUNDS



The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia

				®  (TFVAX)

VIEW A DIFFERENT FUND 












Share Class
 


A
C
F-1
F-2





 
                                PRINT
                            












SUMMARY
RETURNS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
RESOURCES

























Closed Fund: The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia Fund Class A was closed on June 17, 2016, and its assets were merged into The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America. Visit  The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America Fund Class A page for fund information.
        









High & Low Prices
		            







For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for TFVAX through --.
            

 TFVAX




 







Description




						Fund Objective
					

The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income exempt from regular federal and Virginia state income taxes. Its secondary objective is preservation of capital.					










Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							08/14/1986



 


						CUSIP
						
					
							02630C 20 6

						Fund Number
						
					
							25












        Returns
        



	

LEARN ABOUT THE SYSTEM BEHIND OUR RESULTS















Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2016
			

















2007-2016
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS









2016








CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




01/29/16
02/01/16
$0.040286
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


02/29/16
03/01/16
$0.0390877
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.93


03/31/16
04/01/16
$0.0405419
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


04/29/16
05/02/16
$0.0407637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.01


05/31/16
06/01/16
$0.0409211
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.00


06/15/16
06/16/16
$0.0215362
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.11






2016 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.22313652


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.22313652




				 as of 6/17/16
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date










 













						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016




















Resources






            About Our Funds
        













Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Some of the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
		



This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested














Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .
















Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Thursday, August 14, 1986) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1986), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index
Lipper Virginia Municipal Debt Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns with sales charge for Class A shares reflect payment of the -32768.00% maximum sales charge.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Barclays Municipal Virginia Index did not exist prior to June 30, 1993. Therefore, results are measured from June 30, 1993, and are based on the corresponding value of the hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund on that date.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal: Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index is a market-value-weighted index that includes only investment-grade tax-exempt bonds that are issued from Virginia.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income




				Standard Deviation as of  (updated monthly). Annualized return as of  (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for TFVAX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.



































































































































































American Funds®






Home



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets












Welcome to American Funds

Contact Us
Preferences


Log In
LOG OUT





American Funds Investors







User Name or Account Number




Remember Me





Log in for the first time






Login Help







Login Help



New user?

Forgot password?
 
More help
 





























Forms


Search




















 
MY ACCOUNTS






										MY ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x









ACCOUNT INFORMATION





View Portfolio


Portfolio Value History


Statements & Tax Forms











FORMS


in Service & Support





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Prospectuses & Annual Reports











MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Symbols & Fund Numbers











OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products





Insurance Series

































 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global










 





Innovation


International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Taxable Bonds


United States










FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















READ















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















READ
















 
PRODUCTS






										PRODUCTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







INVESTMENT OPTIONS





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series



 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series













COLLEGE SAVINGS





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts










INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT





Traditional/Roth IRAs










EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS





401(k) Plans


403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs































 
PLANNING






										PLANNING
									
										
										See All

Close x







TOPICS





Investing Fundamentals


Mutual Fund Basics


Creating a Financial Plan


Retirement Planning


College Savings


Market Fluctuations










TOOLS





Retirement Planning Calculator


Retirement Roadmap


College Savings Calculator


Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer










 





Spend It or Save It Calculator


Investment Calculator


Payroll Deduction Analyzer


Taxes and Inflation Calculator










FEATURED












We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
SERVICE & SUPPORT






										SERVICE & SUPPORT
									
										
										See All

Close x







HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT





Buying Shares


Selling Shares


Managing Your Account


Changing Your Preferences






MORE






FORMS





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations










OTHER RESOURCES





Tax Center


Contact Us


Search for an Advisor






MORE










 


















Forms











MY ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


INSIGHTS


PRODUCTS


PLANNING


SERVICE & SUPPORT




































Investments


/ The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia                                                ®


















TAX-EXEMPT BOND FUNDS



The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia

				®  (TFVAX)

VIEW A DIFFERENT FUND 












Share Class
 


A
C
F-1
F-2





 
                                PRINT
                            












SUMMARY
RETURNS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
RESOURCES

























Closed Fund: The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia Fund Class A was closed on June 17, 2016, and its assets were merged into The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America. Visit  The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America Fund Class A page for fund information.
        









High & Low Prices
		            







For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for TFVAX through --.
            

 TFVAX




 







Description




						Fund Objective
					

The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income exempt from regular federal and Virginia state income taxes. Its secondary objective is preservation of capital.					










Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							08/14/1986



 


						CUSIP
						
					
							02630C 20 6

						Fund Number
						
					
							25












        Returns
        



	

LEARN ABOUT THE SYSTEM BEHIND OUR RESULTS















Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2016
			

















2007-2016
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS









2016








CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




01/29/16
02/01/16
$0.040286
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


02/29/16
03/01/16
$0.0390877
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.93


03/31/16
04/01/16
$0.0405419
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


04/29/16
05/02/16
$0.0407637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.01


05/31/16
06/01/16
$0.0409211
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.00


06/15/16
06/16/16
$0.0215362
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.11






2016 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.22313652


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.22313652




				 as of 6/17/16
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date










 













						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016




















Resources






            About Our Funds
        













Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Some of the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
		



This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested














Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .
















Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Thursday, August 14, 1986) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1986), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index
Lipper Virginia Municipal Debt Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns with sales charge for Class A shares reflect payment of the -32768.00% maximum sales charge.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Barclays Municipal Virginia Index did not exist prior to June 30, 1993. Therefore, results are measured from June 30, 1993, and are based on the corresponding value of the hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund on that date.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal: Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index is a market-value-weighted index that includes only investment-grade tax-exempt bonds that are issued from Virginia.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income




				Standard Deviation as of  (updated monthly). Annualized return as of  (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for TFVAX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.



































































































































































American Funds®






Home



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets












Welcome to American Funds

Contact Us
Preferences


Log In
LOG OUT





American Funds Investors







User Name or Account Number




Remember Me





Log in for the first time






Login Help







Login Help



New user?

Forgot password?
 
More help
 





























Forms


Search




















 
MY ACCOUNTS






										MY ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x









ACCOUNT INFORMATION





View Portfolio


Portfolio Value History


Statements & Tax Forms











FORMS


in Service & Support





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Prospectuses & Annual Reports











MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Symbols & Fund Numbers











OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products





Insurance Series

































 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global










 





Innovation


International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Taxable Bonds


United States










FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















READ















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















READ
















 
PRODUCTS






										PRODUCTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







INVESTMENT OPTIONS





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series



 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series













COLLEGE SAVINGS





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts










INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT





Traditional/Roth IRAs










EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS





401(k) Plans


403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs































 
PLANNING






										PLANNING
									
										
										See All

Close x







TOPICS





Investing Fundamentals


Mutual Fund Basics


Creating a Financial Plan


Retirement Planning


College Savings


Market Fluctuations










TOOLS





Retirement Planning Calculator


Retirement Roadmap


College Savings Calculator


Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer










 





Spend It or Save It Calculator


Investment Calculator


Payroll Deduction Analyzer


Taxes and Inflation Calculator










FEATURED












We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
SERVICE & SUPPORT






										SERVICE & SUPPORT
									
										
										See All

Close x







HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT





Buying Shares


Selling Shares


Managing Your Account


Changing Your Preferences






MORE






FORMS





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations










OTHER RESOURCES





Tax Center


Contact Us


Search for an Advisor






MORE










 


















Forms











MY ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


INSIGHTS


PRODUCTS


PLANNING


SERVICE & SUPPORT




































Investments


/ The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia                                                ®


















TAX-EXEMPT BOND FUNDS



The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia

				®  (TFVAX)

VIEW A DIFFERENT FUND 












Share Class
 


A
C
F-1
F-2





 
                                PRINT
                            












SUMMARY
RETURNS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
RESOURCES

























Closed Fund: The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia Fund Class A was closed on June 17, 2016, and its assets were merged into The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America. Visit  The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America Fund Class A page for fund information.
        









High & Low Prices
		            







For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for TFVAX through --.
            

 TFVAX




 







Description




						Fund Objective
					

The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income exempt from regular federal and Virginia state income taxes. Its secondary objective is preservation of capital.					










Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							08/14/1986



 


						CUSIP
						
					
							02630C 20 6

						Fund Number
						
					
							25












        Returns
        



	

LEARN ABOUT THE SYSTEM BEHIND OUR RESULTS















Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2016
			

















2007-2016
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS









2016








CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




01/29/16
02/01/16
$0.040286
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


02/29/16
03/01/16
$0.0390877
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.93


03/31/16
04/01/16
$0.0405419
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


04/29/16
05/02/16
$0.0407637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.01


05/31/16
06/01/16
$0.0409211
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.00


06/15/16
06/16/16
$0.0215362
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.11






2016 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.22313652


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.22313652




				 as of 6/17/16
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date










 













						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016




















Resources






            About Our Funds
        













Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Some of the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
		



This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested














Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .
















Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Thursday, August 14, 1986) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1986), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index
Lipper Virginia Municipal Debt Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns with sales charge for Class A shares reflect payment of the -32768.00% maximum sales charge.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Barclays Municipal Virginia Index did not exist prior to June 30, 1993. Therefore, results are measured from June 30, 1993, and are based on the corresponding value of the hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund on that date.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal: Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index is a market-value-weighted index that includes only investment-grade tax-exempt bonds that are issued from Virginia.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income




				Standard Deviation as of  (updated monthly). Annualized return as of  (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for TFVAX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.



































































































































































American Funds®






Home



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets












Welcome to American Funds

Contact Us
Preferences


Log In
LOG OUT





American Funds Investors







User Name or Account Number




Remember Me





Log in for the first time






Login Help







Login Help



New user?

Forgot password?
 
More help
 





























Forms


Search




















 
MY ACCOUNTS






										MY ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x









ACCOUNT INFORMATION





View Portfolio


Portfolio Value History


Statements & Tax Forms











FORMS


in Service & Support





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Prospectuses & Annual Reports











MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Symbols & Fund Numbers











OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products





Insurance Series

































 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global










 





Innovation


International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Taxable Bonds


United States










FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















READ















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















READ
















 
PRODUCTS






										PRODUCTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







INVESTMENT OPTIONS





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series



 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series













COLLEGE SAVINGS





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts










INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT





Traditional/Roth IRAs










EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS





401(k) Plans


403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs































 
PLANNING






										PLANNING
									
										
										See All

Close x







TOPICS





Investing Fundamentals


Mutual Fund Basics


Creating a Financial Plan


Retirement Planning


College Savings


Market Fluctuations










TOOLS





Retirement Planning Calculator


Retirement Roadmap


College Savings Calculator


Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer










 





Spend It or Save It Calculator


Investment Calculator


Payroll Deduction Analyzer


Taxes and Inflation Calculator










FEATURED












We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
SERVICE & SUPPORT






										SERVICE & SUPPORT
									
										
										See All

Close x







HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT





Buying Shares


Selling Shares


Managing Your Account


Changing Your Preferences






MORE






FORMS





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations










OTHER RESOURCES





Tax Center


Contact Us


Search for an Advisor






MORE










 


















Forms











MY ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


INSIGHTS


PRODUCTS


PLANNING


SERVICE & SUPPORT




































Investments


/ The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia                                                ®


















TAX-EXEMPT BOND FUNDS



The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia

				®  (TFVAX)

VIEW A DIFFERENT FUND 












Share Class
 


A
C
F-1
F-2





 
                                PRINT
                            












SUMMARY
RETURNS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
RESOURCES

























Closed Fund: The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia Fund Class A was closed on June 17, 2016, and its assets were merged into The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America. Visit  The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America Fund Class A page for fund information.
        









High & Low Prices
		            







For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for TFVAX through --.
            

 TFVAX




 







Description




						Fund Objective
					

The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income exempt from regular federal and Virginia state income taxes. Its secondary objective is preservation of capital.					










Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							08/14/1986



 


						CUSIP
						
					
							02630C 20 6

						Fund Number
						
					
							25












        Returns
        



	

LEARN ABOUT THE SYSTEM BEHIND OUR RESULTS















Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2016
			

















2007-2016
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS









2016








CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




01/29/16
02/01/16
$0.040286
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


02/29/16
03/01/16
$0.0390877
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.93


03/31/16
04/01/16
$0.0405419
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


04/29/16
05/02/16
$0.0407637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.01


05/31/16
06/01/16
$0.0409211
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.00


06/15/16
06/16/16
$0.0215362
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.11






2016 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.22313652


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.22313652




				 as of 6/17/16
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date










 













						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016




















Resources






            About Our Funds
        













Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Some of the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
		



This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested














Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .
















Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Thursday, August 14, 1986) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1986), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index
Lipper Virginia Municipal Debt Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns with sales charge for Class A shares reflect payment of the -32768.00% maximum sales charge.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Barclays Municipal Virginia Index did not exist prior to June 30, 1993. Therefore, results are measured from June 30, 1993, and are based on the corresponding value of the hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund on that date.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal: Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index is a market-value-weighted index that includes only investment-grade tax-exempt bonds that are issued from Virginia.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income




				Standard Deviation as of  (updated monthly). Annualized return as of  (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for TFVAX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.



































































































































































American Funds®






Home



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets












Welcome to American Funds

Contact Us
Preferences


Log In
LOG OUT





American Funds Investors







User Name or Account Number




Remember Me





Log in for the first time






Login Help







Login Help



New user?

Forgot password?
 
More help
 





























Forms


Search




















 
MY ACCOUNTS






										MY ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x









ACCOUNT INFORMATION





View Portfolio


Portfolio Value History


Statements & Tax Forms











FORMS


in Service & Support





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Prospectuses & Annual Reports











MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Symbols & Fund Numbers











OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products





Insurance Series

































 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global










 





Innovation


International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Taxable Bonds


United States










FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















READ















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















READ
















 
PRODUCTS






										PRODUCTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







INVESTMENT OPTIONS





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series



 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series













COLLEGE SAVINGS





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts










INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT





Traditional/Roth IRAs










EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS





401(k) Plans


403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs































 
PLANNING






										PLANNING
									
										
										See All

Close x







TOPICS





Investing Fundamentals


Mutual Fund Basics


Creating a Financial Plan


Retirement Planning


College Savings


Market Fluctuations










TOOLS





Retirement Planning Calculator


Retirement Roadmap


College Savings Calculator


Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer










 





Spend It or Save It Calculator


Investment Calculator


Payroll Deduction Analyzer


Taxes and Inflation Calculator










FEATURED












We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
SERVICE & SUPPORT






										SERVICE & SUPPORT
									
										
										See All

Close x







HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT





Buying Shares


Selling Shares


Managing Your Account


Changing Your Preferences






MORE






FORMS





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations










OTHER RESOURCES





Tax Center


Contact Us


Search for an Advisor






MORE










 


















Forms











MY ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


INSIGHTS


PRODUCTS


PLANNING


SERVICE & SUPPORT




































Investments


/ The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia                                                ®


















TAX-EXEMPT BOND FUNDS



The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia

				®  (TFVAX)

VIEW A DIFFERENT FUND 












Share Class
 


A
C
F-1
F-2





 
                                PRINT
                            












SUMMARY
RETURNS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
RESOURCES

























Closed Fund: The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia Fund Class A was closed on June 17, 2016, and its assets were merged into The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America. Visit  The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America Fund Class A page for fund information.
        









High & Low Prices
		            







For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for TFVAX through --.
            

 TFVAX




 







Description




						Fund Objective
					

The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income exempt from regular federal and Virginia state income taxes. Its secondary objective is preservation of capital.					










Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							08/14/1986



 


						CUSIP
						
					
							02630C 20 6

						Fund Number
						
					
							25












        Returns
        



	

LEARN ABOUT THE SYSTEM BEHIND OUR RESULTS















Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2016
			

















2007-2016
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS









2016








CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




01/29/16
02/01/16
$0.040286
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


02/29/16
03/01/16
$0.0390877
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.93


03/31/16
04/01/16
$0.0405419
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


04/29/16
05/02/16
$0.0407637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.01


05/31/16
06/01/16
$0.0409211
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.00


06/15/16
06/16/16
$0.0215362
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.11






2016 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.22313652


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.22313652




				 as of 6/17/16
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date










 













						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016




















Resources






            About Our Funds
        













Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Some of the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
		



This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested














Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .
















Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Thursday, August 14, 1986) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1986), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index
Lipper Virginia Municipal Debt Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns with sales charge for Class A shares reflect payment of the -32768.00% maximum sales charge.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Barclays Municipal Virginia Index did not exist prior to June 30, 1993. Therefore, results are measured from June 30, 1993, and are based on the corresponding value of the hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund on that date.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal: Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index is a market-value-weighted index that includes only investment-grade tax-exempt bonds that are issued from Virginia.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income




				Standard Deviation as of  (updated monthly). Annualized return as of  (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for TFVAX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.



































































































































































American Funds®






Home



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets












Welcome to American Funds

Contact Us
Preferences


Log In
LOG OUT





American Funds Investors







User Name or Account Number




Remember Me





Log in for the first time






Login Help







Login Help



New user?

Forgot password?
 
More help
 





























Forms


Search




















 
MY ACCOUNTS






										MY ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x









ACCOUNT INFORMATION





View Portfolio


Portfolio Value History


Statements & Tax Forms











FORMS


in Service & Support





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Prospectuses & Annual Reports











MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Symbols & Fund Numbers











OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products





Insurance Series

































 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global










 





Innovation


International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Taxable Bonds


United States










FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















READ















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















READ
















 
PRODUCTS






										PRODUCTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







INVESTMENT OPTIONS





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series



 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series













COLLEGE SAVINGS





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts










INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT





Traditional/Roth IRAs










EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS





401(k) Plans


403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs































 
PLANNING






										PLANNING
									
										
										See All

Close x







TOPICS





Investing Fundamentals


Mutual Fund Basics


Creating a Financial Plan


Retirement Planning


College Savings


Market Fluctuations










TOOLS





Retirement Planning Calculator


Retirement Roadmap


College Savings Calculator


Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer










 





Spend It or Save It Calculator


Investment Calculator


Payroll Deduction Analyzer


Taxes and Inflation Calculator










FEATURED












We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
SERVICE & SUPPORT






										SERVICE & SUPPORT
									
										
										See All

Close x







HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT





Buying Shares


Selling Shares


Managing Your Account


Changing Your Preferences






MORE






FORMS





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations










OTHER RESOURCES





Tax Center


Contact Us


Search for an Advisor






MORE










 


















Forms











MY ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


INSIGHTS


PRODUCTS


PLANNING


SERVICE & SUPPORT




































Investments


/ The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia                                                ®


















TAX-EXEMPT BOND FUNDS



The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia

				®  (TFVAX)

VIEW A DIFFERENT FUND 












Share Class
 


A
C
F-1
F-2





 
                                PRINT
                            












SUMMARY
RETURNS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
RESOURCES

























Closed Fund: The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia Fund Class A was closed on June 17, 2016, and its assets were merged into The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America. Visit  The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America Fund Class A page for fund information.
        









High & Low Prices
		            







For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for TFVAX through --.
            

 TFVAX




 







Description




						Fund Objective
					

The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income exempt from regular federal and Virginia state income taxes. Its secondary objective is preservation of capital.					










Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							08/14/1986



 


						CUSIP
						
					
							02630C 20 6

						Fund Number
						
					
							25












        Returns
        



	

LEARN ABOUT THE SYSTEM BEHIND OUR RESULTS















Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2016
			

















2007-2016
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS









2016








CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




01/29/16
02/01/16
$0.040286
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


02/29/16
03/01/16
$0.0390877
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.93


03/31/16
04/01/16
$0.0405419
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


04/29/16
05/02/16
$0.0407637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.01


05/31/16
06/01/16
$0.0409211
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.00


06/15/16
06/16/16
$0.0215362
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.11






2016 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.22313652


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.22313652




				 as of 6/17/16
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date










 













						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016




















Resources






            About Our Funds
        













Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Some of the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
		



This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested














Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .
















Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Thursday, August 14, 1986) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1986), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index
Lipper Virginia Municipal Debt Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns with sales charge for Class A shares reflect payment of the -32768.00% maximum sales charge.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Barclays Municipal Virginia Index did not exist prior to June 30, 1993. Therefore, results are measured from June 30, 1993, and are based on the corresponding value of the hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund on that date.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal: Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index is a market-value-weighted index that includes only investment-grade tax-exempt bonds that are issued from Virginia.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income




				Standard Deviation as of  (updated monthly). Annualized return as of  (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for TFVAX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.


















































































Global Income Builder NextShares (EVGBC) | Eaton Vance Funds
































































Use of cookies by Eaton Vance Management (International) LimitedWe use cookies to deliver our online services. Details and instructions on how to disable those cookies are set out here. By continuing to use this website you agree to our use of our cookies unless you have disabled them.accept cookies














Go to:


Eaton Vance U.S. Home

Eaton Vance U.S. HomeU.S Institutions HomeEaton Vance U.S. FundsU.S. Charitable HomeOffshore HomeGlobal Home













InvestorAccount Access 
Investment Professional Sign In











Global Income Builder NextShares  



EVGBC
Symbol



$22.31
$-0.01


Net Asset ValueJul 21, 2017



$22.31
$0.02


Closing PriceJul 21, 2017


N/A
Intraday Indicative Value†Market Closed


Bid: N/A
Ask: N/A
Quoted Prices‡Market Closed





Relateddocuments



 Fact SheetMar 31, 2017









The Fund
The Fund invests in common stocks, income instruments, preferred stocks and hybrid securities around the globe that the portfolio managers believe may provide attractive levels of income. For its investments in common stocks, the managers may also seek t o invest in securities they believe have the potential to grow income and/or provide capital appreciation over time.



The Approach
Fund managers employ a bottom-up, research driven process to identify what they believe are attractive global securities up and down the capital structure. Management endeavors to invest in income producing instruments, coupled with investments in common  stocks that may have the potential for growth of income and capital appreciation over time. Overall asset allocation decisions are made collectively by the portfolio managers.



The Features
The global, multi-asset class approach may provide diversification benefits as management seeks to uncover opportunities across an array of income producing securities and common stock. A flexible mandate with broad discretion (within the specified inves tment ranges) to allocate across investment instruments may help navigate the challenges that face traditional sources of income.







 

 OverviewWhat are NextShares?
For important information about NextShares, click here.




Historical Returns (%)as of  Jun 30, 2017









Annualized




1 Month
3 Months
YTD
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Since Fund InceptionMar 30, 2016


 
Fund at NAV
0.27
5.01
10.04
13.92
4.99
10.13
2.57
11.73


Fund at Market Price
0.29
5.06
9.99
13.81
—
—
—
11.73


MSCI World Index1
0.38
4.03
10.66
18.20
5.23
11.38
3.96
14.94





Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Performance is for the stated time period only; due to market volat ility, the Fund's current performance may be lower or higher than indicated. The Fund's performance at market price will differ from its results at net asset value (NAV). The market price used to calculate the Market Value return is the midpoint between  the highest bid and the lowest offer on the exchange on which the shares of the Fund are listed for trading as of the time that the Fund's NAV is calculated. If you trade your shares at another time during the day, your return may differ. Returns are his torical and are calculated by determining the percentage change in NAV or market price (as applicable) with all distributions reinvested at NAV or closing market price (as applicable) on the payment date of the distribution, and are net of management fee s and other expenses. Performance less than one year is cumulative.The Fund pursues its investment objective by investing in a separate investment fund (the Portfolio). The returns at NAV for periods before the date the Fund commenced operations  are for a mutual fund that invests in the Portfolio (the Portfolio Investor). The performance during such period does not represent the performance of the Fund. The prior investment performance of the Portfolio Investor (rather than the Portfolio itself)  is shown because it reflects the expenses typically borne by a retail fund investing in the Portfolio. The Portfolio Investor returns are not adjusted to reflect differences between the total net operating expenses of the Fund and the Portfolio Investor  during the periods shown. If such an adjustment were made, the performance presented below would be higher, because the Fund's total net operating expenses are lower than those of the Portfolio Investor. Performance is for a share class of the Portfolio  Investor offered at net asset value.






Fund Factsas of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Inception
03/30/2016


Investment Objective
Total return


Total Net Assets2
$15.4M


Total Net Assets of Portfolio2
$380.7M


Exchange
NASDAQ


Shares Outstanding
700000


Expense Ratio (Gross)3
2.99%


Expense Ratio (Net)3,4
0.91%


CUSIP
27830G863







Top 10 Holdings (%)5,6,7as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Alphabet Inc - CL C



Johnson & Johnson



Wells Fargo & Co



Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group Inc



Interpublic Group of Cos Inc



JPMorgan Chase & Co



Facebook Inc



Chubb Ltd



CDW Corp/DE



Melrose Industries PLC



Total
11.14







Portfolio Management




 
Christopher M. Dyer, CFA


Managed Fund since inception


Michael A. Allison, CFA


Managed Fund since inception


John H. Croft, CFA


Managed Fund since inception


Jeffrey D. Mueller


Managed Fund since inception






Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund primarily invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund and may also invest d irectly. References to investments are to the aggregate holdings of the Fund and the Portfolio.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Changes in the dividend policies of companies could make it difficult to provide a predictable level of income. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volati lity than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other conditions. Dividend capture strategies may result in higher portfolio turnover, increased trading costs and potential for capital loss or gains.  When interest rates rise, the value of preferred stocks and other hybrid securities will generally decline. As interest rates rise, the value of certain income investments is likely to decline. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose m oney investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. MSCI World Index is an unmanaged index of equity securities in the developed markets. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverage, as applicable. It is not pos sible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund. MSCI indexes are net of foreign withholding taxes. Source: MSCI. MSCI data may not be r eproduced or used for any other purpose. MSCI provides no warranties, has not prepared or approved this report, and has no liability hereunder.
2. "Total Net Assets" are the net assets of the Fund. "Total Net Assets of Portfolio" are the net assets of the Portfolio, including the Fund's investment in it and any other investments.
3. Source: Fund prospectus.
4. Net expense ratio reflects a contractual expense reimbursement that continues through 2/28/18. Without the reimbursement, if applicable, performance would have been lower.
5. Top 10 Holdings excludes cash and equivalents.
6. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are to the Portfolio's holdings. Fund commenced operations on 3/30/16.
7. Percent of Portfolio total net assets.
 Performance

Historical Returns (%)as of  Jun 30, 2017


























Annualized




1 Month
3 Months
YTD
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Since Fund InceptionMar 30, 2016


 
Fund at NAV
0.27
5.01
10.04
13.92
4.99
10.13
2.57
11.73


Fund at Market Price
0.29
5.06
9.99
13.81
—
—
—
11.73


MSCI World Index1
0.38
4.03
10.66
18.20
5.23
11.38
3.96
14.94





Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Performance is for the stated time period only; due to market volat ility, the Fund's current performance may be lower or higher than indicated. The Fund's performance at market price will differ from its results at net asset value (NAV). The market price used to calculate the Market Value return is the midpoint between  the highest bid and the lowest offer on the exchange on which the shares of the Fund are listed for trading as of the time that the Fund's NAV is calculated. If you trade your shares at another time during the day, your return may differ. Returns are his torical and are calculated by determining the percentage change in NAV or market price (as applicable) with all distributions reinvested at NAV or closing market price (as applicable) on the payment date of the distribution, and are net of management fee s and other expenses. Performance less than one year is cumulative.The Fund pursues its investment objective by investing in a separate investment fund (the Portfolio). The returns at NAV for periods before the date the Fund commenced operations  are for a mutual fund that invests in the Portfolio (the Portfolio Investor). The performance during such period does not represent the performance of the Fund. The prior investment performance of the Portfolio Investor (rather than the Portfolio itself)  is shown because it reflects the expenses typically borne by a retail fund investing in the Portfolio. The Portfolio Investor returns are not adjusted to reflect differences between the total net operating expenses of the Fund and the Portfolio Investor  during the periods shown. If such an adjustment were made, the performance presented below would be higher, because the Fund's total net operating expenses are lower than those of the Portfolio Investor. Performance is for a share class of the Portfolio  Investor offered at net asset value.






Calendar Year Returns (%)







2007
2008
2009
2010
2011
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016


 
Fund at NAV
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—


Fund at Market Price
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—


MSCI World Index1
9.04
-40.71
29.99
11.76
-5.54
15.83
26.68
4.94
-0.87
7.51





See above note regarding performance calculations. There is no Fund at Market Price performance because the Fund has not completed a calendar year of operations.






Fund Facts




 
Expense Ratio (Gross)3
2.99%


Expense Ratio (Net)3,4
0.91%


Inception
03/30/2016


Distribution Frequency
Monthly







Yield Information8as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Distribution Rate at NAV
5.44%


Subsidized SEC 30-day Yield
2.19%


Unsubsidized SEC 30-day Yield
1.66%







NAV History






Date
NAV
NAV Change


 
Jul 20, 2017
$22.32
$0.05


Jul 19, 2017
$22.27
$0.07


Jul 18, 2017
$22.20
$0.03


Jul 17, 2017
$22.17
$0.00


Jul 14, 2017
$22.17
$0.10


Jul 13, 2017
$22.07
$0.05


Jul 12, 2017
$22.02
$0.10


Jul 11, 2017
$21.92
$0.00


Jul 10, 2017
$21.92
$0.01


Jul 07, 2017
$21.91
$0.03







Distribution History9






Ex-Date
Distribution


 
Jul 03, 2017
$0.10000


Jun 01, 2017
$0.10000


May 01, 2017
$0.10000


Apr 03, 2017
$0.05000


Mar 01, 2017
$0.05550


Feb 01, 2017
$0.04110


Jan 03, 2017
$0.09020


Dec 01, 2016
$0.07070


Nov 01, 2016
$0.04690


Oct 03, 2016
$0.04440





View All






No records in this table indicates that there has not been a distribution greater than .0001 within the past 3 years. Fund prospectus






Capital Gain History9






Ex-Date
Short-Term
Long-Term


 



No records in this table indicates that there has not been a capital gain greater than .0001 within the past 3 years. Fund prospectus





Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund primarily invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund and may also invest d irectly. References to investments are to the aggregate holdings of the Fund and the Portfolio.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Changes in the dividend policies of companies could make it difficult to provide a predictable level of income. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volati lity than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other conditions. Dividend capture strategies may result in higher portfolio turnover, increased trading costs and potential for capital loss or gains.  When interest rates rise, the value of preferred stocks and other hybrid securities will generally decline. As interest rates rise, the value of certain income investments is likely to decline. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose m oney investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. MSCI World Index is an unmanaged index of equity securities in the developed markets. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverage, as applicable. It is not pos sible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund. MSCI indexes are net of foreign withholding taxes. Source: MSCI. MSCI data may not be r eproduced or used for any other purpose. MSCI provides no warranties, has not prepared or approved this report, and has no liability hereunder.
3. Source: Fund prospectus.
4. Net expense ratio reflects a contractual expense reimbursement that continues through 2/28/18. Without the reimbursement, if applicable, performance would have been lower.
8. SEC 30-day yield is a standardized measure based on the estimated yield to maturity of a fund's investments over a 30-day period and is based on the maximum offer price at the date specified. The SEC 30-day yield is not based on the distributions made by  the fund, which may differ. Subsidized yield reflects the effect of fee waivers and expense reimbursements. Distribution Rate at NAV is calculated by dividing the last distribution paid per share (annualized) by NAV. The Fund's monthly distribution may  be comprised of ordinary income, net realized capital gains and returns of capital.
9. A portion of the Fund's returns may be comprised of return of capital or short term capital gains. The Fund will determine the tax characteristics of all Fund distributions after the end of the calendar year and will provide shareholders such information  at that time. Please consult your tax advisor for further information.
 Trading & Portfolio

Trade Data10as of Jul 20, 2017









vs. Prior Business Day
Change (%)


 
Closing Price
$22.29
+$0.02
+0.09%


Closing NAV
$22.32
+$0.05
+0.22%


Closing Bid/Ask





Midpoint (of bid/ask)
NAV+$0.00




Spread (between bid/ask)
$0.06




Intraday Price (vs. NAV)





High
NAV-$0.03




Low
NAV-$0.03




Average (Volume-Wtd)
NAV-$0.03




Closing
NAV-$0.03




Trading Volume (Shares)
24,700









Trading History11Inception through Jul 20, 2017



























Premium/Discount
Closing


Date
High
Low
Average (Volume-Wtd)
Closing Price
Closing Bid/Ask Midpoint
Bid/Ask Spread


 
Jul 20, 2017
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
$0.00
$0.06


Jul 19, 2017




$0.00
$0.06


Jul 18, 2017




$0.00
$0.08


Jul 17, 2017
-$0.04
-$0.04
-$0.04
-$0.04
$0.00
$0.08


Jul 14, 2017




$0.00
$0.06







Historical Premiums/Discounts and Trading Spreads12Inception through Jul 20, 2017









Premium/Discount
Closing


Range
Closing Price
Vol Wtd Ave Price
Closing Bid/Ask Midpoint
Bid/Ask Spread


 
 >1.00%






 +0.76% to +1.00%






 +0.51% to +0.75%



1%


 +0.26% to +0.50%
2%
2%
0%
16%


 -0.25% to +0.25%
94%
94%
100%
83%


-0.26% to -0.50%
5%
5%




-0.51% to -0.75%






-0.76% to -1.00%


















Asset Mix (%)6,7,13,14,15as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Foreign Common Stocks
30.83


U.S. Common Stocks
27.39


U.S. Corporate Bonds
19.44


Foreign Corporate Bonds
11.05


Cash
4.55


Floating-Rate Loans
3.37


Preferred Stock
3.30


Convertible Bond
0.08


Total
100.00







Portfolio Statistics6as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Average Market Cap
$101.8B


Price/Earnings Ratio
17.57


Number of Holdings
506


Number of Equity Holdings
141


Price/Book Ratio
2.39


Average Coupon
6.43%


Average Maturity
9.87 yrs.


Average Duration
1.25 yrs.


Average Price
$105.04







GICS Sector Breakdown (%)6,16as of  Jun 30, 2017
























Sector
Fund
MSCI World Index1


 
Consumer Discretionary
14.47
12.32


Consumer Staples
7.91
9.67


Energy
7.97
6.04


Financials
20.00
18.01


Health Care
10.29
12.55


Industrials
12.28
11.51


Information Technology
11.67
15.65


Materials
4.33
4.90


Real Estate
3.29
3.21


Telecom Services
1.93
2.95


Utilities
5.86
3.19







Credit Quality (%)6,17as of  Jun 30, 2017






















 
BBB
9.85


BB
37.69


B
42.70


CCC or Lower
6.33


Not Rated
3.42


Total
100.00





Ratings are based on Moody's, S&P or Fitch, as applicable. If securities are rated differently by the ratings agencies, the higher rating is applied. Ratings, which are subject to change, apply to the creditworthiness of the issuers of the underlying sec urities and not to the Fund or its shares. Credit ratings measure the quality of a bond based on the issuer's creditworthiness, with ratings ranging from AAA, being the highest, to D, being the lowest based on S&P's measures. Ratings of BBB or higher by  S&P or Fitch (Baa or higher by Moody's) are considered to be investment-grade quality. Credit ratings are based largely on the ratings agency's analysis at the time of rating. The rating assigned to any particular security is not necessarily a reflection  of the issuer's current financial condition and does not necessarily reflect its assessment of the volatility of a security's market value or of the liquidity of an investment in the security. Holdings designated as "Not Rated" are not rated by the nati onal ratings agencies stated above.






Maturity Distribution (%)6,17as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Less Than 1 Year
0.00


1 To 3 Years
4.88


3 To 5 Years
16.05


5 To 10 Years
64.48


10 To 20 Years
1.50


20 To 30 Years
0.52


More Than 30 Years
12.57


Total
100.00







Assets by Country (%)6,18as of  Jun 30, 2017






















 
United States
52.86


United Kingdom
9.08


France
5.52


Japan
4.25


Spain
3.67


Canada
3.54


Netherlands
2.59


Germany
1.84


Denmark
1.60


Cash & Other Assets
4.55


Total
100.00





View All








Geographic Mix (%)6,18as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
North America
56.40


Europe
31.80


Asia/Pacific
6.68


Latin America/Caribbean
0.57


Cash & Other Assets
4.55


Total
100.00







Portfolio Holdings6,7,19as of  May 31, 2017







Holding
% of Net Assets


 
US Dollars
2.22%


Alphabet Inc - CL C
1.81%


EV Cash Reserves Fund LLC
1.33%


Facebook Inc
0.94%


Deutsche Telekom AG
0.89%


Newell Brands Inc
0.87%


Amazon.com Inc
0.87%


Visa Inc
0.83%


Melrose Industries PLC
0.82%


Apple Inc
0.82%





View All








Basket Details20Jul 24, 2017







Holding
Shares


 



View All








Transaction Fees21,22,23Jul 24, 2017







No. of Creation Units
Fee per Creation Unit (bps)


 



View All







Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund primarily invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund and may also invest d irectly. References to investments are to the aggregate holdings of the Fund and the Portfolio.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Changes in the dividend policies of companies could make it difficult to provide a predictable level of income. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volati lity than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other conditions. Dividend capture strategies may result in higher portfolio turnover, increased trading costs and potential for capital loss or gains.  When interest rates rise, the value of preferred stocks and other hybrid securities will generally decline. As interest rates rise, the value of certain income investments is likely to decline. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose m oney investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. MSCI World Index is an unmanaged index of equity securities in the developed markets. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverage, as applicable. It is not pos sible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund. MSCI indexes are net of foreign withholding taxes. Source: MSCI. MSCI data may not be r eproduced or used for any other purpose. MSCI provides no warranties, has not prepared or approved this report, and has no liability hereunder.
6. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are to the Portfolio's holdings. Fund commenced operations on 3/30/16.
7. Percent of Portfolio total net assets.
10. All trade data is for the referenced trading day. All premiums/discounts and bids/asks are relative to NAV. Premium/discount data is from actual trades, while bid/ask midpoint and spread data use the bid and ask at market close. Closing bid and closing a sk can be used for establishing limits on trading costs in limit orders.
11. All values relative to NAV.
12. Each line in the chart shows the percentage of total trading days during the designated period in which the specified Fund trading parameter was within the indicated range.  Premiums/discounts shown are versus NAV.  Closing bid/ask spread is versus the c losing bid/ask midpoint. Past performance may not predict future results.
13. A delay in transaction settlement may result in a negative cash position.
14. Preferred stocks include both U.S. and foreign securities.
15. The Fund may obtain exposure to certain market segments through investments in Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs) and futures. For purposes of the asset breakdowns, allocations with respect to the Fund's investments in ETFs and futures are based on the underly ing portfolio composition of each ETF and future as of the calendar quarter end.
16. Percent of equity holdings.
17. Percent of bond holdings.
18. Percent of total net assets.
19. The following list reflects unaudited securities holdings (excluding derivatives positions).  Holdings information may differ if presented as of trade date.  Due to rounding, holdings of less than 0.005% may show as 0.00%. Portfolio information subject t o change due to active management.
20. The Basket includes securities, cash and/or other instruments designated by the Fund to be paid or received by Authorized Participants that transact directly with the Fund in Creation Unit transactions. The Basket is not intended to be representative of  the Fund's current holdings and may vary significantly from current portfolio positions.
21. For transactions directly with the Fund, the Fund imposes transaction fees on Creation Units issued and redeemed to offset the estimated cost to the Fund of processing the transaction and converting the Basket to or from the desired portfolio composition .
22. Basis points (bps) are a unit of percentage measure. 1 basis point is equal to 0.01%.
23. A fixed fee of $150 will also be charged for each creation or redemption event. If the fund substitutes cash for basket instruments, it will impose higher transaction fees on the substituted cash amount.
 Insights & Analysis  Commentary
No commentary information is currently available.


Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund primarily invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund and may also invest d irectly. References to investments are to the aggregate holdings of the Fund and the Portfolio.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Changes in the dividend policies of companies could make it difficult to provide a predictable level of income. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volati lity than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other conditions. Dividend capture strategies may result in higher portfolio turnover, increased trading costs and potential for capital loss or gains.  When interest rates rise, the value of preferred stocks and other hybrid securities will generally decline. As interest rates rise, the value of certain income investments is likely to decline. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose m oney investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.

  Attribution
No attribution information is currently available.


Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund primarily invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund and may also invest d irectly. References to investments are to the aggregate holdings of the Fund and the Portfolio.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Changes in the dividend policies of companies could make it difficult to provide a predictable level of income. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volati lity than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other conditions. Dividend capture strategies may result in higher portfolio turnover, increased trading costs and potential for capital loss or gains.  When interest rates rise, the value of preferred stocks and other hybrid securities will generally decline. As interest rates rise, the value of certain income investments is likely to decline. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose m oney investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



 Management
Biography


Christopher M. Dyer, CFA
Vice President, Director of Global Equity, Eaton Vance Management (International) Limited
Joined Eaton Vance 2015


Christopher Dyer is a vice president of Eaton Vance Management (International) Limited and director of global equity. He is responsible for building and leading a global equity investment team, and managing global and international equity portfolios. He  joined Eaton Vance in 2015.
Chris began his career in the financial services industry in 2001. Before joining Eaton Vance, he was managing director and head of European equity for Goldman Sachs Asset Management (GSAM), where he was affiliated since 2001.
Chris earned a B.S., cum laude, from Georgetown University and an MBA from The Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania. He is a CFA charterholder.


Education

B.S. Georgetown University
M.B.A. The Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania


Experience

Managed Fund since inception





 



Biography


Michael A. Allison, CFA
Vice President, Eaton Vance Management
Joined Eaton Vance 2000


Michael Allison is a vice president of Eaton Vance Management, a director of equity strategy implementation and a structured equity portfolio manager on a number of Eaton Vance’s global and domestic equity income and tax-managed equity portfolios.  On those funds, he is responsible for portfolio construction, tax oversight and risk management. He is a member of the firm’s Equity Strategy Committee. He joined Eaton Vance in 2000.
Mike began his career in the investment management industry in 1988. Before joining Eaton Vance, Mike was an equity analyst for Schroder Investment Management North America Inc. He was also affiliated with Fleet Investment Advisors and Phoenix Home Life  Mutual Fund Insurance Co.
Mike earned a B.S.B.A. from the University of Denver. He is a member of the Boston Security Analysts Society and is a CFA charterholder.


Education

B.S.B.A., The University of Denver


Experience

Managed Fund since inception





 



Biography


John H. Croft, CFA
Vice President, Eaton Vance Management
Joined Eaton Vance 2004


John Croft is a vice president of Eaton Vance Management and portfolio manager on Eaton Vance’s diversified fixed-income team. He is responsible for buy and sell decisions, portfolio construction and risk management for the firm’s diversified  fixed-income strategies. He joined Eaton Vance in 2004.
John began his career in the investment management industry in 1986. Before joining Eaton Vance, he was a credit analyst with Fidelity Management & Research Co.
John earned a B.A. from Colgate University and an MBA from the University of Chicago Graduate School of Business. He is a CFA charterholder.


Education

B.A. Colgate University
M.B.A. Booth School of Business, University of Chicago


Experience

Managed Fund since inception





 



Biography


Jeffrey D. Mueller
Vice President, Eaton Vance Management (International) Limited
Joined Eaton Vance 2015


Jeffrey Mueller is a vice president of Eaton Vance Management (International) Limited and a global portfolio manager on Eaton Vance’s high-yield team. He is responsible for buy and sell decisions, portfolio construction and risk management for the  firm's high-yield strategies. He leads investment management and credit research for all non-U.S. high-yield opportunities. He joined Eaton Vance in 2015.
Jeff began his career in the investment management industry in 2004. Before joining Eaton Vance, he was a high-yield portfolio manager with Threadneedle Asset Management. He was previously affiliated with Centaurus Capital Ltd. and Amaranth Advisors LLC.
Jeff earned a B.B.A. from the University of Wisconsin at Madison. He was named in Financial News’ high-profile "Rising Stars in Asset Management" list in 2016, which highlights the top 40 investment management professionals in Europe unde r the age of 40.


Education

B.B.A. University of Wisconsin at Madison


Experience

Managed Fund since inception





 




 
Literature
Literature

Fact Sheet
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 31, 2017



NextShares Brochure
Download
 - Last updated: Oct 21, 2016



Annual Report
Download
 - Last updated: Oct 31, 2016



Full Prospectus
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 1, 2017



Holdings-1st or 3rd fiscal quarters-www.sec.gov
Download




SAI
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 1, 2017



Semi-Annual Report
Download
 - Last updated: Apr 30, 2017



Summary Prospectus
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 1, 2017



XBRL
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 13, 2017

















 NextShares Calculator*

EVGBCGlobal Income Builder NextShares
I Plan To:
BuySell


Approx Trade Size:
$ DollarsEnter a dollar amount to the nearest cent.Shares NextShares do not trade in fractional shares.Enter a whole number without decimals.

Premium/Discount $ Enter premium or discount to the nearest whole cent.


Estimated Share Amt
0


Estimated Value
$0.00

Estimated Current Price Per Share


Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)Jul 21, 2017


AskLast Bid
NAV


The calculator is currently unavailable.
* This calculator provides an estimate and does not provide the actual price at which a transaction will be executed. Shares of NextShares funds are traded in the secondary market through a broker, and may not be individually purchased or redeemed from the fund. All transactions in NextShares are executed at the Fund's net asset value per share (NAV) calculated at the end of the day plus or minus a premium or discount. The Estimated Current Price per Share used in the calculation reflects (i) the Fund’s intraday indicative value (IIV) and (ii) offer or bid price is subject to a 15 minute delay and is as of the time noted. See information about IIVs below(†).  The calculator is available during normal market hours only.


 

Access Advisor Resources
Get exclusive access to timely materials:

Eaton Vance Thought Leadership
Insights and Conference Calls
Notifications of Document Updates

Sign In
    or Register 




 
Related Content
NextShares BrochureOct 21, 2016  







Twitter @EatonVance
Eaton Vance on LinkedIn
Eaton Vanceon Facebook
Subscriptions
EmailPrint
Site Survey






Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.



Remember Me



I Do Not Accept
Ok




Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.


I Do Not Accept
Ok





 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-800-836-2414. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this Eaton Vance website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-800-836-2414.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. Your subscriptions can be managed on your profile page. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all Eaton Vance email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Simply enter your e-mail address to register.


Company Email:


Cancel
Already have an account? Sign In.

If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Register for more access and control.

Elevate your business practice with materials from the Advisor Institute.
Learn more with exclusive videos, conference calls, and the latest insights.
Follow products, get product notifications, and manage your Eaton Vance communications.












Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from Eaton Vance.
Here's the link:Global Income Builder NextShares (EVGBC)
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://funds.eatonvance.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 






Site Disclaimer


You are about to enter the   website for .


This is your selected location and role:





This is your selected location:



Please select your role:







I Do Not Accept
I Accept






Disclaimer


The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
By clicking the box below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the Fund (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes).

GENERAL DISCLAIMER
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.
This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.
Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, administrative and service contracts, and other risks.
QIAIF DISCLAIMER
The Fund is an umbrella fund of the Eaton Vance Institutional Funds plc (the "Company"), a public limited company with variable capital with segregated liability between sub-funds incorporated in Ireland pursuant to the Companies Acts. The Company is authorised and regulated by the Central Bank of Ireland as a Qualified Investors Alternative Investment Fund (QIAIF) and solely intended for Qualified Investors (as defined in the Fund prospectus).
The Fund is currently authorised in Ireland only and as a QIAIF the Company may apply for recognition by other EU Member States. The QIAIF mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some countries.
This website is not intended to distribute or offer or solicit the sale of shares or units in the Fund and any jurisdiction in which such distribution, or offer or solicitation would be considered contrary to local law or regulation.
            


I Do Not Accept
I Accept






































NextShares.com - News









































News

Articles
|
Events











6/9/2017
Ignites

Featured News









NextShares Fits With 'Spirit of the DOL'
Bradley Saacks from Ignites, interviews Stephen Clarke, President of NextShares. Saacks and Clarke discuss NextShares distribution and Department of Labor regulation.







 



Media Inquiries

Robyn Tice
Vice President
                                        Director of Media Relations
                                        rtice@nextshares.com
617-672-8940














Filter





Date Range:
FROM

TO

Apply dates


Type:


Clear








No results were found. Please try a wider date range, additional sources, or additional formats.
                    





6/9/2017
Ignites




NextShares Fits With 'Spirit of the DOL'
Bradley Saacks from Ignites, interviews Stephen Clarke, President of NextShares. Saacks and Clarke discuss NextShares distribution and Department of Labor regulation.






2/7/2017
ETF Advisor




Gabelli Funds Launches Food of All Nations NextShares
Gabelli Funds, LLC, announced that Gabelli Food of All Nations NextShares will list and commence trading on Nasdaq Stock Market LLC on February 14, 2017.






12/15/2016
Business Wire




Causeway Capital Management to Introduce NextShares
“Causeway is a trusted investment manager and we’re proud to begin partnering with them,” said Stephen W. Clarke, president of NextShares Solutions.






11/30/2016
Nationwide




Nationwide Funds to Introduce NextShares
“We're proud to add Nationwide Funds as a NextShares partner,” said Stephen W. Clarke, president of NextShares Solutions. “We're pleased to expand the distribution of NextShares to Nationwide Funds investors.”






11/29/2016
Business Wire




Gabelli Funds Launches Gabelli Media Mogul NextShares
Gabelli Funds, LLC, announced today that Gabelli Media Mogul NextShares will list and commence trading on Nasdaq Stock Market LLC on December 1, 2016.






10/31/2016
Business Wire




Interactive Brokers Group Announces the Availability of Eaton Vance NextShares™ with No Transaction Fees
Interactive Brokers Group, Inc., announced today the availability of Eaton Vance NextSharesTM exchange-traded managed funds through its investing and trading platforms on a no-transaction fee (NTF) basis.






10/21/2016
Ignites




Ivy First Licensee to Go Live With NextShares
Ivy Investments launched three strategies using the NextShares exchange-traded managed fund structure, becoming the first licensee of the Eaton Vance affiliate to launch any of the products.






10/18/2016
Business Wire




Ivy Launches its First Three NextShares™
Ivy Investment Management Company today introduced its first three Ivy NextShares as part of a planned lineup of NextShares exchange-traded managed funds. Ivy is among the first to offer the new structure.






8/25/2016
Forbes




NextShares Targets Lower Fund Fees
Julie Cooling from RIA Channel, interviews Jonathan Isaac, Managing Director of Product Strategy at NextShares. Cooling and Isaac discuss the launch of one of the most innovative financial platforms of our time.






7/27/2016
STRUCTUREDRETAILPRODUCTS.COM




UBS Beefs up ETF offering in the US via partnership with Eaton Vance subsidiary
The $910 billion Boston-based institutional investment consultant is working with the global asset manager to identify new NextShares™ exchange-traded managed fund (NextShares) sub-advisers.






7/18/2016
Press Release




NEPC Engaged by Eaton Vance for NextShares™ Sub-Adviser Search







7/13/2016
Ignites




UBS First Wirehouse to Ink Eaton Vance NextShares Deal
Eaton Vance signed an agreement with UBS Wealth Management to distribute NextShares through its financial advisor network. The distributor is the first wirehouse to accommodate the new investment wrapper on its platform.






7/13/2016
Press Release




UBS Plans to Offer NextShares Exchange-Traded Managed Funds







5/18/2016
Fund Action




Early Adopters of NextShares Set To Benefit
“There’s an economic advantage in terms of pricing,” Stephen Clarke, president of Eaton Vance subsidiary NextShares Solutions, told FA.






5/13/2016
Ignites




NextShares Inks Second Distribution Deal
Interactive Brokers Group said Thursday that it plans to offer NextShares exchange-traded managed funds to retail investors and financial pros through its platforms, making it the second distributor through which the products can be sold.






4/20/2016
Ignites




Ivy Funds Preps NextShares for Launch
Ivy Funds is lining up to be the first third-party manager to launch NextShares non-transparent exchange-traded products. NextShares is an Eaton Vance subsidiary.






4/20/2016
Press Release




Ivy NextShares to Launch Late Summer 2016
Ivy NextShares, managed by Ivy Investment Management Company, a subsidiary of Waddell & Reed Financial, Inc., has filed a registration statement with the Securities & Exchange Commission to register three Ivy NextShares exchange-traded managed funds (NextShares).






3/29/2016
ETF Express




Eaton Vance to launch two additional NextShares funds
Eaton Vance Corp is to launch two additional NextShares exchange-traded managed funds, the Eaton Vance Global Income Builder NextShares (:EVGBC) and Eaton Vance TABS 5-to-15 Year Laddered Municipal Bond NextShares (EVLMC).






3/4/2016
ThinkAdvisor.com




Neither ETF Nor Mutual Fund, Behold the Exchange-Traded Managed Fund
Eaton Vance launched NextShares in late February; other investment advisors have pending deals for their own exchange-traded managed fund.






3/3/2016
Ignites




Eaton Vance CEO: NextShares Launch to Create Domino Effect
Eaton Vance CEO Tom Faust is counting on the recent launch of NextShares to build momentum for the non-transparent exchange-traded products.






3/1/2016
Press Release




Stephen Clarke, President of NextShares Solutions LLC Scheduled to Present at Citi 2016 Asset Management and Broker Dealer Investor Conference
Eaton Vance Corp. (NYSE: EV) announced that Stephen Clarke, President of NextShares Solutions LLC, is scheduled to speak at the Citi 2016 Asset Management and Broker Dealer Investor Conference on Thursday, March 3, 2016.






2/29/2016
Nasdaq




Eaton Vance Stock NextShares Rings the Nasdaq Stock Market Opening Bell
Eaton Vance, a leading global asset manager whose history dates to 1924, will visit the Nasdaq MarketSite in Times Square in celebration of launching Eaton Vance Stock NextShares (Nasdaq:EVSTC).






2/25/2016
ETF.com




Eaton Vance’s NextShares Finally Debuts
Exchange-traded managed funds—the new structure patented by Eaton Vance that falls somewhere between an ETF and an open-ended mutual fund—are coming to market.






2/25/2016
Ignites




On Verge of NextShares Launch, Eaton Vance Preaches Patience
Eaton Vance CEO Tom Faust had a single message for NextShares skeptics during Wednesday’s earnings call: Have patience.






1/15/2016
Mutual Fund Wire




Don't Call Them ETMFs
When it comes to the new type of funds that Eaton Vance is creating, call them NextShares or exchange-traded managed funds but don't use the abbreviation.






11/25/2015
Ignites




B-Ds Want NextShares 'Proof'; 2016 Could Deliver It
Eaton Vance’s plans to launch the first swath of NextShares this year may be off the table, but officials are hoping a successful 2016 debut will convince distributors and asset managers to set aside their reservations and make the products a priority.






10/19/2015
Pensions & Investments




Managers finding new ETF niches to stake their claims
Over the past several months, U.S. money managers traditionally associated with active portfolio management for both retail and institutional clients have made their exchange-traded fund aspirations more pronounced.






10/1/2015
ThinkAdvisor




New Providers in U.S. ETF Space Set Record: ETFGI
Asset managers are tripping over themselves to get into the U.S. exchange-traded funds and products space, according to a report released Thursday by ETFGI, a London-based research and consultancy firm.






9/29/2015
Ignites




Columbia Threadneedle Plots Multi-Front ETF Expansion
Columbia Threadneedle plans to build on its small lineup of active ETFs with both index-based strategies and non-transparent exchanged-traded managed funds.






9/28/2015
The Wall Street Journal




Columbia Management Seeks Permission to Launch NextShares, Index ETFs
Columbia Management Investment Advisers LLC, a Boston subsidiary of Ameriprise Financial Inc., is seeking permission from regulators to launch a version of exchange-traded managed funds, a new breed of fund planned by Eaton Vance Corp.






9/9/2015
ETF Express




Eaton Vance's NextShares gets its first custodian on board
ALPS has entered into a preliminary agreement with Navigate Fund Solutions LLC (Navigate), a subsidiary of Eaton Vance Corp., to support the launch of a family of ALPS NextShares exchange-traded managed funds (ETMFs).






9/9/2015
Investment News




Eaton Vance's NextShares gets its first custodian on board
NextShares, the new fund structure from Eaton Vance Corp. designed to reduce the costs of active management, has won its first broker-dealer partner. Two investing platforms managed by Foliofn Investments Inc. will offer the funds to financial advisers and other investors.






9/9/2015
Ignites




NextShares Touts First B-D Distribution Deal
Eaton Vance has found a broker-dealer to allow its brokerage and RIA custody clients to buy and sell NextShares exchange-traded managed funds.






9/8/2015
The Wall Street Journal




Online Brokerage Folio Investing to Offer NextShares
Online brokerage services Folio Investing and Folio Institutional plan to offer a new type of fund created by a unit of Eaton Vance Corp. that may start trading later this year.






9/8/2015
Press Release




ALPS Announces Initiative to Launch NextShares
ALPS, a DST Company providing products and services to the financial services industry, today announced it has entered into a preliminary agreement with Navigate Fund Solutions LLC, a subsidiary of Eaton Vance Corp., to support the launch of a family of ALPS NextShares™ exchange-traded managed funds.






9/8/2015
Press Release




Folio Announces Plans to Offer NextShares
Folio Investing and Folio Institutional, leading online brokerage services for individual investors, financial advisors, institutions and their clients, today announced plans to be the first broker-dealer to offer NextShares™ exchange-traded managed funds directly to individual investors, advisors and institutions.






8/19/2015
The Wall Street Journal




Envestnet Plans to Offer NextShares
“Envestnet’s decision may make it easier for other companies to step forward to offer the exchange-traded managed funds.” - CEO Tom Faust






8/18/2015
Press Release




Envestnet Announces Initiative to Offer NextShares
Envestnet, Inc. today announced plans to make NextShares™ exchange-traded managed funds available to financial advisors through the Envestnet wealth management platform as part of its advisor-as-portfolio-manager tools as well as through Fund Strategist Portfolios (FSPs).






8/3/2015
WealthManagement.com




Ten to Watch 2016: Stephen Clarke
Stephen Clarke is among the 10 influencers and innovators expected to impact the advisory industry in 2016.






6/29/2015
Institutional Investor




Eaton Vance's NextShares: The Best of Two Worlds?
Tom Faust, CEO of Eaton Vance, is credited with launching NextShares, a new exchange-traded product that he hopes will help active money managers stem the tide of money flowing into cheaper index funds.






5/20/2015
Financial Times




NextShares in Financial Times: ETF model puts active managers to the test
The SEC has cleared a new vehicle developed by Eaton Vance. It will carry the brand name NextShares, and might just be the biggest innovation for the investment industry since the ETF 25 years ago.






5/7/2015
Boston Business Journal




Pioneer Investments offers NextShares in Boston Business Journal: Eaton Vance's new product could revolutionize
“Having big ambitions and tremendous respect for the value added of this structure, I would like to have more fund companies signed up.” - CEO Tom Faust






4/14/2015
The Wall Street Journal




Tom Faust on NextShares Developments
Eaton Vance got approval for a new thing called NextShares. It enhances performance, saves on taxes and delivers active strategies more efficiently.






4/14/2015
Ignites




Eaton Vance Cuts Costs, Preserves Margins With NextShares
“Lower costs relative to active mutual funds is a key selling point to advisors.”






4/1/2015
Ignites




Victory Capital Signs Up for NextShares
Victory Capital Management is the latest firm to sign with Eaton Vance to develop and launch NextShares.






3/10/2015
Traders Magazine




Eaton Vance NextShares Carves Out a New Space
Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Jason Crosby said, “We are working through the operational requirements to offer NextShares exchange-traded managed funds to our clients when available.”






3/8/2015
Investment News




 Seeing through the ETF argument in favor of transparency
Transparency promotes marketplace competition, supports better investor decision-making and exposes suspect market practices.






3/5/2015
The New York Times




Eaton Vance Charts Exchange-Traded Future
“We are changing the social contract with mutual fund investors. This really can be transformational.” - CEO Tom Faust






2/4/2015
Mutual Fund Wire




Active Fundsters Hear ETFs Calling, Even During the Price War
Active managers American Beacon and Gabelli Funds sign up for NextShares.






1/5/2015
Ignites




Executives Who Got the Job Done in 2014
“When this [idea] came up it was apparent it could be a game-changer. NextShares have the potential to broadly improve the performance and tax efficiency of active fund strategies …” - Navigate CEO Stephen Clarke






12/3/2014
Press Release




Availability of New White Paper Examining Avoidable Structural Costs of Actively Managed Mutual Funds and Their Impact on Fund Performance 
NextShares have the ability to sidestep significant fund costs, asset custody charges and the cost of portfolio trades to implement managers’ buy and sell decisions.






11/7/2014
Bloomberg




Eaton Vance Invented a New Flavor of Mutual Fund
Eaton Vance got approval for a new thing called NextShares. It enhances performance, saves on taxes, and delivers active strategies more efficiently.

























 
 














 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-877-341-9255. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this NextShares website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-877-341-9255.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with NextShares, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all NextShares email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.










Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from NextShares.
Here's the link:NextShares.com - News
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://www.nextshares.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 










 



Stock NextShares (EVSTC) | Eaton Vance Funds
































































Use of cookies by Eaton Vance Management (International) LimitedWe use cookies to deliver our online services. Details and instructions on how to disable those cookies are set out here. By continuing to use this website you agree to our use of our cookies unless you have disabled them.accept cookies














Go to:


Eaton Vance U.S. Home

Eaton Vance U.S. HomeU.S Institutions HomeEaton Vance U.S. FundsU.S. Charitable HomeOffshore HomeGlobal Home













InvestorAccount Access 
Investment Professional Sign In











Stock NextShares  



EVSTC
Symbol



$24.85
$0.01


Net Asset ValueJul 21, 2017



$24.85
$0.04


Closing PriceJul 21, 2017


N/A
Intraday Indicative Value†Market Closed


Bid: N/A
Ask: N/A
Quoted Prices‡Market Closed





Relateddocuments



 Fact SheetMar 31, 2017









The Fund
The Fund leverages the skill, experience and knowledge of Eaton Vance's equity research organization. Charlie Gaffney oversees the investment process – assembling some of the equity analysts best research ideas in one fund.



The Approach
The investment approach is grounded in hands-on fundamental research, which involves finding companies with consistent earnings growth and leading business franchises. We believe these companies may offer more consistency of returns over the long haul. S ector diversification is achieved by allocating assets across sectors represented in the S&P 500 Index.



The Features
Provides investors with a foundation of research-driven investments picked by an experienced research staff. Style-neutral framework including both value and growth investments can help lessen exposure to the value/growth cycle over time. Stock selection  and active industry allocation decisions generally serve as the primary driver of the Fund's comparative performance.







 

 OverviewWhat are NextShares?
For important information about NextShares, click here.




Historical Returns (%)as of  Jun 30, 2017









Annualized




1 Month
3 Months
YTD
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Since Fund InceptionFeb 25, 2016


 
Fund at NAV
1.16
4.15
9.19
14.16
8.18
14.34
7.44
16.28


Fund at Market Price
1.18
4.19
9.19
14.16
—
—
—
16.28


S&P 500 Index1
0.62
3.09
9.34
17.90
9.60
14.62
7.18
20.94





Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Performance is for the stated time period only; due to market volat ility, the Fund's current performance may be lower or higher than indicated. The Fund's performance at market price will differ from its results at net asset value (NAV). The market price used to calculate the Market Value return is the midpoint between  the highest bid and the lowest offer on the exchange on which the shares of the Fund are listed for trading as of the time that the Fund's NAV is calculated. If you trade your shares at another time during the day, your return may differ. Returns are his torical and are calculated by determining the percentage change in NAV or market price (as applicable) with all distributions reinvested at NAV or closing market price (as applicable) on the payment date of the distribution, and are net of management fee s and other expenses. Performance less than one year is cumulative.The Fund pursues its investment objective by investing in a separate investment fund (the Portfolio). The returns at NAV for periods before the date the Fund commenced operations  are for a mutual fund that invests in the Portfolio (the Portfolio Investor). The performance during such period does not represent the performance of the Fund. The prior investment performance of the Portfolio Investor (rather than the Portfolio itself)  is shown because it reflects the expenses typically borne by a retail fund investing in the Portfolio. The Portfolio Investor returns are not adjusted to reflect differences between the total net operating expenses of the Fund and the Portfolio Investor  during the periods shown. If such an adjustment were made, the performance presented below would be higher, because the Fund's total net operating expenses are lower than those of the Portfolio Investor. Performance is for a share class of the Portfolio  Investor offered at net asset value.






Fund Factsas of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Inception
02/25/2016


Investment Objective
Long-term capital appreciation


Total Net Assets2
$13.4M


Total Net Assets of Portfolio2
$628.1M


Exchange
NASDAQ


Shares Outstanding
550000


Expense Ratio (Gross)3
1.49%


Expense Ratio (Net)3,4
0.65%


CUSIP
27830G608







Top 10 Holdings (%)5,6,7as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Apple Inc



JPMorgan Chase & Co



Alphabet Inc - CL C



Wells Fargo & Co



Chubb Ltd



Facebook Inc



Verizon Communications Inc



Zimmer Biomet Holdings Inc



First American Financial Corp



FedEx Corp



Total
24.87







Portfolio Management




 
Charles Gaffney


Managed Fund since inception






Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are  to the Portfolio's holdings.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volatility than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other con ditions. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. S&P 500 Index is an unmanaged index of large-cap stocks commonly used as a measure of U.S. stock market performance. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverag e, as applicable. It is not possible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund.
2. "Total Net Assets" are the net assets of the Fund. "Total Net Assets of Portfolio" are the net assets of the Portfolio, including the Fund's investment in it and any other investments.
3. Source: Fund prospectus.
4. Net expense ratios reflect a contractual expense reimbursement that continues through 4/30/18. Without the reimbursement, if applicable, performance would have been lower.
5. Top 10 Holdings excludes cash and equivalents.
6. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are to the Portfolio's holdings. Fund commenced operations on 2/26/16.
7. Percent of Portfolio total net assets.
 Performance

Historical Returns (%)as of  Jun 30, 2017


























Annualized




1 Month
3 Months
YTD
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Since Fund InceptionFeb 25, 2016


 
Fund at NAV
1.16
4.15
9.19
14.16
8.18
14.34
7.44
16.28


Fund at Market Price
1.18
4.19
9.19
14.16
—
—
—
16.28


S&P 500 Index1
0.62
3.09
9.34
17.90
9.60
14.62
7.18
20.94





Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Performance is for the stated time period only; due to market volat ility, the Fund's current performance may be lower or higher than indicated. The Fund's performance at market price will differ from its results at net asset value (NAV). The market price used to calculate the Market Value return is the midpoint between  the highest bid and the lowest offer on the exchange on which the shares of the Fund are listed for trading as of the time that the Fund's NAV is calculated. If you trade your shares at another time during the day, your return may differ. Returns are his torical and are calculated by determining the percentage change in NAV or market price (as applicable) with all distributions reinvested at NAV or closing market price (as applicable) on the payment date of the distribution, and are net of management fee s and other expenses. Performance less than one year is cumulative.The Fund pursues its investment objective by investing in a separate investment fund (the Portfolio). The returns at NAV for periods before the date the Fund commenced operations  are for a mutual fund that invests in the Portfolio (the Portfolio Investor). The performance during such period does not represent the performance of the Fund. The prior investment performance of the Portfolio Investor (rather than the Portfolio itself)  is shown because it reflects the expenses typically borne by a retail fund investing in the Portfolio. The Portfolio Investor returns are not adjusted to reflect differences between the total net operating expenses of the Fund and the Portfolio Investor  during the periods shown. If such an adjustment were made, the performance presented below would be higher, because the Fund's total net operating expenses are lower than those of the Portfolio Investor. Performance is for a share class of the Portfolio  Investor offered at net asset value.






Calendar Year Returns (%)







2007
2008
2009
2010
2011
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016


 
Fund at NAV
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—


Fund at Market Price
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—


S&P 500 Index1
5.49
-37.00
26.46
15.06
2.11
16.00
32.39
13.69
1.38
11.96





See above note regarding performance calculations. There is no Fund at Market Price performance because the Fund has not completed a calendar year of operations.






Fund Facts




 
Expense Ratio (Gross)3
1.49%


Expense Ratio (Net)3,4
0.65%


Inception
02/25/2016


Distribution Frequency
Annually







Risk Measures (3 Year)8as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Alpha (%)
-0.73


Beta
0.94


R-Squared (%)
95.18


Standard Deviation (%)
9.92


Sharpe Ratio
0.80







NAV History






Date
NAV
NAV Change


 
Jul 20, 2017
$24.84
-$0.01


Jul 19, 2017
$24.85
$0.17


Jul 18, 2017
$24.68
$0.00


Jul 17, 2017
$24.68
$0.00


Jul 14, 2017
$24.68
$0.11


Jul 13, 2017
$24.57
$0.07


Jul 12, 2017
$24.50
$0.16


Jul 11, 2017
$24.34
-$0.03


Jul 10, 2017
$24.37
$0.03


Jul 07, 2017
$24.34
$0.17







Distribution History9






Ex-Date
Distribution


 
Dec 13, 2016
$0.12820





No records in this table indicates that there has not been a distribution greater than .0001 within the past 3 years. Fund prospectus





Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are  to the Portfolio's holdings.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volatility than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other con ditions. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. S&P 500 Index is an unmanaged index of large-cap stocks commonly used as a measure of U.S. stock market performance. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverag e, as applicable. It is not possible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund.
3. Source: Fund prospectus.
4. Net expense ratios reflect a contractual expense reimbursement that continues through 4/30/18. Without the reimbursement, if applicable, performance would have been lower.
8. Alpha measures risk-adjusted performance, showing excess return delivered at the same risk level as the benchmark. Beta measures the volatility of a fund relative to the overall market. R-Squared represents the percentage of the portfolio's movement that  can be explained by the general movement of the market. Standard deviation measures the historic volatility of a fund. Sharpe Ratio uses standard deviation and excess return to determine reward per unit of risk.
9. A portion of the Fund's returns may be comprised of return of capital or short term capital gains. The Fund will determine the tax characteristics of all Fund distributions after the end of the calendar year and will provide shareholders such information  at that time. Please consult your tax advisor for further information.
 Trading & Portfolio

Trade Data10as of Jul 20, 2017









vs. Prior Business Day
Change (%)


 
Closing Price
$24.81
-$0.04
-0.16%


Closing NAV
$24.84
-$0.01
-0.04%


Closing Bid/Ask





Midpoint (of bid/ask)
NAV+$0.00




Spread (between bid/ask)
$0.06




Intraday Price (vs. NAV)





High
NAV-$0.03




Low
NAV-$0.03




Average (Volume-Wtd)
NAV-$0.03




Closing
NAV-$0.03




Trading Volume (Shares)
24,900









Trading History11Inception through Jul 20, 2017



























Premium/Discount
Closing


Date
High
Low
Average (Volume-Wtd)
Closing Price
Closing Bid/Ask Midpoint
Bid/Ask Spread


 
Jul 20, 2017
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
$0.00
$0.06


Jul 19, 2017




$0.00
$0.06


Jul 18, 2017




$0.00
$0.06


Jul 17, 2017
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
$0.00
$0.06


Jul 14, 2017




$0.00
$0.06







Historical Premiums/Discounts and Trading Spreads12Inception through Jul 20, 2017









Premium/Discount
Closing


Range
Closing Price
Vol Wtd Ave Price
Closing Bid/Ask Midpoint
Bid/Ask Spread


 
 >1.00%






 +0.76% to +1.00%






 +0.51% to +0.75%






 +0.26% to +0.50%



3%


 -0.25% to +0.25%
98%
98%
100%
97%


-0.26% to -0.50%
2%
2%




-0.51% to -0.75%






-0.76% to -1.00%


















Asset Mix (%)6,7as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
U.S. Common Stocks
95.60


Foreign Common Stocks
4.39


Cash
0.02


Total
100.00







Portfolio Statistics6as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Average Market Cap
$137.4B


Price/Earnings Ratio
18.09


Number of Holdings
81


Price/Book Ratio
2.84







GICS Sector Breakdown (%)6,7as of  Jun 30, 2017
























Sector
Fund
S&P 500 Index1


 
Consumer Discretionary
12.41
12.27


Consumer Staples
9.27
9.05


Energy
5.90
6.01


Financials
14.49
14.55


Health Care
14.41
14.51


Industrials
10.14
10.28


Information Technology
22.18
22.26


Materials
2.96
2.85


Real Estate
2.84
2.93


Telecom Services
2.21
2.14


Utilities
3.19
3.16


Cash
0.02
—







Portfolio Holdings6,7,13as of  May 31, 2017







Holding
% of Net Assets


 
Apple Inc
4.89%


Alphabet Inc - CL C
3.10%


Johnson & Johnson
2.72%


JPMorgan Chase & Co
2.69%


Facebook Inc
2.36%


Wells Fargo & Co
2.35%


Chubb Ltd
2.30%


Verizon Communications Inc
2.22%


Amazon.com Inc
1.99%


First American Financial Corp
1.99%





View All








Basket Details14Jul 24, 2017







Holding
Shares


 



View All








Transaction Fees15,16,17Jul 24, 2017







No. of Creation Units
Fee per Creation Unit (bps)


 



View All







Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are  to the Portfolio's holdings.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volatility than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other con ditions. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. S&P 500 Index is an unmanaged index of large-cap stocks commonly used as a measure of U.S. stock market performance. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverag e, as applicable. It is not possible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund.
6. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are to the Portfolio's holdings. Fund commenced operations on 2/26/16.
7. Percent of Portfolio total net assets.
10. All trade data is for the referenced trading day. All premiums/discounts and bids/asks are relative to NAV. Premium/discount data is from actual trades, while bid/ask midpoint and spread data use the bid and ask at market close. Closing bid and closing a sk can be used for establishing limits on trading costs in limit orders.
11. All values relative to NAV.
12. Each line in the chart shows the percentage of total trading days during the designated period in which the specified Fund trading parameter was within the indicated range.  Premiums/discounts shown are versus NAV.  Closing bid/ask spread is versus the c losing bid/ask midpoint. Past performance may not predict future results.
13. The following list reflects unaudited securities holdings (excluding derivatives positions).  Holdings information may differ if presented as of trade date.  Due to rounding, holdings of less than 0.005% may show as 0.00%. Portfolio information subject t o change due to active management.
14. The Basket includes securities, cash and/or other instruments designated by the Fund to be paid or received by Authorized Participants that transact directly with the Fund in Creation Unit transactions. The Basket is not intended to be representative of  the Fund's current holdings and may vary significantly from current portfolio positions.
15. For transactions directly with the Fund, the Fund imposes transaction fees on Creation Units issued and redeemed to offset the estimated cost to the Fund of processing the transaction and converting the Basket to or from the desired portfolio composition .
16. Basis points (bps) are a unit of percentage measure. 1 basis point is equal to 0.01%.
17. A fixed fee of $150 will also be charged for each creation or redemption event. If the fund substitutes cash for basket instruments, it will impose higher transaction fees on the substituted cash amount.
 Insights & Analysis  Commentary
No commentary information is currently available.


Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are  to the Portfolio's holdings.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volatility than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other con ditions. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.

  Attribution
No attribution information is currently available.


Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are  to the Portfolio's holdings.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volatility than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other con ditions. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



 Management
Biography


Charles Gaffney
Vice President, Eaton Vance Management
Joined Eaton Vance 2003


Charles Gaffney is a vice president of Eaton Vance Management and portfolio manager on Eaton Vance’s global core team. He is responsible for buy and sell decisions, portfolio construction and risk management for a number of the firm’s global  core equity strategies. He is a member of the firm’s Equity Strategy Committee. He joined Eaton Vance in 2003.
Charlie began his career in the investment management industry in 1996. Before joining Eaton Vance, he was affiliated with Brown Brothers Harriman as a sector portfolio manager and Morgan Stanley Dean Witter as a senior equity analyst.
Charlie earned a B.A. from Bowdoin College in 1995 and an MBA from Fordham University in 2002.


Education

B.A. Bowdoin College
M.B.A. Graduate School of Business, Fordham University


Experience

Managed Fund since inception





 




 
Literature
Literature

Fact Sheet
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 31, 2017



NextShares Brochure
Download
 - Last updated: Oct 21, 2016



Annual Report
Download
 - Last updated: Dec 31, 2016



Full Prospectus
Download
 - Last updated: May 1, 2017



Holdings-1st or 3rd fiscal quarters-www.sec.gov
Download




SAI
Download
 - Last updated: May 1, 2017



Semi-Annual Report
Download
 - Last updated: Jun 30, 2016



Summary Prospectus
Download
 - Last updated: May 1, 2017



XBRL
Download
 - Last updated: May 10, 2017

















 NextShares Calculator*

EVSTCStock NextShares
I Plan To:
BuySell


Approx Trade Size:
$ DollarsEnter a dollar amount to the nearest cent.Shares NextShares do not trade in fractional shares.Enter a whole number without decimals.

Premium/Discount $ Enter premium or discount to the nearest whole cent.


Estimated Share Amt
0


Estimated Value
$0.00

Estimated Current Price Per Share


Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)Jul 21, 2017


AskLast Bid
NAV


The calculator is currently unavailable.
* This calculator provides an estimate and does not provide the actual price at which a transaction will be executed. Shares of NextShares funds are traded in the secondary market through a broker, and may not be individually purchased or redeemed from the fund. All transactions in NextShares are executed at the Fund's net asset value per share (NAV) calculated at the end of the day plus or minus a premium or discount. The Estimated Current Price per Share used in the calculation reflects (i) the Fund’s intraday indicative value (IIV) and (ii) offer or bid price is subject to a 15 minute delay and is as of the time noted. See information about IIVs below(†).  The calculator is available during normal market hours only.


 

Access Advisor Resources
Get exclusive access to timely materials:

Eaton Vance Thought Leadership
Insights and Conference Calls
Notifications of Document Updates

Sign In
    or Register 




 
Related Content
Full ProspectusMay 1, 2017SAIMay 1, 2017Summary ProspectusMay 1, 2017NextShares BrochureOct 21, 2016

Newsworthy

Eaton Vance to Ring Nasdaq Opening Bell to Mark Launch of First NextShares FundFeb 29, 2016 

 







Twitter @EatonVance
Eaton Vance on LinkedIn
Eaton Vanceon Facebook
Subscriptions
EmailPrint
Site Survey






Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.



Remember Me



I Do Not Accept
Ok




Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.


I Do Not Accept
Ok





 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-800-836-2414. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this Eaton Vance website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-800-836-2414.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. Your subscriptions can be managed on your profile page. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all Eaton Vance email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Simply enter your e-mail address to register.


Company Email:


Cancel
Already have an account? Sign In.

If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Register for more access and control.

Elevate your business practice with materials from the Advisor Institute.
Learn more with exclusive videos, conference calls, and the latest insights.
Follow products, get product notifications, and manage your Eaton Vance communications.












Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from Eaton Vance.
Here's the link:Stock NextShares (EVSTC)
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://funds.eatonvance.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 






Site Disclaimer


You are about to enter the   website for .


This is your selected location and role:





This is your selected location:



Please select your role:







I Do Not Accept
I Accept






Disclaimer


The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
By clicking the box below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the Fund (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes).

GENERAL DISCLAIMER
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.
This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.
Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, administrative and service contracts, and other risks.
QIAIF DISCLAIMER
The Fund is an umbrella fund of the Eaton Vance Institutional Funds plc (the "Company"), a public limited company with variable capital with segregated liability between sub-funds incorporated in Ireland pursuant to the Companies Acts. The Company is authorised and regulated by the Central Bank of Ireland as a Qualified Investors Alternative Investment Fund (QIAIF) and solely intended for Qualified Investors (as defined in the Fund prospectus).
The Fund is currently authorised in Ireland only and as a QIAIF the Company may apply for recognition by other EU Member States. The QIAIF mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some countries.
This website is not intended to distribute or offer or solicit the sale of shares or units in the Fund and any jurisdiction in which such distribution, or offer or solicitation would be considered contrary to local law or regulation.
            


I Do Not Accept
I Accept






































NextShares.com - Introducing NextShares











































                        Introducing
                    




                            NextShares exchange-traded managed funds are a new way to invest in actively managed strategies.    
                    








■Because they are actively managed, NextShares offer the potential for benchmark-beating returns by applying their manager’s proprietary investment research.
■Because they trade on an exchange, NextShares may offer cost and tax efficiencies that can enhance shareholder returns.

Bottom line: NextShares are the next evolution of fund investing™.













■Because they are actively managed, NextShares offer the potential for benchmark-beating returns by applying their manager’s proprietary investment research.
■Because they trade on an exchange, NextShares may offer cost and tax efficiencies that can enhance shareholder returns.

Bottom line: NextShares are the next evolution of fund investing™.












                                Overview















                                How do the costs of NextShares compare?
                            

















Fund costs explained.

        NextShares, mutual funds and ETFs are subject to different fund costs that impact investor returns.
    

What are distribution and service (12b-1) fees?
Fund payments to support the distribution of fund shares and the provision of shareholder services under Rule 12b-1 of the Investment Company Act of 1940. A fund’s 12b-1 fees are typically paid to the fund’s distributor and generally pass through to intermediaries that sell fund shares. Permitted 12b-1 fees are limited to one percent of average fund net assets annually. Mutual funds are often subject to 12b-1 fees that vary by share class. NextShares, and most ETFs, do not pay 12b-1 fees. A fund’s 12b-1 fees are disclosed in its prospectus and included in its total expense ratio.
What are transfer agency expenses?
The fees paid by a fund to its transfer agent and other intermediaries to process shareholder transactions and maintain shareholder accounts. Transfer agency costs are normally the largest component of mutual fund expenses other than management fees and 12b-1 fees. NextShares and ETFs typically have minimal transfer agency expenses. Transfer agency fees are characterized as "other expenses" in a fund's prospectus and are included in its total expense ratio.
What are flow-related trading costs? 
The trading costs a fund incurs to purchase and sell investments in connection with shareholder inflows and outflows, including commissions, bid-ask spread (i.e., difference between the best offer price to sell a security and the best bid price to buy the security) and market impact (i.e., the effect of a purchase or sale of a security on its trading price) costs. Flow-related trading costs are not disclosed in a fund's prospectus or reflected in its total expense ratio.

NextShares keep flow-related trading costs low by issuing and redeeming shares primarily in kind (using securities and other noncash payments) and by charging transaction fees to "Authorized Participants" (professional investors who transact directly with the fund). Most mutual funds do not issue or redeem shares in kind or charge transaction fees. 

What is cash drag? 
The impact on fund performance of holding cash. Cash drag hurts fund performance when the returns of the fund's noncash investments exceed cash returns, and helps fund performance when the opposite is true. Cash drag is not disclosed in a fund's prospectus or reflected in its total expense ratio.

NextShares that transact with Authorized Participants primarily in kind may experience less cash drag than mutual funds, which often need to hold cash to meet shareholder redemptions.
What is a fund’s total expense ratio (TER)?
A fund's total annual expenses expressed as a percentage of the fund's average net assets for the year, as stated in its prospectus. Fund TERs include management fees, 12b-1 fees, custody charges, transfer agency fees and other operating expenses of the fund. TERs do not include flow-related trading costs or cash drag. TERs also do not reflect fund sales charges or other costs borne by buyers and sellers of shares. Compared to mutual funds that can be purchased and sold at net asset value, NextShares and ETFs may be more expensive to buy and sell. 






    Compared to a mutual fund with the same strategy and portfolio management, a NextShares fund can offer cost advantages that can translate into improved fund performance.



No distribution and service (12b-1) fees. Unlike many mutual funds, NextShares offer investors a single share class with no embedded distribution and service fees.



Lower fund transfer agency expenses. Because NextShares are exchange-traded, their transfer agency expenses – the costs of administering shareholder accounts – are lower than for most mutual funds.



Lower flow-related trading costs. NextShares can keep the trading costs associated with shareholder
inflows and outflows low.




Less cash drag. NextShares generally don’t need to hold a significant reserve of cash to accommodate shareholder withdrawals. That means more of an investor’s money can be put to work in pursuit of returns.
    

For more detailed information comparing Nextshares to mutual funds, click here.

Learn more.

    Bottom line: NextShares' cost savings offer the potential for improved investor outcomes.








    Compared to a mutual fund with the same strategy and portfolio management, a NextShares fund can offer cost advantages that can translate into improved fund performance.



No distribution and service (12b-1) fees. Unlike many mutual funds, NextShares offer investors a single share class with no embedded distribution and service fees.



Lower fund transfer agency expenses. Because NextShares are exchange-traded, their transfer agency expenses – the costs of administering shareholder accounts – are lower than for most mutual funds.



Lower flow-related trading costs. NextShares can keep the trading costs associated with shareholder
inflows and outflows low.




Less cash drag. NextShares generally don’t need to hold a significant reserve of cash to accommodate shareholder withdrawals. That means more of an investor’s money can be put to work in pursuit of returns.
    

For more detailed information comparing Nextshares to mutual funds, click here.

Learn more.

    Bottom line: NextShares' cost savings offer the potential for improved investor outcomes.







Fund costs explained.

        NextShares, mutual funds and ETFs are subject to different fund costs that impact investor returns.
    

What are distribution and service (12b-1) fees?
Fund payments to support the distribution of fund shares and the provision of shareholder services under Rule 12b-1 of the Investment Company Act of 1940. A fund’s 12b-1 fees are typically paid to the fund’s distributor and generally pass through to intermediaries that sell fund shares. Permitted 12b-1 fees are limited to one percent of average fund net assets annually. Mutual funds are often subject to 12b-1 fees that vary by share class. NextShares, and most ETFs, do not pay 12b-1 fees. A fund’s 12b-1 fees are disclosed in its prospectus and included in its total expense ratio.
What are transfer agency expenses?
The fees paid by a fund to its transfer agent and other intermediaries to process shareholder transactions and maintain shareholder accounts. Transfer agency costs are normally the largest component of mutual fund expenses other than management fees and 12b-1 fees. NextShares and ETFs typically have minimal transfer agency expenses. Transfer agency fees are characterized as "other expenses" in a fund's prospectus and are included in its total expense ratio.
What are flow-related trading costs? 
The trading costs a fund incurs to purchase and sell investments in connection with shareholder inflows and outflows, including commissions, bid-ask spread (i.e., difference between the best offer price to sell a security and the best bid price to buy the security) and market impact (i.e., the effect of a purchase or sale of a security on its trading price) costs. Flow-related trading costs are not disclosed in a fund's prospectus or reflected in its total expense ratio.

NextShares keep flow-related trading costs low by issuing and redeeming shares primarily in kind (using securities and other noncash payments) and by charging transaction fees to "Authorized Participants" (professional investors who transact directly with the fund). Most mutual funds do not issue or redeem shares in kind or charge transaction fees. 

What is cash drag? 
The impact on fund performance of holding cash. Cash drag hurts fund performance when the returns of the fund's noncash investments exceed cash returns, and helps fund performance when the opposite is true. Cash drag is not disclosed in a fund's prospectus or reflected in its total expense ratio.

NextShares that transact with Authorized Participants primarily in kind may experience less cash drag than mutual funds, which often need to hold cash to meet shareholder redemptions.
What is a fund’s total expense ratio (TER)?
A fund's total annual expenses expressed as a percentage of the fund's average net assets for the year, as stated in its prospectus. Fund TERs include management fees, 12b-1 fees, custody charges, transfer agency fees and other operating expenses of the fund. TERs do not include flow-related trading costs or cash drag. TERs also do not reflect fund sales charges or other costs borne by buyers and sellers of shares. Compared to mutual funds that can be purchased and sold at net asset value, NextShares and ETFs may be more expensive to buy and sell. 










                                Learn how











                                How can NextShares potentially reduce fund capital gains distributions?












Mutual fund investors can get hit with big tax bills, whether or not their funds increase in value.
Mutual funds are frequently forced to sell securities they own to meet withdrawals by fund shareholders. Sales of fund positions at a gain can trigger capital gains
distributions – and associated taxes – for the fund's remaining shareholders. In fact, sales to meet investor outflows are often a leading cause of fund capital
gains distributions.1

NextShares work differently. When NextShares investors sell their shares, they don’t normally transact with the fund; instead, they trade through a broker to sell their
shares to someone else. Buyers may include other longterm investors or professional traders acting as market makers in the fund's shares. Because the NextShares fund itself is not involved in these transactions, the fund isn't required to sell securities to raise cash – so no capital gains distributions are triggered for remaining fund shareholders.

When market makers and other large investors accumulate sufficient shares of a NextShares fund, they can redeem their shares from the fund by transacting
through intermediaries called Authorized Participants. Here too, NextShares work differently than mutual funds. Like ETFs, most NextShares funds meet redemptions
through Authorized Participants primarily in kind, 2 meaning that the fund distributes current portfolio
holdings of securities rather than cash. By avoiding the sale of securities to meet redemptions, NextShares can potentially reduce fund capital gains distributions
and associated shareholder taxes. The enhanced tax efficiency that NextShares may provide can be a meaningful source of improved investor outcomes.

    Bottom line: NextShares can reduce fund taxable gains.



A fund’s investment strategy and portfolio turnover rate are other important determinants of the frequency and amount of its capital gains distributions. Fund distributions of net short-term capital gains are generally taxable as ordinary income; distributions of net gains from investments held by the fund for more than one year are generally taxable at long-term capital gains rates. The tax character of fund
distributions is determined and provided to shareholders after the end of each calendar year. In addition to capital gains distributions, fund distributions may include nonqualified ordinary dividends (taxed at ordinary income tax rates), qualified dividends (taxed at rates applicable to long-term capital gains if holding period and other requirements are met), exempt-interest dividends (not subject to regular federal income tax) and nondividend, or return of capital, distributions, which are not subject to current tax.
A NextShares fund’s redemptions may be effected partially or entirely in cash when in-kind delivery is not practicable or deemed not in the
best interests of fund shareholders.
As of March 31, 2016. Based on the mutual funds included in the Lipper large-cap, multicap, midcap and small-cap domestic equity categories and using the highest individual federal income tax rates in effect each year. Actual after-tax returns depend on a shareholder’s tax situation and may differ from those shown. After-tax returns are not relevant for shareholders who are not subject to tax or hold fund shares in tax-deferred accounts.
Source: Morningstar, Inc. Includes all domestic, international and global U.S.-registered equity mutual funds tracked by Morningstar.





Tax efficiency can have a meaningful impact on investor returns.

■
According to recent Lipper data, shareholder income and capital gains taxes resulting from fund distributions reduced annual returns of actively managed U.S. equity mutual funds by an average of 1.15% over the past 10 years and 2.23% over the past three years for individual investors in the highest tax bracket.3 That excludes state and local taxes and the taxes paid when shareholders sell their positions.
■
            Average capital gains distributions for equity mutual funds equaled 8.5% of fund net assets in 2015 — more than twice the 3.9% incurred in 2012.4







Mutual fund investors can get hit with big tax bills, whether or not their funds increase in value.
Mutual funds are frequently forced to sell securities they own to meet withdrawals by fund shareholders. Sales of fund positions at a gain can trigger capital gains
distributions – and associated taxes – for the fund's remaining shareholders. In fact, sales to meet investor outflows are often a leading cause of fund capital
gains distributions.1

NextShares work differently. When NextShares investors sell their shares, they don’t normally transact with the fund; instead, they trade through a broker to sell their
shares to someone else. Buyers may include other longterm investors or professional traders acting as market makers in the fund's shares. Because the NextShares fund itself is not involved in these transactions, the fund isn't required to sell securities to raise cash – so no capital gains distributions are triggered for remaining fund shareholders.

When market makers and other large investors accumulate sufficient shares of a NextShares fund, they can redeem their shares from the fund by transacting
through intermediaries called Authorized Participants. Here too, NextShares work differently than mutual funds. Like ETFs, most NextShares funds meet redemptions
through Authorized Participants primarily in kind, 2 meaning that the fund distributes current portfolio
holdings of securities rather than cash. By avoiding the sale of securities to meet redemptions, NextShares can potentially reduce fund capital gains distributions
and associated shareholder taxes. The enhanced tax efficiency that NextShares may provide can be a meaningful source of improved investor outcomes.

    Bottom line: NextShares can reduce fund taxable gains.



A fund’s investment strategy and portfolio turnover rate are other important determinants of the frequency and amount of its capital gains distributions. Fund distributions of net short-term capital gains are generally taxable as ordinary income; distributions of net gains from investments held by the fund for more than one year are generally taxable at long-term capital gains rates. The tax character of fund
distributions is determined and provided to shareholders after the end of each calendar year. In addition to capital gains distributions, fund distributions may include nonqualified ordinary dividends (taxed at ordinary income tax rates), qualified dividends (taxed at rates applicable to long-term capital gains if holding period and other requirements are met), exempt-interest dividends (not subject to regular federal income tax) and nondividend, or return of capital, distributions, which are not subject to current tax.
A NextShares fund’s redemptions may be effected partially or entirely in cash when in-kind delivery is not practicable or deemed not in the
best interests of fund shareholders.
As of March 31, 2016. Based on the mutual funds included in the Lipper large-cap, multicap, midcap and small-cap domestic equity categories and using the highest individual federal income tax rates in effect each year. Actual after-tax returns depend on a shareholder’s tax situation and may differ from those shown. After-tax returns are not relevant for shareholders who are not subject to tax or hold fund shares in tax-deferred accounts.
Source: Morningstar, Inc. Includes all domestic, international and global U.S.-registered equity mutual funds tracked by Morningstar.



Tax efficiency can have a meaningful impact on investor returns.

■
According to recent Lipper data, shareholder income and capital gains taxes resulting from fund distributions reduced annual returns of actively managed U.S. equity mutual funds by an average of 1.15% over the past 10 years and 2.23% over the past three years for individual investors in the highest tax bracket.3 That excludes state and local taxes and the taxes paid when shareholders sell their positions.
■
            Average capital gains distributions for equity mutual funds equaled 8.5% of fund net assets in 2015 — more than twice the 3.9% incurred in 2012.4








                                Learn how















                                How do NextSharesinvest?















Trusted managers and proven strategies
Each of the below companies has entered into a preliminary licensing and services agreement to permit the offering of NextShares. Additional fund managers are also expected to offer NextShares. Learn more.


ALPS Advisors
American Beacon
Broms Asset Management
Causeway Capital Management
Columbia Threadneedle Investments
Eaton Vance
Gabelli Funds, LLC
Hartford Funds Management Company
Ivy Investment Management Company
Nationwide
Nile Capital Management
Pioneer Investments
Principal Management Corporation
UBS Asset Management
Victory Capital





    NextShares can invest in all the same strategies and asset classes as mutual funds. NextShares funds may include equity, income, alternative and multi-asset funds managed in a wide range of active styles.


NextShares may replicate the strategies of their managers’ mutual funds or employ strategies offered exclusively as NextShares. Different from most ETFs, NextShares are actively managed and seek to exceed the returns of their performance benchmark and peer funds.

NextShares are designed for long-term investors who seek active portfolio management with structural cost and tax efficiencies.

    Bottom line: Investors will have access to a broad range of investment strategies.

NextShares, mutual funds and ETFs are purchased and sold differently and have varying costs. These and other distinctions may result in significant differences in investor returns.







    NextShares can invest in all the same strategies and asset classes as mutual funds. NextShares funds may include equity, income, alternative and multi-asset funds managed in a wide range of active styles.


NextShares may replicate the strategies of their managers’ mutual funds or employ strategies offered exclusively as NextShares. Different from most ETFs, NextShares are actively managed and seek to exceed the returns of their performance benchmark and peer funds.

NextShares are designed for long-term investors who seek active portfolio management with structural cost and tax efficiencies.

    Bottom line: Investors will have access to a broad range of investment strategies.

NextShares, mutual funds and ETFs are purchased and sold differently and have varying costs. These and other distinctions may result in significant differences in investor returns.






Trusted managers and proven strategies
Each of the below companies has entered into a preliminary licensing and services agreement to permit the offering of NextShares. Additional fund managers are also expected to offer NextShares. Learn more.


ALPS Advisors
American Beacon
Broms Asset Management
Causeway Capital Management
Columbia Threadneedle Investments
Eaton Vance
Gabelli Funds, LLC
Hartford Funds Management Company
Ivy Investment Management Company
Nationwide
Nile Capital Management
Pioneer Investments
Principal Management Corporation
UBS Asset Management
Victory Capital








                                Learn how











                                How do I buy and sell NextShares?
                            














    There is nothing complicated about investing in NextShares.

    NextShares list and trade on Nasdaq and are priced at the fund’s next end-of-day net asset value (NAV), plus or minus a trading cost determined when the trade executes.1 Trading costs are fully transparent and can be controlled using limit orders.


Transactions in NextShares may be subject to selling commissions and other trading costs. As a new type of fund, NextShares may be offered initially by a limited number of brokers.





    Bottom line: Buying and selling NextShares is straightforward.



Buyers and sellers of share amounts of NextShares will not know the value of their purchases and sales until after the fund’s NAV is determined at the end of the trading day.
Not all broker-dealers offering NextShares may accept dollar-based orders. In share-based orders, you specify the number of fund shares to buy or sell.











Know what you pay to buy and sell

        Investor trading costs are the costs you pay to buy and sell a fund. These include the commissions, sales charges and other fees in connection with the transaction, and the difference between the executed trade price and the corresponding fund value (the amount of premium/discount) when the trade is priced.
    

        Because all NextShares trading prices are directly linked to NAV, buyers and sellers of NextShares always know exactly what they pay in trading costs. By contrast, ETF investors typically cannot measure their trading costs because they don’t have access to a reliable measure of underlying fund value at the time of trade execution.
    










    There is nothing complicated about investing in NextShares.

    NextShares list and trade on Nasdaq and are priced at the fund’s next end-of-day net asset value (NAV), plus or minus a trading cost determined when the trade executes.1 Trading costs are fully transparent and can be controlled using limit orders.


Transactions in NextShares may be subject to selling commissions and other trading costs. As a new type of fund, NextShares may be offered initially by a limited number of brokers.





    Bottom line: Buying and selling NextShares is straightforward.



Buyers and sellers of share amounts of NextShares will not know the value of their purchases and sales until after the fund’s NAV is determined at the end of the trading day.
Not all broker-dealers offering NextShares may accept dollar-based orders. In share-based orders, you specify the number of fund shares to buy or sell.









Know what you pay to buy and sell

        Investor trading costs are the costs you pay to buy and sell a fund. These include the commissions, sales charges and other fees in connection with the transaction, and the difference between the executed trade price and the corresponding fund value (the amount of premium/discount) when the trade is priced.
    

        Because all NextShares trading prices are directly linked to NAV, buyers and sellers of NextShares always know exactly what they pay in trading costs. By contrast, ETF investors typically cannot measure their trading costs because they don’t have access to a reliable measure of underlying fund value at the time of trade execution.
    








                                Learn how














                                What kinds of investors
                                are NextShares designed for?
                            





























NextShares are designed for investors who seek:

■
        Professional, active portfolio management
■
        Long-term investments
■
        The potential for better performance through structurally lower costs
■
        The potential for lower capital gains taxes

NextShares are not suitable for frequent traders.

    Bottom line: NextShares have wide investor appeal.



        Comparing NextShares to mutual funds and ETFs
    


 
            PDF Download
        









                                Learn more







 
 














 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-877-341-9255. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this NextShares website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-877-341-9255.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with NextShares, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all NextShares email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.










Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from NextShares.
Here's the link:NextShares.com - Introducing NextShares
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://www.nextshares.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 









 













NextShares.com - Resources






































Resources



        Literature and More
      


White papers


            “Avoidable Structural Costs of Actively Managed Mutual Funds”
          

Download


 


            “Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Products at Age Seven”
          

Download




Brochure


            NextShares: Unleash the active.
          

Download


Commentary


Choosing the simplicity of NextShares


Download







        Video Library
      



The next evolution of fund investing™



 
NextShares are the first funds to combine the benefits of exchange trading with the potential for market-beating returns using proprietary active management.


What are NextShares?





NextShares exchange-traded managed funds are a new way to invest in actively managed strategies.





Designed for active management





NextShares may offer cost and tax efficiencies that can enhance shareholder returns.


Are NextShares right for you?




NextShares have wide appeal for long-term investors.





How do I buy and sell NextShares?




 
NextShares are bought and sold on an exchange through a brokerage account, much like exchange-listed stocks and ETFs.






Everything you always wanted to know about NextShares*
*BUT WERE AFRAID TO ASK


NextShares are new. And somewhat different. But new and different doesn't have to mean complicated or confusing. These questions and answers are intended to help potential users of NextShares get up to speed on this exciting investment product.

NextShares at a glance
NextShares terms and phrases
Comparing NextShares to ETFs
Comparing NextShares to mutual funds
Comparing NextShares to closed-end funds
Buying and selling NextShares
Creations and redemptions
Investor information
Owning NextShares
Master-feeder structure
Special considerations and risks
Regulation
Tax treatment
Competition
Intellectual property
Transparency
Misperceptions and myths





        Regulatory and Technical Documents
      


NextShares Regulatory Documents

            NextShares-related SEC filings and approvals.
          


Portfolio-Protected Active ETF Regulatory Documents

            SEC filings and related documents.
          


Issued U.S. Patents

            Issued patents underpinning NextShares.
          


NASDAQ Updates and Specifications

            Summaries of changes to trading protocols, feeds and services, with links to detailed specifications.
          






 
 














 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-877-341-9255. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this NextShares website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-877-341-9255.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with NextShares, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all NextShares email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.










Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from NextShares.
Here's the link:NextShares.com - Resources
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://www.nextshares.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 








 

AEI Income & Growth Fund 25 LLC: Private Company Information - Bloomberg










































  





















































































July 23, 2017 6:10 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of AEI Income & Growth Fund 25 LLC



Snapshot People




Company Overview
AEI Income & Growth Fund 25 LLC engages in acquiring leasing, holding, and selling existing and newly constructed commercial properties in the United States. As of December 31, 2007, it had 15 properties, including partial interests in 8 properties. The company’s properties include commercial, single tenant buildings leased under triple net leases. AEI Income & Growth Fund 25 LLC was founded in 2002 and is based in St. Paul, Minnesota.


1300 Wells Fargo Place30 East Seventh StreetSt. Paul, MN 55101-4939United StatesFounded in 2002



Phone: 651-227-7333

Fax: 651-227-7705








Key Executives for AEI Income & Growth Fund 25 LLC




Mr. Patrick W. Keene CPA


      	CFO & Secretary & Treasurer of AEI Fund Mgmt XXI Inc
      


Age: 57
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact AEI Income & Growth Fund 25 LLC, please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.



Server Error


403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.
You do not have permission to view this directory or page using the credentials that you supplied.






AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25, LLC Credit report, products, contacts













 Florida






Search









    AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25, LLC











Company number M03000002349
        

Status Active
        

FEI number 753074973
        

Company Type Foreign Limited Liability
        

Home State DE
        

Last activity date not available
        

Date Of Incorporation 7/15/2003
        

Principal Address
            30 EAST SEVENTH ST., STE 1300, ST PAUL, MN, 55101
            


Mailing Address 30 EAST SEVENTH ST., STE 1300, ST PAUL, MN, 55101
        
AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25, LLC Principals

Manager
                Aei Fund Management Xxi Inc
                 


Address
                30 EAST SEVENTH ST., STE 1300, ST PAUL, MN, 55101
                 



Manager
                Johnson Robert P
                 


Address
                30 EAST SEVENTH ST., STE 1300, ST PAUL, MN, 55101
                 







Last Annual Reports

2016 4/1/2016
            

2016 4/1/2016
            

2015 4/16/2015
            
Registered Agent

Agent Name C T CORPORATION SYSTEM (c)
        

Agent Address
                1200 SOUTH PINE ISLAND ROAD, PLANTATION, FL, 33324
                

Description
AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25, LLC has been set up 7/15/2003 in state DE.  
The current status of the business is Active. The AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25, LLC principal adress is 30 EAST SEVENTH ST., STE 1300, ST PAUL, MN, 55101. 
Meanwhile you can send your letters to 30 EAST SEVENTH ST., STE 1300, ST PAUL, MN, 55101. 
The company`s registered agent is C T CORPORATION SYSTEM 1200 SOUTH PINE ISLAND ROAD, PLANTATION, FL, 33324.  
The company`s management are Manager - Aei Fund Management Xxi Inc, Manager - Johnson Robert P. The company annual reports filed on Annual reports – 4/1/2016.






Comprehensive Report about this company
        





(view sample)








Similar Companies
AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND XXII LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND XXI LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
AEI INC
AEI INTERNATIONAL CORPORATION
AEI INTL. CORP.
AEI INVESTMENT INTERNATIONAL LLC












Aei Income & Growth Fund 25, LLC Corporate Details

























 






Items

Commercial Real Estate
Vacant Land
Residential







 
 



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25, LLC
Aei Income & Growth Fund 25, LLC is a 
 Foreign (non Florida) limited liability company
based in St Paul.  
They registered with the Florida Department of State's Division of Corporations
on Jul 15, 2003.


Principal Address: 30 East Seventh St Ste 1300, St Paul


Visulate is a real estate brokerage based in Mims, Florida.
We have assembled a directory of Florida companies as a research resource to assist in commercial real estate transactions.
Visulate.com is an independent website and is not affiliated with, nor has it been authorized, sponsored, or
otherwise approved by Aei Income & Growth Fund 25, LLC





Florida Sunbiz Corporation Details



Corporation Number




StatusActive
Filing TypeFORL
Filing DateJul 15, 2003
FEI Number753074973
Principal Address


30 East Seventh St Ste 1300


St Paul
 55101















Search Official Records and Other Sites



Florida UCC
Google
Bing
White Pages
Zip Local
Hoovers
Better Business Bureau



Florida License Search
 (Select "Search by Name")
Florida Workers' Comp Registration 
MyFloridaCounty.com
US Securities and Exchange Commission
US Trademark Search (Click on TESS search trademarks)



















Florida Trademark




(Links open in a separate window)


Use the links in the Official Records and Other Sites box to find additional information on Aei Income & Growth Fund 25, LLC.  
White Pages, Zip Local and Hoovers are the links to use if you want to find a phone number for the company.  
You can also try clicking on the links in the Company Directors and Officers table below.   
The Florida License Search and Workers' Comp Registration links are useful for researching contractors and subcontractors.   


The Florida UCC, Federal Lien Registrations, Judgement Liens and MyFloridaCounty.com links are useful for researching company assets and liens.
You can also use the County Property Tax and Court Records box (below) for this.   
Use the Property Appraiser link to search for real estate records.  The Clerk of Courts can be used to access records of foreclosures, 
small claims, civil and criminal cases along with warranty deeds and mortgage notes records.
The principal address for Aei Income & Growth Fund 25, LLC is in

Ramsey County .


Search County Property Tax and Court Records
Select a county from the list then click on the links to connect to the Property Appraiser or Clerk of Courts website


Select a County
Alachua
Baker
Bay
Bradford
Brevard
Broward
Calhoun
Charlotte
Citrus
Clay
Collier
Columbia
Dade
De Soto
Dixie
Duval
Escambia
Flagler
Franklin
Gadsden
Gilchrist
Glades
Gulf
Hamilton
Hardee
Hendry
Hernando
Highlands
Hillsborough
Holmes
Indian River
Jackson
Jefferson
Lafayette
Lake
Lee
Leon
Levy
Liberty
Madison
Manatee
Marion
Martin
Monroe
Nassau
Okaloosa
Okeechobee
Orange
Osceola
Palm Beach
Pasco
Pinellas
Polk
Putnam
Santa Rosa
Sarasota
Seminole
St. Johns
St. Lucie
Sumter
Suwannee
Taylor
Union
Volusia
Wakulla
Walton
Washington




Aei Income & Growth Fund 25, LLC Directors and Officers

The following table lists the directors and officers for Aei Income & Growth Fund 25, LLC.
It shows their name and position within the company.  It also shows possible
addresses and related companies for the officer based on their name.  These
are addresses and companies associated with a person of that name.  Their 
inclusion in the table does not indicate anything more than a potential relationship between Aei Income & Growth Fund 25, LLC
and the address or company.  


NamePositionPossible AddressPossible Related Companies

Aei Fund Management Xxi, Inc.


Officer (MGR)


Fund Aei
30 East Seventh St Ste 1300
St Paul
 55101
(Ramsey County)

Fund Aei
30 East Seventh Street #1300
St. Paul
MN 55101
(Ramsey County)




Johnson             Robert        P


Officer (MGR)


Robert Johnson
 580 Jillotus St
Merritt Island
 32952
(Brevard County)

Robert Johnson
 9430 Poinciana Pl
Davie
FL 33324
(Broward County)

Robert Johnson
1896 S Campbell Pt
Homosassa
FL 34448
(Citrus County)

Robert Johnson
2549 Sunset Dr
Kissimmee
FL 34741
(Osceola County)

Robert Johnson
2550 Sunset Dr
Kissimmee
FL 34741
(Osceola County)

Robert Johnson
30 East 7th St Ste 1300
St. Paul
 55101
(Ramsey County)

Robert Johnson
30 East 7th Street #1300
St. Paul
MN 55101
(Ramsey County)

Robert Johnson
30 East Seventh St Ste 1300
St Paul
 55101
(Ramsey County)

Robert Johnson
30 East Seventh Street #1300
St. Paul
MN 55101
(Ramsey County)

Robert Johnson
30 East Seventh Street Suite 1300
St. Paul
 55101
(Ramsey County)

Robert Johnson
Po Box 711
Cocoa
FL 32923
(Brevard County)

The following companies have a director or officer called Robert Johnson
 Aei Fund Management Xviii, Inc. -
Officer (PD)
 Aei Fund Management Xxi, Inc. -
Officer (PD)
 Aei Income & Growth Fund 24, LLC -
Officer (MGRM)
 Rising Star Enterprises, Inc. -
Director

 The In Gradum Foundation, Inc. -
Officer (DIR)



C T Corporation System


Registered Agent



System C
 1333 Gateway Dr
Melbourne
FL 32901
(Brevard County)

System C
 1209 Orange St
Wilmington
 19801
(New Castle County)

System C
 1209 Orange St
Wilmington
 19801
(New Castle County)

System C
 1201 Hays St
Tallahassee
 32301
(Leon County)

System C
 1203 Governors Square Blvd
Tallahassee
 32301
(Leon County)

System C
 2731 Executive Park Dr
Weston
FL 33331
(Broward County)

System C
 2731 Executive Park Dr
Weston
 33331
(Broward County)

System C
 8751 W Broward Blvd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 8751 W Broward Blvd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 8751 W Broward Blvd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 8751 W Broward Blvd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 1200 S Pine Island Rd
Fort Lauderdale
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
 615 Crescent Executive Ct
Lake Mary
 32746
(Seminole County)

System C
 5516 Sw 1st Ln
Ocala
FL 34474
(Marion County)

System C
 9872 Gulf Blvd
Treasure Island
 33706
(Pinellas County)

System C
% C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
% C T Corporation System
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
% C T Corporation System
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
% C T Corporation System
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
% Ct Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
% Ct Corporation System
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
%C T Corporation System
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
%C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1000 Brickell Avenue #400
Miami
 33131
(Miami-Dade County)

System C
10001 West Oakland Park Blvd Third Floor
Sunrise
FL 33351
(Broward County)

System C
10120 Nw 56th St
Coral Springs
 33076
(Broward County)

System C
12 Brunswick Rd
Montclair
 7042
(Essex County)

System C
12 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
120 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 Pine South Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S P Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Is
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Blvd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 55345
(Hennepin County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33411
(Palm Beach County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33314
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rd
Fort Lauderdale
FL 33334
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rd
Fort Lauderdale
FL 33328
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rd # 250
Plantation
FL 33224
( County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rd #250
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rd Ste 250
Fort Lauderdale
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rdf
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Road #250
Ft. Lauderdale
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Island Rod
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Islandlvd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Islansd Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 S Pine Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 So Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 Soputh Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 Soth Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 Sout Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Beach Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Fine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Jpine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Oine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South One Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Idland Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Ieland Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Is
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Islan Droad
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Blvd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Dr
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Raod
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Miami
FL 33131
(Miami-Dade County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Tallahassee
FL 32071
(Suwannee County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 15219
(Allegheny County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 32334
(Liberty County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 32789
(Orange County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 3332
( County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 70005
(Jefferson County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Alpharetta
FL 30005
(Fulton County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 31324
(Bryan County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33401
(Palm Beach County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33024
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 95447
( County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33325
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33134
(Miami-Dade County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
 Plantation
FL 33410
(Palm Beach County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33327
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 39924
( County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33361
( County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 32324
(Gadsden County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 30361
(Fulton County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33241
( County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33224
( County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33967
(Lee County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rd #250
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Roa
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Road #250
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Road - Team 1
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Road Ste 250
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Road Suite 250
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Roard
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Rod
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Roda
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Room
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Ropad
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island Sound
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island St
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Island System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Islandroad
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Islans Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Islnad Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Islnd Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine Sland Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pine St
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Pint Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 South Plantation Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 Soutth Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 Spine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 Sputh Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1200 West 7th St
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
12000 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
12005 Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1201 Hays St
Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
1201 Peachtree Street Ne
Atlanta
 30361
(Fulton County)

System C
1201 S Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1201 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1203 Congress Square Blvd Suite 106
Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
1203 Governor Square Blvd
Tallahassee
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1203 Governor'S Square Blvd
Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
1203 Governors Sq Blvd
Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
1203 Governors Square Blvd
Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
1203 Governors Square Blvd Suite 101
Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
1220 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
1300 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
155 Office Plaza Dr
Tallahassee
 32301
(Leon County)

System C
17 Sunset Park
Montclair
NJ 7043
(Essex County)

System C
2 North Jackson Street Suite 605
Montgomery
FL 36104
(Montgomery County)

System C
200 South Biscayne Blvd Suite 4700
Miami
FL 33131
(Miami-Dade County)

System C
200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
2075 Centre Pointe Blvd Sste 101
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
2075 Centre Pointe Blvd Ste 101
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
2075 Centre Pointe Blvd Suite 101
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
2153 Nw 86th Ave
Miami
 33122
(Miami-Dade County)

System C
2200 Nw 70th Ave
Miami
 33122
(Miami-Dade County)

System C
2200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
27911 Crown Lake Blvd Suite 245
Bonita Springs
FL 34135
(Lee County)

System C
2801 Nw 74th Ave
Miami
FL 33122
(Miami-Dade County)

System C
31200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
3211 Gall Blvd
Zephyrhills
 33541
(Pasco County)

System C
329 Oak Track Crse
Ocala
FL 34472
(Marion County)

System C
3458 Lakehore Dr
Tallahassee
FL 32312
(Leon County)

System C
3458 Lakeshore Dr
Tallahassee
FL 32312
(Leon County)

System C
3505 E Frontage Rd Ste 150
Tampa
FL 33607
(Hillsborough County)

System C
3999 West Chester Pike
Newton Square
 19073
(Delaware County)

System C
444 Brickell Ave
Miami
FL 33131
(Miami-Dade County)

System C
4485 North State Road 7
Lauderdale Lakes
FL 33319
(Broward County)

System C
4555 W Irlo Bronson Hwy
Kissimmee
FL 34746
(Osceola County)

System C
515 E Park Ave
Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
515 East Park Ave
 Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
5601 Nw 72nd Ave
Miami
FL 33166
(Miami-Dade County)

System C
617 Reasor Dr
Virginia Beach
 23464
(Virginia Beach City County)

System C
618 E South St Ste 510
Orlando
FL 32801
(Orange County)

System C
6200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
660 East Jefferson St
Tallahassee
 32301
(Leon County)

System C
7683 Old Thyme Ct
Parkland
FL 33076
(Broward County)

System C
8751 West Broward
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
8751 West Broward Blvd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
8751 West Broward Blvd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
8751 West Broward Blvd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
8751 West Broward Blvd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
8751 West Broward Blvd
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
9603 71st Ave East
Palmetto
FL 34221
(Manatee County)

System C
Attn: Madonna Cuddihy
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/ C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/ O C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/0 C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/0 Ct Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Coporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Coproration System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation Ststem
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation Sysem
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation Sysrem
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 32819
(Orange County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 32324
(Gadsden County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33314
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 23324
(Chesapeake City County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation System
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33332
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33374
( County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33410
(Palm Beach County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation System
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation Systemn
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation Systems
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corporation Sytem
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T Corproation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O C T System1200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O Corporation Systems
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O Ct Corporation System
Plantation
 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O Ct Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O Ct Corporation System
Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
C/O Ct Corporation Sytem
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O Ct Corporations Ystem
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/O Sovran Management Company Llc
Naples
FL 34110
(Collier County)

System C
C/O Tlc Engineering For Architecture
Orlando
FL 32801
(Orange County)

System C
C/P C T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
C/T Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
Community Management Specialists Inc
Oviedo
FL 32766
(Seminole County)

System C
Corporation Service Company
Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
Ct Corporation System
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
Gregory Hagan
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
One Portland Sq
Portland
 4101
(Cumberland County)

System C
Registered Agent Solutions Inc
Tallahassee
FL 32301
(Leon County)

System C
South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

System C
`200 South Pine Island Rd
Plantation
FL 33324
(Broward County)

The following companies have a director or officer called System C
 Acariahealth Pharmacy #12,Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Airstream, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Bass Precast Erecting, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Bb&K Plantation Colony LLC -
Registered Agent

 Bba Aviation Usa, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Benchmark Hospitality Of Gilchrist, LLC -
Registered Agent

 Bh Media Group, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Bj Cape Coral Gp, L.L.C. -
Registered Agent

 Central Florida Prostate Cancer Center, LLC -
Registered Agent

 Citrus Park Commons Association, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Cre Reo, LLC -
Registered Agent

 Dsld Homes (Florida), LLC -
Registered Agent

 Dt Insurance Agency, LLC -
Registered Agent

 Dyntel Corporation (Virginia) -
Registered Agent

 Emerald Realty Of Southwest Florida, LLC -
Registered Agent

 Exp Insurance Agency, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Ge Betz, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Info-Pro Lender Services, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Janssen Diagnostics, LLC -
Registered Agent

 Jet Aviation Holdings Usa, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Kdh Defense Systems, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Lakeside Ranch Corp. -
Registered Agent

 London Aviation Underwriters, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Lone Oak - Orlando, L.L.C. -
Registered Agent

 Manning & Napier Investor Services, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Meridium International, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Ovation Tek, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Point Blank Intermediate Holding, LLC -
Registered Agent

 Pompano Water Management Association, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Pro Is, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Realty Systems, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Rexam Beauty And Closures Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Sbs Insurance Agency Of Florida, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Sbts, LLC -
Registered Agent

 Sea Force Ix Of Palm Beach Charter Company, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Sfp Pool Two General Partner LLC -
Registered Agent

 Signet Technologies, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Smartroute Systems, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Solaris Capital - Celtic, LLC -
Registered Agent

 Southeastern Land Group, LLC -
Registered Agent

 Star Pipe Products, Ltd. -
Registered Agent

 The Bear Stearns Companies LLC -
Registered Agent

 The Congress Group, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 The Sandpearl Resort, LLC -
Registered Agent

 Transsolutions Of Texas, L.L.C. -
Registered Agent

 Tsg Resources, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Virgin America Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Virginia Power Energy Marketing, Inc. -
Registered Agent

 Winter Garden Village At Fowler Groves Property Owners Association, Inc. -
Registered Agent




Principal Location
Aei Income & Growth Fund 25, LLC is located at 30 East Seventh St Ste 1300 in St Paul.



Companies Located Nearby

30 East 7th St Ste 1300 - Aei Income & Growth Fund Xxi Limited Partnership 
30 East Seventh Street Suite 1300 - Aei National Income Property Fund Vii Lp 
30 East Seventh Street Suite 1300 - Aei Fund Management Xviii, Inc. 
30 East 7th Street Suite 2000 - Driscoll Properties, Inc. 
30 East 7th Street Suite 2000 - Far Niente Florida, LLC 
30 East Seventh St Ste 1300 - Aei Fund Management Xxi, Inc. 
30 East Seventh St Ste 1300 - Aei Income & Growth Fund 25, LLC 
30 East Seventh St - Aei Income & Growth Fund Xxii Limited Partnership 
30 East Seventh St - Aei Income & Growth Fund 24, LLC 
30 East 7th St - Aei Inc. Of Minnesota 
30 East 7th St - Aei National Income Property Fund Viii Lp 
444 Cedar St - Toltz, King, Duvall, Anderson And Associates, Incorporated 


Welcome to Visulate

St Paul Real Estate
My name is Sue Goldthorp, owner and co-founder of Visulate.
           Visulate is a real estate brokerage based in Mims, Florida.
           We have assembled a database with details of every property and company
           in Florida.
           We can help buy or sell real estate anywhere in Florida.
Contact us if you want to buy or sell real estate in St Paul 

Email:




Disclaimers and Disclosures
The information on this page was compiled from public records.   It is deemed reliable but is not guaranteed to be an accurate snapshot of the company at that time.  All information should be independently verified.
The Visulate site was produced from data and information compiled from recorded documents and/or outside public and private sources. Visulate is not the custodian of public records and does not assume responsibility for errors or omissions in the data it displays or for its misuse by any individual.
In the event of either error or omission, Visulate and any 3rd party data provider shall be held harmless from any damages arising from the use of records displayed on the site.
 




Copyright © Visulate ® LLC 2007, 2017.
    
Privacy Policy, Terms and Conditions.
    

 
 
 

 



AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25 LLC, 2005020300065 | Indiana-register.com












































AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25 LLC
30 E SEVENTH ST, STE 1300, SAINT PAUL, MN, 55101, USA


















 
+
0
-



AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25 LLC is an entity registered at Indiana with company number 2005020300065. Company is incorporated on2nd February 2005. Current status of the company is Active. The company's agentis CT CORPORATION SYSTEM, 150 WEST MARKET STREET, SUITE 800, INDIANAPOLIS, IN, 46204, USA
Company information


Company name
AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25 LLC


Address
30 E SEVENTH ST, STE 1300, SAINT PAUL, MN, 55101, USA


Status
Active


Company number
2005020300065


Company type
Foreign Limited Liability Company


Domicile state
Delaware


Formation Date
06/12/2002


Incorporation Date
2nd February 2005


Expiration Date
12/31/2053


Business Entity Report Due Date
2017-02-28T01:00:00+01:00



					Agent
				


Name
CT CORPORATION SYSTEM


Address
150 WEST MARKET STREET, SUITE 800, INDIANAPOLIS, IN, 46204, USA






Related companies

AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 26 LLC
AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND XXI LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND XXII LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
AEI INTERNATIONAL, INC.
AEI MUSIC NETWORK, INC.
AEI NATIONAL INCOME PROPERTY FUND VII LP
AEI NATIONAL INCOME PROPERTY FUND VIII LP
AEI NET LEASE INCOME & GROWTH FUND XIX LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
AEI NET LEASE INCOME & GROWTH FUND XX LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
AEI NET LEASE INCOME FUND 36 LP


AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 24 LLC
AEI HEARING INC.
AEI FUND MANAGEMENT XVII, INC.
AEI AUTO LLC
AEI ACCREDITED INVESTOR FUND VI LP
AEI ACCREDITED INVESTOR FUND V, LP
AEI ACCREDITED INVESTOR FUND 2002 LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
AEH MASONRY, INC.
AEGON USA SECURITIES, INC.
AEGON USA REALTY ADVISORS, LLC

Similar company number

COMERFORD & CO. P.C.
OXFORD INDUSTRIES, INC.
R.G. BLAIR MINISTRIES, INC.
WATERWAY PROPERTIES, LLC
DIAMOND FLOORING, INC
PATHWAY TRAVEL MINISTRIES, INC.
SMS LODGING, INC.
T.A. CONTRACTING CORPORATION
HOLE-IN-ONE REALTY, LLC
ARTIST @ WORK, LTD.


MML FINANCIAL PRODUCTS, LLC
COX MEDIA, L.L.C.
NORTHEAST INDIANA MERRY-GO-ROUND, LLC
STEEL WHEEL BELGIUM FARMS, LLC
FIRST HEALTH GROUP CORP.
SPEAR TRANSPORT, INC.
COVENTRY MERGER SUB INC.
LAOTTO PROPERTIES, LLC
CAT BOX STUDIOS, INC.
GREENWICH TERRACE CAFE, INC.
























AEI Income & Growth Fund 26 LLC: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 23, 2017 6:10 PM ET
Real Estate Management and Development

Company Overview of AEI Income & Growth Fund 26 LLC



Snapshot People




Company Overview
AEI Income & Growth Fund 26 LLC acquires, leases, and sells existing and newly constructed commercial properties to operating tenants in the United States. The company owns commercial and single tenant buildings. Its property portfolio includes the Sports Authority store located in Wichita, Kansas; Advance Auto Parts store situated in Middletown, Ohio; Applebee's restaurant located in Crawfordsville, Indiana; Starbucks Store situated in Bluffton, Indiana; Best Buy store located in Eau Claire, Wisconsin; Dick's Sporting Goods store situated in Fredericksburg, Virginia; Fresenius Medical Center located in Chicago, Illinois; Zales Store located in Enid, Oklahoma; and Dollar Tree store in West P...
AEI Income & Growth Fund 26 LLC acquires, leases, and sells existing and newly constructed commercial properties to operating tenants in the United States. The company owns commercial and single tenant buildings. Its property portfolio includes the Sports Authority store located in Wichita, Kansas; Advance Auto Parts store situated in Middletown, Ohio; Applebee's restaurant located in Crawfordsville, Indiana; Starbucks Store situated in Bluffton, Indiana; Best Buy store located in Eau Claire, Wisconsin; Dick's Sporting Goods store situated in Fredericksburg, Virginia; Fresenius Medical Center located in Chicago, Illinois; Zales Store located in Enid, Oklahoma; and Dollar Tree store in West Point, Mississippi. The company was founded in 2005 and is based in St. Paul, Minnesota.
Detailed Description


30 East 7th StreetSuit 1300St. Paul, MN 55101United StatesFounded in 2005



Phone: 651-227-7333








Key Executives for AEI Income & Growth Fund 26 LLC




Mr. Robert P. Johnson


      	CEO of AEI Fund Mgmt XXI Inc, President of AEI Fund Mgmt XXI Inc & Director of AEI Fund Mgmt XXI Inc
      


Age: 72
        







Mr. Patrick W. Keene CPA


      	CFO & Secretary & Treasurer of AEI Fund Mgmt XXI Inc
      


Age: 57
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 '47 Brand LLC United States +Process Team LLC United States 02 Lafayette LLC United States 1 Park Place LLC United States 10-12 MLane, LLC United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact AEI Income & Growth Fund 26 LLC, please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc














































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog











Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc Executives

 other: Special Managing Member 
Robert P Johnson






Related Companies

AEI Income & Growth Fund 26 LLC
AEI Income & Growth Fund 27 LLC
Acquisition Capital Group, Inc.
Aei Income & Growth Fund 23 Llc
Aei Income & Growth Fund 24 Llc
Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc
Aei Income & Growth Fund Xxi Ltd Partnership
Aei Income & Growth Fund Xxii Ltd Partnership
Aei Net Lease Income & Growth Fund Xix Limited Partnership
Aei Net Lease Income & Growth Fund Xx Limited Partnership
Aei Real Estate Fund 85-A Ltd Partnership
Aei Real Estate Fund 85-B Ltd Partnership
Aei Real Estate Fund 86-A Ltd Partnership
Aei Real Estate Fund Xv Ltd Partnership
Aei Real Estate Fund Xvi Ltd Partnership



        More Related Companies
      





Home



Sample Contracts



By Company


Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc




Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc





      Loading...
    





Standard IndustryClassification
Real estateAddress

30 East 7Th Street, St Paul, MN 55101
Phone
6512277333





Executives

 other: Special Managing Member 
Robert P Johnson



Sample Contracts



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(May 12th, 2006)
PURCHASE AGREEMENT                     Tia's Tex-Mex Restaurant                         Brandon, Florida   This  AGREEMENT,  entered into effective as of the  20th  day  of April, 2006 (The "Effective Date").  l.   PARTIES. Seller is AEI Accredited Investor Fund 2002 Limited Partnership (who owns an undivided 25% interest) and AEI Income & Growth  Fund  25  LLC (who owns an undivided 75% interest)  which together  own an undivided 100% interest in the fee simple  title to  that  certain real property legally described in the attached Exhibit "A" (the "Property"). Buyer is Mario & Armi Dizon.  Buyer may  assign  this  purchase agreement to an affiliate  of  Buyer, provided   initial  Buyer  remains  fully  liable   for   Buyer's performance hereunder.  Seller wishes to sell and Buyer wishes to buy the Property.  2.    PROPERTY.  The  Property  to  be  sold  to  Buyer  in  this transaction  consists of an undivided 100% interest the  Property located at 144 Brandon Town Center Drive, Bra



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(March 30th, 2006)
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE                         Brownsville, TX  THIS  ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE (this "Assignment") is  made  and  entered into as of the 17th day of  February, 2006, by and between MEYER-LAMPH DEVELOPMENT GROUP, LTD.,  a Texas  limited partnership ("Assignor"), and  AEI  INCOME  & GROWTH  FUND  25  LLC, a Delaware limited liability  company ("Assignee").                            RECITALS:       A.    Assignor and Assignee are parties to that certain Commercial  Purchase  and Sale Contract  dated  November  4, 2005,  (the  "Agreement"), pursuant  to  which  Assignee  is acquiring  from Assignor the real property, and improvements located  on  such property, more particularly  described  on EXHIBIT  A attached hereto and incorporated herein  by  this reference (the "Premises").  B.   Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement, Assignor desires to sell, assign, convey, transfer and set over to Assignee and Assignee desires to assume all of Assignor's in



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(March 30th, 2006)
ASSIGNMENT                                 OF                COMMERCIAL PURCHASE AND SALE CONTRACT        THIS  ASSIGNMENT  made and entered into  this  16th  day  of January,  2006,  by  and  between AEI  FUND  MANAGEMENT,  INC.,  a Minnesota  corporation, ("Assignor") and AEI INCOME & GROWTH  FUND 25 LLC, a Delaware limited liability company.       WITNESSETH, that:        WHEREAS, on the 4th day of November, 2005, Assignor  entered into  a Commercial Purchase and Sale Contract (referred to as  the "Agreement") for that certain property located at 5825 East  Ruben Torres Blvd., Brownsville, Texas (the "Property") with Meyer-Lamph Development  Group, Ltd.,  Texas limited partnership,  as  Seller; and        WHEREAS, Assignor desires to assign to AEI Income  &  Growth Fund  25  LLC   ("Assignee") all of Assignor's rights,  title  and interest in, to and under the Agreement regarding the Property and Assignee  desires  to assume all of Assignor's rights,  title  and interest in, to and 



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(December 30th, 2005)
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE AND GUARANTY         THIS   ASSIGNMENT  AND  ASSUMPTION  OF  LEASE  AND  GUARANTY ("Assignment")  is made and entered into this 22 day  of  December, 2005  by and among SILVER CAPITAL NET LEASE FUND I, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company ("Assignor") and AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25  LLC,  a  Delaware limited liability company, as to an undivided sixty (60.0%) percent interest as a tenant in common, and AEI  FUND MANAGEMENT XVII, INC., a Minnesota corporation, as to an  undivided forty  (40.0%)  percent interest as a tenant  in  common  (together collectively referred to as "Assignee").                               RECITALS        WHEREAS,  Gart  Bros.  Sporting  Goods  Company,  a  Colorado corporation  (collectively  "Tenant")  is  the  tenant  under  that certain lease, dated as of December 10, 2001 (as the same may  have been  modified,  supplemented, amended or assigned,  the  "Lease"), between  Edgemark  Development LLC, a  Colorado  limit



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(December 30th, 2005)
ASSIGNMENT                               OF                 AGREEMENT OF PURCHASE AND SALE        THIS  ASSIGNMENT made and entered into this 21st day  of December,  2005, by and between AEI FUND MANAGEMENT,  INC.,  a Minnesota  corporation, ("Assignor") and AEI Income  &  Growth Fund  25  LLC, a Delaware limited liability company,  and  AEI Fund Management XVII, Inc., a Minnesota corporation.       WITNESSETH, that:        WHEREAS,  on  the 16th day of December,  2005,  Assignor entered into a Agreement of Purchase and Sale (referred to  as the "Agreement") for that certain property located at 6959  E. 21st  N. Street, Wichita, Kansas (the "Property") with  Silver Capital  Net  Lease Fund I, LLC, a Virginia limited  liability company, as Seller; and        WHEREAS,  Assignor desires to assign  to  AEI  Income  & Growth  Fund  25  LLC,  an  undivided  sixty  percent  (60.0%) interest as a tenant in common, and AEI Fund Management  XVII, Inc.,  an undivided forty percent (40.0%) interes



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(December 22nd, 2005)
(The Above Space for Recorder's Use Only)              ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE AGREEMENT       THIS  ASSIGNMENT  AND  ASSUMPTION OF LEASE  AGREEMENT  (this "Assignment")  is  made and entered into as  of  the  16  day  of December, 2005 by and between AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25 LLC,  a Delaware  limited liability company, having a mailing address  at 1300  Wells Fargo Place, 30 East 7th Street, St. Paul,  Minnesota 55101  ("Assignee"),  and COMMERCIAL NET LEASE  REALTY,  INC.,  a Maryland  corporation,  having a mailing  address  at  450  South Orange Avenue, Suite 900, Orlando, Florida 32801 ("Assignor").                        W I T N E S S E T H:       WHEREAS,  Assignor has agreed to assign to Assignee  all  of its  right,  title and interest in and to a) that  certain  Lease between Assignor (as successor in interest to Captec Ster Aurora, L.L.C.),  as  lessor,  and  Sterling Jewelers  Inc.,  a  Delaware corporation,  as lessee dated January 23, 2000 (the "Lease")  and



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(December 22nd, 2005)
(The Above Space for Recorder's Use Only)            ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE AND GUARANTY        THIS  ASSIGNMENT  AND  ASSUMPTION  OF  LEASE  AND  GUARANTY ("Assignment") is made and entered into this 22 day of  November, 2005  by  and among LAFAYETTE VILLAGE, L.L.C., a Virginia limited liability  company ("Assignor") and AEI AEI INCOME & GROWTH  FUND 25 LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Assignee").                              RECITALS        WHEREAS,  Captec  Ster  Aurora,  LLC,  a  Illinois  limited liability  company (collectively "Tenant") is  the  tenant  under that certain lease, dated as of October 14, 1999 (as the same may have  been  modified,  supplemented,  amended  or  assigned,  the "Lease"),  between  Duke-Weeks  Realty  Limited  Partnership,  an Indiana limited partnership ("Original Landlord") and Tenant  and pursuant  to  which  Lease, Tenant leases that  certain  premises described on Exhibit A attached hereto and incorporated herein by this   r



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(December 22nd, 2005)
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION                               OF                       PURCHASE AGREEMENT        THIS  ASSIGNMENT made and entered into this 24th day  of October,  2005,  by and between AEI FUND MANAGEMENT,  INC.,  a Minnesota  corporation, ("Assignor") and AEI INCOME  &  GROWTH FUND   25   LLC,   a   Delaware  limited   liability   company ("Assignee");       WITNESSETH, that:        WHEREAS,  on  the 21st day of September, 2005,  Assignor entered  into an Purchase Agreement  (hereinafter referred  to as  the "Agreement") for that certain property located at 1016 North  Route 59, Aurora., Illinois, which is more particularly described within the Agreement, (the "Property) with LaFayette Village,  L.L.C.,  a  Virginia limited liability  company,  as Seller; and        WHEREAS, Assignor desires to assign to Assignee  all  of Assignor's  rights, title and interest in, to  and  under  the Agreement  regarding  the  Property and  Assignee  desires  to accept  the  assignment ther



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(December 22nd, 2005)
REAL ESTATE PURCHASE CONTRACT       THIS REAL ESTATE PURCHASE CONTRACT (the "Agreement") is made and  entered  into  by and between COMMERCIAL NET  LEASE  REALTY, INC.,  a Maryland corporation ("Seller"), and AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25 LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Buyer").                             WITNESSETH:       For and in consideration of Ten and 00/100 Dollars ($10.00), the   agreements  made  herein,  and  other  good  and   valuable considerations,  the receipt and legal sufficiency  of  which  is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:       1.   The Property.  Seller hereby agrees to sell and Buyer hereby agrees  to purchase, upon and subject to the terms and conditions herein  set  forth,  Seller's interest in a) that  certain  Lease between  Seller (as successor in interest to Captec Ster  Aurora, L.L.C.),  as  lessor,  and Sterling Jewelers,  Inc.,  a  Delaware corporation, as lessee (the "Tenant") dated January 23, 2000 (the "Lease") an



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(December 7th, 2005)
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE         THIS ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE (this "Assignment") is  made and entered into as of the 1st day of December, 2005, by and  between LOUDON ROAD N.H. RTE. 9 DEVELOPMENT, LLC, a New York limited  liability company ("Assignor"), and AEI INCOME &  GROWTH FUND 25 LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Assignee").                                      RECITALS:    A. Assignor and Assignee (predecessor-in-interest to AEI Fund Management, Inc.) are parties to that certain Purchase and Sale Agreement dated October 7, 2005, (the "Agreement"), pursuant to which Assignee is acquiring from Assignor the real property, and improvements located on such property, more particularly described on EXHIBIT A attached hereto and incorporated herein by this reference (the "Premises").    B. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement, Assignor desires to sell, assign, convey, transfer and set over to Assignee and Assignee desires to assume all of Assignor's int



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(November 14th, 2005)
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION                                OF                        PURCHASE AGREEMENT        THIS  ASSIGNMENT  made and entered into  this  7th  day  of October,  2005,  by  and  between AEI FUND  MANAGEMENT,  INC.,  a Minnesota corporation, ("Assignor") and AEI INCOME & GROWTH  FUND 25 LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Assignee");       WITNESSETH, that:        WHEREAS,  on the 1st day of August, 2005, Assignor  entered into  an  Purchase  Agreement  (hereinafter referred  to  as  the "Agreement")  for that certain property located at 2908  Broadway Ave., Yankton, South Dakota, which is more particularly described within the Agreement, (the "Property) with CDK Associates LLC,  a South Dakota limited liability company, as Seller; and        WHEREAS,  Assignor  desires to assign to  Assignee  all  of Assignor's  rights,  title and interest  in,  to  and  under  the Agreement  regarding the Property and Assignee desires to  assume all of Assignor's rights, title



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(November 14th, 2005)
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION                                OF                        PURCHASE AGREEMENT        THIS  ASSIGNMENT  made and entered into this  31st  day  of October,  2005,  by  and  between AEI FUND  MANAGEMENT,  INC.,  a Minnesota corporation, ("Assignor") and AEI INCOME & GROWTH  FUND 25 LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Assignee");       WITNESSETH, that:        WHEREAS, on the 7th day of October, 2005, Assignor  entered into  an  Purchase  Agreement  (hereinafter referred  to  as  the "Agreement")  for  that certain property located  at  297  Loudon Road,   Concord,  New  Hampshire,  which  is  more   particularly described within the Agreement, (the "Property) with Loudon  Road N.H.  Rte.  9  Development,  LLC, a New  York  limited  liability company, as Seller; and        WHEREAS,  Assignor  desires to assign to  Assignee  all  of Assignor's  rights,  title and interest  in,  to  and  under  the Agreement  regarding the Property and Assignee desires to  acc



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(November 14th, 2005)
This instrument was prepared by  AEI Income & Growth Fund 25 LLC Attn: Jenn Schreiner 1300 Wells Fargo Place 30 Seventh Street East St. Paul, MN 55101 Phone:  800-328-3519            (Space Above This Line For Recorder's Use Only)                 ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE         THIS   ASSIGNMENT  AND  ASSUMPTION   OF   LEASE   (this "Assignment")  made  this  25  day  of  October,  2005,   (the "Effective Date") by and between CDK ASSOCIATES LLC,  a  South Dakota  limited  liability  company  ("Assignor"),  having  an address  of 115 South Main Avenue, Sioux Falls, South  Dakota, 57109,  and  AEI  INCOME AND GROWTH FUND 25  LLC,  a  Delaware corporation  ("Assignee"), having an  address  of  1300  Wells Fargo  Place,  30  Seventh Street East,  St.  Paul,  Minnesota 55101.                       W I T N E S S E T H:        WHEREAS, Assignor is the owner of certain real  property located  at  2908  Broadway Avenue, City of  Yankton,  Yankton County, South Dakota (the "Property"



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(August 12th, 2005)
FIRST AMENDMENT TO NET LEASE AGREEMENT        THIS AMENDMENT TO NET LEASE AGREEMENT, made and entered into effective  as of the 20th day of June, 2005, by and  between  AEI Income & Growth Fund 25 LLC ("Fund 25"), whose corporate managing member  is AEI Fund Management XXI, Inc., whose address  is  1300 Wells  Fargo  Place, 30 East Seventh Street, St. Paul,  Minnesota 55101  ("Lessor")(fax #651 227 7705), and Kona Restaurant  Group, Inc.,  a  Delaware  corporation, whose  address  is  7500  Rialto Boulevard, Suite 250, Austin, TX 78735 ("Lessee") (fax # 512  691 8201);                            WITNESSETH:       WHEREAS, Lessor is the fee owner of a certain parcel of real property  and  improvements  located  at  Pueblo,  Colorado,  and legally  described in Exhibit "A", which is attached  hereto  and incorporated herein by reference; and         WHEREAS,   Lessee   has  constructed  the   building   and improvements  (together  the "Building")  on  the  real  property described  in  



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(March 30th, 2005)
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE        THIS ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE (this "Assignment") made  this  14th day of January, 2005, by and between LMB  AUBURN HILLS  I,  LLC,  an Ohio limited liability company  ("Assignor"), having an address of 2631 Erie Avenue, Suite 21, Cincinnati, Ohio 45208,  and  AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND XXI LIMITED PARTNERSHIP,  a Minnesota  limited partnership, and AEI INCOME & GROWTH  FUND  25 LLC,  a  Delaware limited liability company (as tenants-in-common together  collectively  referred to as,  "Assignee"),  having  an address  of 1300 Wells Fargo Place, 30 Seventh Street  East,  St. Paul, Minnesota 55101.                        W I T N E S S E T H:        WHEREAS,  Assignor  is the owner of certain  real  property located  at  3960  Baldwin Road, Auburn  Hills,  Oakland  County, Michigan  (the  "Property") as further  described  on  Exhibit  A attached hereto and made a part hereof;        WHEREAS,  Assignor  has  leased the  Property  to  Sterli



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(March 30th, 2005)
ASSIGNMENT                              OF                      PURCHASE AGREEMENT        THIS ASSIGNMENT made and entered into this 15th day of December, 2004, by and between AEI FUND MANAGEMENT, INC.,  a Minnesota corporation, ("Assignor") and AEI Income &  Growth Fund   XXI   Limited   Partnership,  a   Minnesota   limited partnership and AEI Income & Growth Fund 25 LLC  a  Delaware limited  liability company (as tenants in  common,  together collectively referred to as "Assignee");       WITNESSETH, that:        WHEREAS,  on  the 28th day of October, 2004,  Assignor entered  into  a  Purchase Agreement  (referred  to  as  the "Agreement")  for  that  certain property  located  at  3960 Baldwin  Road, Auburn Hills, Michigan (the "Property")  with LMB  Auburn Hills I, LLC, a Ohio limited liability  company, as Seller; and        WHEREAS,  Assignor desires to assign to AEI  Income  & Growth  Fund  XXI  Limited Partnership, an  undivided  forty percent  (40.0%)  interest as a tenant in



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(March 24th, 2005)
This Instrument Prepared By: John W. Steele, Attorney At Law Hirschler Fleischer 701 E. Byrd Street Richmond, Virginia 23219                  ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE       This  Assignment and Assumption of Lease, dated as of  March 18, 2005, by and between SILVER CAPITAL NET LEASE FUND II, LLC, a Virginia  limited liability company, having an address c/o  Larry D.  Silver, 6001 Broken Sound Parkway NW, Suite 600, Boca  Raton, Florida  33487  ("Assignor") to AEI  INCOME  &  GROWTH  FUND  XXI LIMITED  PARTNERSHIP, a Minnesota limited partnership, as  to  an undivided twenty percent (20.0%) interest as a tenant in  common, AEI  INCOME  &  GROWTH FUND 24 LLC, a Delaware limited  liability company, as to an undivided fourteen percent (14.0%) interest  as a  tenant  in common, AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25 LLC, a Delaware limited  liability company, as to an undivided forty-five percent (45.0%) interest as a tenant in common, and AEI PRIVATE NET LEASE MILLENNIUM   FUND   LIMITED  P



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(March 24th, 2005)
ASSIGNMENT                                OF                  AGREEMENT OF PURCHASE AND SALE       THIS ASSIGNMENT made and entered into this 3rd day of March, 2005,  by  and  between AEI FUND MANAGEMENT,  INC.,  a  Minnesota corporation,  ("Assignor")  and AEI  Income  &  Growth  Fund  XXI Limited Partnership, a Minnesota limited partnership, AEI  Income &  Growth Fund 24 LLC, a Delaware limited liability company,  AEI Income  &  Growth  Fund  25  LLC, a  Delaware  limited  liability company,  and  AEI  Private  Net Lease  Millennium  Fund  Limited Partnership,  a  Minnesota  limited partnership  (as  tenants  in common, together collectively referred to as "Assignee");       WITNESSETH, that:        WHEREAS, on the 3rd day of February, 2005, Assignor entered into  a  Agreement  of  Purchase and Sale  (referred  to  as  the "Agreement")  for that certain property located at 1977  Thornton Road,  Lithia  Springs,  Georgia  (the  "Property")  with  Silver Capital  Net  Lease  Fund II, L



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(February 15th, 2005)
PURCHASE AGREEMENT                 Tractor Supply, Marion, Indiana          This Purchase Agreement (the "Agreement") entered into and  effective as of the 21st day of January, 2005,  by  and between  Brody  Capital Management, Inc. (the "Seller")  and AEI  Fund Management, Inc., a Minnesota corporation, or  its assigns (the "Buyer").  1.    PROPERTY.  Seller holds an undivided 100% interest  in the   fee  title  to  that  certain  real  property  legally described  in  the  attached  Exhibit  "A"  (the  "Parcel"). Seller  wishes  to  sell and Buyer wishes  to  purchase  the Parcel  and  all improvements thereon upon which Seller  has developed a Tractor Supply Store (the "Improvements") on the Parcel  (the  Parcel and the Improvements collectively,  the "Property").  2.    LEASE.   The  Property is being  sold  subject  to  an existing  Lease  of the Property by and between  Seller,  as lessor, and Tractor Supply Company as lessee (the "Lessee"), dated                 (the "Lease").  



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(February 15th, 2005)
ASSIGNMENT OF LEASE          BRODY  CAPITAL  MANAGEMENT,  INC.,  an  Iowa  corporation ("Assignor")  as of  Feb 9, 2005 (the "Effective Date"),  hereby transfers  and  assigns  to AEI INCOME  &  GROWTH  FUND  25  LLC ("Assignee") all of Assignor's right, title and interest in  and to  a  certain  Lease  Agreement dated  January  31,  2005  (the "Lease")  between BUNNELL HILL DEVELOPMENT CO.,  INC.,  an  Iowa corporation   (as  "Lessor"),  and Tractor  Supply  Company  (as "Lessee")  for that certain real property legally  described  on Exhibit A attached hereto (the "Property").  Assignor  is now the Lessor under the Lease with full right  and title  to  assign the Lease and the Rent to Assignee as provided herein.   The Lease is valid, in full force and effect  and  has not  been  modified or amended.  So far as is known to Assignor, there  is  no default by Lessee under the Lease and no Rent  has been waived, anticipated, discounted, compromised or released.        NOW,  THEREFORE, f



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(November 12th, 2004)
DEVELOPMENT FINANCING AGREEMENT  THIS  AGREEMENT, made and entered into effective as of  this  2nd day of November, 2004, by and between Kona Restaurant Group, Inc. (hereinafter  referred  to as "Lessee"), whose  address  is  7500 Rialto  Boulevard, Suite 250, Austin, Texas 78735, and AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25 LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, whose principal  business address is 1300 Wells Fargo  Place,  30  East Seventh  Street, St. Paul, Minnesota 55101 (hereinafter  referred to as "Lessor").   W I T N E S S E T H, that:        WHEREAS,  Lessee  is  contemplating building  the  following Improvements  on the premises described in Exhibit  "A"  attached hereto, located in Pueblo, Colorado:     Construction of a building and improvements to be  used  as  a    Johnny Carino's Italian Restaurant.     WHEREAS,   Lessee   has  made  application   to   Lessor   for development  financing to defray the costs of  constructing  such Improvements;     WHEREAS,   Lessor   has  issued



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(November 12th, 2004)
NET LEASE AGREEMENT        THIS  LEASE, made and entered effective as of this  2nd day  of  November, 2004, by and between AEI INCOME &  GROWTH FUND  25  LLC,  a Delaware limited liability company  ("Fund 25"), whose corporate managing member is AEI Fund Management XXI,  Inc., whose address is 1300 Wells Fargo Place, 30 East Seventh   Street,  St.  Paul,  Minnesota  55101   (together, "Lessor")(fax  #651  227 7705), and Kona  Restaurant  Group, Inc.,  a Delaware corporation, whose address is 7500  Rialto Boulevard, Suite 250, Austin, Texas 78735 ("Lessee") (fax  # 512 691-8201);                            WITNESSETH:       WHEREAS, Lessor is the fee owner of a certain parcel of real  property and improvements located at Pueblo,  Colorado and  legally  described in Exhibit "A",  which  is  attached hereto and incorporated herein by reference; and       WHEREAS,   Lessee   as   owner   contracted   for   the construction of the building and improvements (together  the "Building")  on the



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(August 13th, 2004)
FIRST AMENDMENT TO NET LEASE AGREEMENT   THIS  FIRST AMENDMENT TO NET LEASE AGREEMENT, ("First Amendment") made and entered into effective as of the 30th day of June, 2004, by   and  between  AEI  Accredited  Investor  Fund  2002  Limited Partnership ("Fund 2002"), whose corporate general partner is AEI Fund  Management XVIII, Inc. and AEI Income & Growth Fund 25 LLC, ("Fund   25")  whose  corporate  managing  member  is  AEI   Fund Management  XXI, Inc., (collectively, Fund 2002 and Fund  25  are referred to hereinafter as "Lessor") whose address is 1300  Wells Fargo  Place, 30 East Seventh Street, St. Paul, Minnesota  55101, and  SWH Corporation, 17852 E 17th Street, Suite 108, Tustin,  CA 92780  ("Lessee").                            WITNESSETH:       WHEREAS, Lessor is the fee owner of a certain parcel of real property and improvements located at 8501 Northwest Prairie  View Road,  Kansas  City, Missouri, and legally described  in  Exhibit "A",  which  is  attached  hereto  and  in



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(May 7th, 2004)
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE        This instrument is executed and delivered as of the 30th day of  April,  2004,  pursuant  to that  certain  Contract  of  Sale ("Agreement")  by  and  between PRECO II  CRIC  LLC,  a  Delaware limited  liability company ("Assignor"), and AEI INCOME &  GROWTH FUND 25 LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Assignee").       1.   ASSIGNMENT OF LEASE AND GUARANTY.  For good and valuable consideration,  Assignor hereby assigns, sells,  transfers,  sets over  and  conveys to Assignee, and Assignee hereby accepts  such assignment, all right, title and interest of Assignor in, to  and under (i) that certain Lease dated as of October 21, 2003, by and between  Assignor, as Landlord, and APPLE OHIO  LLC,  a  Delaware limited  liability company ("Tenant"), as Tenant  (the  "Lease"), all  rights and obligations of Assignor under the Lease; and (ii) that  certain  Guaranty  with respect to the  Lease  (the  "Lease Guaranty"),  executed as of October 21,



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(May 7th, 2004)
Contract of Sale                               ASSIGNMENT                                OF                        PURCHASE AGREEMENT        THIS  ASSIGNMENT  made and entered into this  22nd  day  of April,  2004,  by  and  between  AEI  FUND  MANAGEMENT,  INC.,  a Minnesota corporation, ("Assignor") and AEI Income & Growth  Fund 25   LLC,  a  Delaware  limited  liability  company  (hereinafter referred to as "Assignee");       WITNESSETH, that:        WHEREAS,  on the 24th day of March, 2004, Assignor  entered into  a  Contract of Sale, as subsequently amended by that  First Amendment  to  Contracts of Sale dated April 7,  2004  (together, collectively  referred to as the "Agreement")  for  that  certain property  located at 7159 Macedonia Commons Blvd., Macedonia,  OH (the  "Property")  with  PRECO II CRIC LLC,  a  Delaware  limited liability company, as Seller; and        WHEREAS, Assignor desires to assign to AEI Income &  Growth Fund 25 LLC  its rights, title and interest in, to 



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(February 20th, 2004)
Page 2 of 2                                  ASSIGNMENT                              OF                      PURCHASE AGREEMENT        THIS  ASSIGNMENT made and entered into this 2  day  of January, 2004, by and between AEI FUND MANAGEMENT,  INC.,  a Minnesota corporation, ("Assignor") and AEI Income &  Growth Fund  25 LLC, a Delaware Limited Liability Company, and  AEI Accredited   Investor  Fund  2002  Limited  Partnership,   a Minnesota   Limited  Partnership  (as  tenants  in   common, together collectively referred to as "Assignee");       WITNESSETH, that:        WHEREAS,  on the 24th day of November, 2003,  Assignor entered into a Purchase Agreement ("the Agreement") for that certain   property   located  at  914   RiverGate   Parkway, Goodlettsville, TN (the "Property") with TransGate,  L.L.C., as Seller; and        WHEREAS,  Assignor desires to assign to AEI  Income  & Growth Fund 25 LLC, an undivided twenty-five percent (25.0%) interest  as a tenant in common; and AEI Accredi



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(February 20th, 2004)
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE        THIS ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE (this "Assignment") made  this  6 day of February, 2004, by and between TRANSMADISON, LLC,  a Nevada limited liability company ("Assignor"), having  an address at 1605 Lake Las Vegas Parkway, Henderson, Nevada  89011, and AEI INCOME & GROWTH FUND 23 LLC, a Delaware limited liability company,  AEI  INCOME & GROWTH FUND 25 LLC,  a  Delaware  limited liability company, and AEI ACCREDITED INVESTOR FUND 2002  LIMITED PARTNERSHIP,   a  Minnesota  limited  partnership  (collectively, "Assignee"),  having  an address of 1300 Wells  Fargo  Place,  30 Seventh Street East, St. Paul, Minnesota 55101.                        W I T N E S S E T H:        WHEREAS,  Assignor  is the owner of certain  real  property located  at  451  West  14  Mile Road, Madison  Heights,  Oakland County, Michigan (the "Property");        WHEREAS,  Assignor  has  leased the  Property  to  Sterling Jewelers  LLC, a Delaware limited liability



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(February 20th, 2004)
ASSIGNMENT                              OF                      PURCHASE AGREEMENT       THIS ASSIGNMENT made and entered into this 2  day    of January, 2004, by and between AEI FUND MANAGEMENT,  INC.,  a Minnesota corporation, ("Assignor") and AEI INCOME &  GROWTH FUND  23  LLC,  a  Delaware Limited Liability  Company,  AEI INCOME  &  GROWTH FUND 25 LLC, a Delaware Limited  Liability Company,  and  AEI  ACCREDITED INVESTOR  FUND  2002  LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, a Minnesota Limited Partnership (as tenants  in common, together collectively referred to as "Assignee");       WITNESSETH, that:        WHEREAS,  on the 24th day of November, 2003,  Assignor entered into a Purchase Agreement ("the Agreement") for that certain  property located at 451 West 14 Mile Road,  Madison Heights,  MI (the "Property") with TransMadison, L.L.C.,  as Seller; and        WHEREAS,  Assignor desires to assign to AEI  Income  & Growth  Fund  23,  LLC,  an  undivided  forty-eight  percent (48.0%)  as a tenant in com



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(February 20th, 2004)
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASE          THIS   ASSIGNMENT  AND  ASSUMPTION  OF  LEASE   (this "Assignment")  made  this 6 day of February,  2004,  by  and between   TRANSGATE,  L.L.C.,  a  Nevada  limited  liability company  ("Assignor"), having an address at  1605  Lake  Las Vegas  Parkway, Henderson, Nevada 89011, and  AEI  INCOME  & GROWTH  FUND  25 LLC, a Delaware limited liability  company, and AEI ACCREDITED INVESTOR FUND 2002 LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, a Minnesota  limited partnershipAEI INCOME &  GROWTH  FUND  23 LLC,  a  Delaware limited liability company,  AEI  INCOME  & GROWTH  FUND  25 LLC, a Delaware limited liability  company, and AEI ACCREDITED INVESTOR FUND 2002 LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, a Minnesota   limited  partnership  (as  tenants  in   common, together collectively referred to as "Assignee"collectively, "Assignee"), having an address of 1300 Wells Fargo Place, 30 Seventh Street East, St. Paul, Minnesota 55101.                      W I T N E S S E T H:       WHEREAS, Assi



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(February 19th, 2004)
NET LEASE AGREEMENT   THIS  NET LEASE AGREEMENT, made and entered effective as  of this 4th day of February, 2004, by and between AEI Income  & Growth  Fund  25  LLC , whose managing member  is  AEI  Fund Management  XXI,  Inc.,  and AEI  Accredited  Investor  Fund 2002Limited Partnership, whose corporate general partner  is AEI Fund Management XVIII, Inc., as tenants in common ("Fund 25",  "Fund 2002, or together, " Lessor"), whose address  is 1300  Wells Fargo Place, 30 East Seventh Street,  St.  Paul, Minnesota  55101  ("Lessor")(fax #651  227  7705),  and  SWH Corporation,  17852  E 17th Street, Suite  108,  Tustin,  CA 92780  ("Lessee") (fax#714 734 5970).                            WITNESSETH:       WHEREAS, Lessor is the fee owner of a certain parcel of real  property  and  improvements located  at  Kansas  City, Missouri,  and  legally described in Exhibit "A",  which  is attached hereto and incorporated herein by reference; and       WHEREAS,   in   connection   with   Lessee'



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(December 24th, 2003)
NET LEASE AGREEMENT        THIS  LEASE, made and entered effective as of this  9th day  of  December, 2003, by and between AEI Income &  Growth Fund 25 LLC ("Fund 25"), whose corporate managing member  is AEI  Fund  Management XXI, Inc., and AEI Private  Net  Lease Millennium  Fund  Limited Partnership  ("Millennium  Fund"), whose  corporate  general partner  is  AEI  Fund  Management XVIII,  Inc.,  whose address is 1300 Wells Fargo  Place,  30 East  Seventh  Street, St. Paul, Minnesota 55101  (together, "Lessor")(fax  #651  227 7705), and Kona  Restaurant  Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation, whose address is 20308 Highway 71  West, Suite 5, Spicewood, Texas 78669 ("Lessee") (fax  # 512 263 8055);                            WITNESSETH:       WHEREAS, Lessor is the fee owner of a certain parcel of real  property  and improvements located  at  Lake  Charles, Louisiana  and  legally described in Exhibit "A",  which  is attached hereto and incorporated herein by reference; and       WHERE



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(December 24th, 2003)
NET LEASE AGREEMENT        THIS  LEASE,  made and entered effective as of 10th  day  of December,  2003, by and between AEI Income & Growth Fund  25  LLC ("Fund  25"),  whose  corporate  managing  member  is  AEI   Fund Management  XXI,  Inc.,  and AEI Accredited  Investor  Fund  2002 Limited   Partnership  ("Fund  2002"),  whose  corporate  general partner is AEI Fund Management XVIII, Inc., whose address is 1300 Wells  Fargo  Place, 30 East Seventh Street, St. Paul,  Minnesota 55101  ("Lessor"), and Tia's Florida, LLC, whose address  is  c/o Tia's  Restaurants, Inc., 1125 N. Union Bower, Suite 150, Irving, Texas 75061, Attention: Scott Gordon, President.                            WITNESSETH:       WHEREAS, Lessor is the fee owner of a certain parcel of real property  and building and improvements (the "Building")  located at  144  Brandon  Town  Center,  Brandon,  Florida,  and  legally described   in  Exhibit  "A",  which  is  attached   hereto   and incorporated herein by referenc



Aei Income & Growth Fund 25 Llc –
Contract
(December 24th, 2003)
PURCHASE AGREEMENT                   KONA RESTAURANT GROUP, INC.                     Lake Charles, Louisiana    This  Purchase Agreement (the "Agreement") entered into  and effective  as  of  the  9th day of December,  2003,  by  and between  Kona Restaurant Group, Inc. (the "Seller") and  AEI Income  &  Growth  Fund  25 LLC and AEI  Private  Net  Lease Millennium  Fund  Limited Partnership, or its  assigns  (the "Buyer").  1.    Property.  Seller holds an undivided 100% interest  in the   fee  title  to  that  certain  real  property  legally described  in  the  attached  Exhibit  "A"  (the  "Parcel"). Seller  wishes  to  sell and Buyer wishes  to  purchase  the Parcel  and  all improvements thereon upon which Seller  has developed a Johnny Carino's Country Italian restaurant  (the "Improvements")   on  the  Parcel  (the   Parcel   and   the Improvements collectively, the "Property").  2.    Lease.   The  Property is being sold  subject  to  the execution of a Lease on the Property by













×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.










Contract and Agreement Category List











































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog







Sample Contract Categories 

a

b

c

d

e

f

g

h

i

j

k

l

m

n

o

p

q

r

s

t

u

v

w

x

y

z


abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz


337k
		Delaware
	

277k
		New York
	

113k
		California
	

70k
		Texas
	

68k
		Agreement
	

62k
		Nevada
	

46k
		Florida
	

44k
		Maryland
	

40k
		Illinois
	

38k
		Employment Agreement
	

38k
		Washington
	

37k
		Amended And Restated
	

36k
		Massachusetts
	

34k
		New Jersey
	

33k
		Pennsylvania
	

28k
		Georgia
	

28k
		Colorado
	

26k
		Ohio
	

25k
		Minnesota
	

25k
		Virginia
	

21k
		North Carolina
	

20k
		Incentive Plan
	

19k
		Credit Agreement
	

19k
		Amendment
	

16k
		Connecticut
	

16k
		Michigan
	

15k
		Indiana
	

14k
		Registration Rights Agreement
	

14k
		Recitals
	

13k
		Tennessee
	

13k
		Arizona
	

13k
		Missouri
	

12k
		Purchase Agreement
	

12k
		Promissory Note
	

12k
		Indenture
	

11k
		Warrant
	

11k
		Louisiana
	

11k
		Kansas
	

11k
		Utah
	

11k
		Wisconsin
	

10k
		Oklahoma
	

9k
		Securities Purchase Agreement
	

9k
		Agreement And Plan Of Merger
	

8k
		Iowa
	

8k
		Supplemental Indenture
	

8k
		Note
	

8k
		Equity Incentive Plan
	

7k
		Kentucky
	

7k
		Stock Purchase Agreement
	

7k
		Alabama
	














×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.











Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Growth & Income Fund (PRGIX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Growth & Income Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				PRGIX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/21/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$28.36
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.03
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/21/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								13.39%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$25.13
							
							-
							
								$30.47
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$1,793.18

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 05/31/2017



Overall





3 Year





5 Year





10 Year







				Morningstar rated the Growth & Income Fund among 
1222,
1222,
1081
and 
798
Large Blend
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 05/31/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks long-term capital growth and current income primarily through investments in stocks.
		
Average Annual Total Returns 2



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					15.40%
				
			

				
					15.40%
				
			


3 Years

				
					10.01%
				
			

				
					10.01%
				
			


5 Years

				
					14.63%
				
			

				
					14.63%
				
			


10 Years

				
					7.12%
				
			

				
					7.12%
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 9.94%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							9.94%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							December 21, 1982
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.67%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.67%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						N/A
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
						N/A
					
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   								
			



2
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Sun Jul 23 04:28:55 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				









Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services | T. Rowe Price





















 










>
	




Home
Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services












Introducing T. Rowe Price® 
ActivePlus Portfolios.
Save time with a diversified portfolio-powered by our experts.



		                    Get Started
		                    
		                












My Account   





Remember User Name

Log In

Log In



Forgot user name


Register for online access 




Open an Account






















Mutual Funds









We offer over 120 no-load mutual funds to address your specific investing needs.











                        See All Mutual Funds
                    

















Rollover IRAs









Changing jobs or planning for retirement? Our specialists make rolling over your 401(k) account easy.











                        Learn More
                    

















IRA









Plan for retirement with the help of a Roth IRA or Traditional IRA.











                        Learn More
                    

















            
                
                    
                    See all Products and Services
                    
                         


















Find low-cost mutual funds to help you achieve your financial goals.












Search Mutual Funds
























129







No-Load Mutual Funds
Providing a broad set of opportunities



















Historical Performance





Daily Prices





Download a Prospectus
















Mutual Fund Categories





We offer a full range of investment strategies across multiple asset classes, capitalizations, sectors, and styles.







Fund Type
Number Available
Stock Funds
54
Asset Allocation Funds
34
Money Market Funds
8
Target Date Funds
26
Bond Funds
36






















            
                
                    
                    See all Mutual Funds
                    
                         


















Over 80% of our mutual funds beat their 10-year Lipper average as of 3/31/17*











            
                
                    
                    Learn More
                    
                         















T. Rowe Price Insights®





Access our latest investment thinking, information on retirement planning, and perspectives on the markets.







Asset Allocation





An Inside Look at T. Rowe Price® ActivePlus Portfolios

July 13, 2017









Retirement Planning





6 Key Ingredients for Retirement Planning

July 10, 2017









Markets & Economy





Quarterly Market Review

June 30, 2017













            
                
                    
                    See all Articles
                    
                         




















Ready to Get Started?







                        Open an Account
                    










Or Call 1-888-285-2612





















View firm's background on FINRA's BrokerCheck
T. Rowe Price mutual funds are subject to ongoing management fees and may be subject to redemption fees. An IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when an IRA is closed. See prospectus for details.

The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
*144 of our 330 mutual funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes and excludes funds used in insurance products). 122 of these 144 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 204 of 311 (66%), 175 of 213, 140 of 178 (79%), of T. Rowe Price funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
24 of our 39 Retirement Funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes). 23 of these 24 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 38 of 39, 35 of 36, and 35 of 36 of the Retirement Funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
Source: Lipper Inc. 168 of 213 funds (excluding institutional and bank institutional funds as defined by Lipper) more than 6 months old had expense ratios below their Lipper averages based on fiscal year-end data available as of 3/31/17.
The principal value of the Retirement Funds is not guaranteed at any time, including at or after the target date, which is the approximate year an investor plans to retire (assumed to be age 65) and likely stop making new investments in the fund. If an investor plans to retire significantly earlier or later than age 65, the funds may not be an appropriate investment even if the investor is retiring on or near the target date. The funds’ allocations among a broad range of underlying T. Rowe Price stock and bond funds will change over time. The funds emphasize potential capital appreciation during the early phases of retirement asset accumulation, balance the need for appreciation with the need for income as retirement approaches, and focus on supporting an income stream over a long-term postretirement withdrawal horizon. The funds are not designed for a lump-sum redemption at the target date and do not guarantee a particular level of income. The funds maintain a substantial allocation to equities both prior to and after the target date, which can result in greater volatility over shorter time horizons.















x


You are using an unsupported browser version that might prevent you from accessing certain features on our site.
 
We suggest clicking an icon below to download a supported browser version.
 
 

Google Chrome
Mozilla Firefox
Internet Explorer
Safari















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now




































Mutual Fund Research Tool - T. Rowe Price















































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	


















Log Out
Log In

Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers













 
 


























Home
      / Mutual Funds


Print
Email
Text size




Mutual Fund Research Tool


Find T. Rowe Price mutual funds that match your investment goals.

Filter funds by category, objective, or Morningstar rating. Select the appropriate box on the far left-hand side of the tool.


Sort by rolling over a mutual fund and using the arrows to find key information.


Compare key information such as performance and asset allocation by rolling over individual funds and clicking the "Add to Compare" box. Once you choose your funds, click "Compare Now" button for results.



 


For detailed information about each fund, including its risks, click on the mutual fund name. For standardized total returns as of the most recent calendar quarter end, click on the Performance link within the chart below.



Call an Investment Specialist at 800-365-7530.











Show All Mutual Funds
	There  that match: 


		For investors who plan to retire close to a certain year, these "all in one" funds 
		adjust the mix of stocks and bonds throughout the investor's retirement horizon.
	

		Offer long-term growth potential by investing primarily in stocks of U.S. companies—ranging 
		from broadly diversified to sector-specific.
	

		For investors interested in regular income, these funds invest in corporate- and/or government-issued bonds. 
	

		Offer income free of federal and sometimes state and local taxes by investing in bonds 
		issued by municipalities.
	

		Pursue opportunities in many of today's fastest-growing foreign markets—ranging from 
		globally diversified to region- or country-specific.
	

		Offer diversification and income by investing in bonds issued outside the U.S.
	

		Stress capital preservation and may provide some income—best suited for money 
		designated for short-term goals. 
	

		Convenient, one-step mutual funds that combine stocks and bonds to provide a broadly 
		diversified investment. 
	

		Stresses capital preservation and are best suited for investors who may need to use 
		their savings within a couple years or to fund an emergency reserve.
	

		Designed to generate income and may be particularly beneficial for investors looking 
		to supplement their retirement income. 
	

		Designed specifically for retirement goals. Just choose the fund with the year closest
		to when you expect to retire. 
	

		Provide long-term capital growth potential while seeking to reduce the long-term tax burden.
	

		Provide current income that is free from federal and possibly state and local taxes. Best 
		suited for investors in higher tax brackets.
	

		Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, uses a five-star value system to 
		rate mutual funds in a category. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating.
	

		Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, uses a five-star value system to
		rate mutual funds in a category. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating.
	

		Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, uses a five-star value system to 
		rate mutual funds in a category. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating.
	

		Independent analysts at Morningstar provide their mutual fund picks on a category-by-category basis.
	

		Long-tenured, well-established mutual funds that investors have chosen for over 15 years.
	

		Funds that charge redemption fees.
	

		Funds that are open to new investors.
	




Category

Target Date Funds
 Domestic Stock Funds
 Domestic Bond Funds
 Tax-Free Bond Funds*
 International &Global Stock Funds
 International &Global Bond Funds
 Money Market Funds1,2
 Asset Allocation Funds

Objective

 Tax-Efficient
 Tax-Exempt*

Ranking
Morningstar Rating:

4 & 5 Star Fundsε
 3 Star Fundsε
 1 & 2 Star Fundsε

Fund Attributes

 Open To New Investors
Redemption Fees

Share Class

Investor Class
I Class







Performance
Ratings + Rankings
Management + Objective
Prices + Yields












1 Retail Funds: You could lose money by investing in the Fund. Although the Fund seeks to preserve the value of your investment at $1.00 per share, it cannot guarantee it will do so. Beginning October 14, 2016, the Fund may impose a fee upon the sale of your shares or may temporarily suspend your ability to sell shares if the Fund's liquidity falls below required minimums because of market conditions or other factors. An investment in the Fund is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. The Fund's sponsor has no legal obligation to provide financial support to the Fund, and you should not expect that the sponsor will provide financial support to the Fund at any time.

2 Government Funds: You could lose money by investing in the Fund. Although the Fund seeks to preserve the value of your investment at $1.00 per share, it cannot guarantee it will do so. An investment in the Fund is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. The Fund's sponsor has no legal obligation to provide financial support to the Fund, and you should not expect that the sponsor will provide financial support to the Fund at any time.


^ The T. Rowe Price Funds-I Class share the portfolio of an existing fund 
(the original share class of the fund is referred to as the "investor class"). 
The total return figures for I Class shares have been calculated using the performance 
data of the investor class up to the inception date of the I Class (shown in the 
performance sub-tab when the fund is hovered over) and the actual performance 
results of the I Class since that date. Because the I Classes are expected to have 
lower expenses than the Investor Classes, the I Class performance, had it existed 
over the periods shown, would have been higher. 
					

						The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
					
* Some income is subject to state and local taxes and the federal alternative minimum tax.


















		Please wait while we load your data.
	





Fund Comparison







 
 


 





















Our Mission Is Simple.
					  Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
					


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement





Feedback

Mobile Solutions
Contact Us








The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

				©Sun Jul 23 18:10:48 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
				All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
			



 
 









 









































Mutual Funds | American Funds

























       American Funds 
      ®

 


   
 OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠



Capital Group sites








Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other









More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets



American Funds sites







 
INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



 American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


 
 Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide  (corporate site) 
Private Markets 







 



  Welcome to American Funds 
Contact Us
Preferences
  Log In LOG OUT 




American Funds Investors






 User Name or Account Number  
  Remember Me 
  
 Log in for the first time 




 Login Help 

 


 Login Help 


New user? 
Forgot password?
More help
 

 






















Forms


Search










 






    MY ACCOUNTS 





                 MY ACCOUNTS 
                See All

Close x











ACCOUNT INFORMATION




 View Portfolio 
 Portfolio Value History 
 Statements & Tax Forms 
 









FORMS


in Service & Support




 Account Updates 
 Retirement Savings Accounts 
 College Savings Accounts 
 Beneficiary Designations 
 









 
    INVESTMENTS 





                 INVESTMENTS 
                See All

Close x










MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH




 Daily Prices & Yields 
 Returns 
 Compare Funds 
 Prospectuses & Annual Reports 
 









MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES




 Historical Prices 
 Historical Distributions 
 Share Class Information 
 Symbols & Fund Numbers 
 









OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products




 Insurance Series 
 
















  









 
    INSIGHTS 





                 INSIGHTS 
                See All

Close x










CATEGORIES




 Investment Insights 
 Market Commentary 
 









TOPICS




 The Capital Advantage 
 Currencies 
 Developed World 
 Dividends & Income 
 Emerging Markets 
 Global 
 









 




 Innovation 
 International 
 Macroeconomic Outlook 
 Taxable Bonds 
 United States 
 









FEATURED










  2017 Outlook  





  








READ













  The Capital Advantage℠  





  








READ














 
    PRODUCTS 





                 PRODUCTS 
                See All

Close x










INVESTMENT OPTIONS




 Mutual Funds 
 Insurance Series





 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series



 
 









COLLEGE SAVINGS




 CollegeAmerica 529 Plans 
 Coverdell Education Savings Plans 
 UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts 
 









INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT




 Traditional/Roth IRAs 
 









EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS




 401(k) Plans 
 403(b) Plans 
 SIMPLE IRAs 
 SEP Plans 
 Payroll Deduction IRAs 
 
















  









 
    PLANNING 





                 PLANNING 
                See All

Close x










TOPICS




 Investing Fundamentals 
 Mutual Fund Basics 
 Creating a Financial Plan 
 Retirement Planning 
 College Savings 
 Market Fluctuations 
 









TOOLS




 Retirement Planning Calculator 
 Retirement Roadmap 
 College Savings Calculator 
 Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer 
 









 




 Spend It or Save It Calculator 
 Investment Calculator 
 Payroll Deduction Analyzer 
 Taxes and Inflation Calculator 
 









FEATURED














We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
    SERVICE & SUPPORT 





                 SERVICE & SUPPORT 
                See All

Close x










HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT




 Buying Shares 
 Selling Shares 
 Managing Your Account 
 Changing Your Preferences 
 



MORE








FORMS




 Account Updates 
 Retirement Savings Accounts 
 College Savings Accounts 
 Beneficiary Designations 
 









OTHER RESOURCES




 Tax Center 
 Contact Us 
 Search for an Advisor 
 



MORE








 
     
















Forms







  
 MY ACCOUNTS 
 INVESTMENTS 
 INSIGHTS 
 PRODUCTS 
 PLANNING 
 SERVICE & SUPPORT 
  





























Mutual Funds










Our managed equity and fixed-income mutual funds are designed with a long-term focus. 










Mutual Funds
 

Since 1931, we’ve helped investors pursue long-term investment success.
We offer investment options to help investors meet their financial needs.
Our investment process combines individual accountability with teamwork. 


Learn about The Capital Advantage℠. 
            


















  








Investment Spectrum
Our funds offer a spectrum of investment objectives, levels of volatility and asset types.
Note: The mutual funds in American Funds Portfolio SeriesSM, American Funds Retirement Income Portfolio SeriesSM and American Funds College Target Date Series® are not included in this chart.









Growth


Seeks to increase capital long term through growth-oriented companies.
 
 









EuroPacific Growth Fund®
The New Economy Fund®
New Perspective Fund®
AMCAP Fund®
The Growth Fund of America®
SMALLCAP World Fund®
New World Fund® 














Growth-and-Income




Seeks growth of capital and current income through dividend payers.  

 
 




Capital World Growth and Income Fund®
International Growth and Income Fund℠
American Mutual Fund®
Fundamental Investors®
The Investment Company of America®
Washington Mutual Investors Fund℠ 
American Funds Developing World Growth and Income Fund℠







Equity-Income


Seeks income and growth through a mix of dividend-paying stocks and bonds.
 
 





Capital Income Builder®
The Income Fund of America®





Balanced



Seeks long-term growth of capital, conservation of principal and current income through a mix of securities.                              



American Funds Global Balanced Fund℠ 
American Balanced Fund®









Taxable Bond


Seeks current income through various fixed-income securities.  

 
 





American High-Income Trust® 
American Funds Corporate Bond Fund℠
American Funds Emerging Markets Bond Fund℠
American Funds Inflation Linked Bond Fund℠
American Funds Strategic Bond Fund℠



Short-Term Bond Fund of America®
Intermediate Bond Fund of America®
U.S. Government Securities Fund®
American Funds Mortgage Fund®
The Bond Fund of America®
Capital World Bond Fund®





Tax-Exempt Bond


Seeks tax-exempt interest through municipal bonds.  
 
  




American High-Income Municipal Bond Fund®
American Funds Short-Term Tax-Exempt Bond Fund®
American Funds Tax-Exempt Fund of New York®
Limited Term Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America®
The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America®
The Tax-Exempt Fund of California®







Money Market


Seeks stability through highly liquid, short-term securities.  
 

 





American Funds U.S. Government Money Market Fund℠














Other Investment Options




 Portfolio Series 
 Target Date Retirement Series 
 College Target Date Series 
 










Other Resources




 Share Classes & Expenses 
 Compare Funds  
 Investment Calculator 
 


















  























Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing. 













































Closex
 















































































































American Funds®






Home



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets












Welcome to American Funds

Contact Us
Preferences


Log In
LOG OUT





American Funds Investors







User Name or Account Number




Remember Me





Log in for the first time






Login Help







Login Help



New user?

Forgot password?
 
More help
 





























Forms


Search




















 
MY ACCOUNTS






										MY ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x









ACCOUNT INFORMATION





View Portfolio


Portfolio Value History


Statements & Tax Forms











FORMS


in Service & Support





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Prospectuses & Annual Reports











MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Symbols & Fund Numbers











OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products





Insurance Series

































 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global










 





Innovation


International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Taxable Bonds


United States










FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















READ















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















READ
















 
PRODUCTS






										PRODUCTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







INVESTMENT OPTIONS





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series



 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series













COLLEGE SAVINGS





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts










INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT





Traditional/Roth IRAs










EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS





401(k) Plans


403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs































 
PLANNING






										PLANNING
									
										
										See All

Close x







TOPICS





Investing Fundamentals


Mutual Fund Basics


Creating a Financial Plan


Retirement Planning


College Savings


Market Fluctuations










TOOLS





Retirement Planning Calculator


Retirement Roadmap


College Savings Calculator


Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer










 





Spend It or Save It Calculator


Investment Calculator


Payroll Deduction Analyzer


Taxes and Inflation Calculator










FEATURED












We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
SERVICE & SUPPORT






										SERVICE & SUPPORT
									
										
										See All

Close x







HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT





Buying Shares


Selling Shares


Managing Your Account


Changing Your Preferences






MORE






FORMS





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations










OTHER RESOURCES





Tax Center


Contact Us


Search for an Advisor






MORE










 


















Forms











MY ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


INSIGHTS


PRODUCTS


PLANNING


SERVICE & SUPPORT




































Investments


/ The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia                                                ®


















TAX-EXEMPT BOND FUNDS



The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia

				®  (TFVAX)

VIEW A DIFFERENT FUND 












Share Class
 


A
C
F-1
F-2





 
                                PRINT
                            












SUMMARY
RETURNS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
RESOURCES

























Closed Fund: The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia Fund Class A was closed on June 17, 2016, and its assets were merged into The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America. Visit  The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America Fund Class A page for fund information.
        









High & Low Prices
		            







For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for TFVAX through --.
            

 TFVAX




 







Description




						Fund Objective
					

The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income exempt from regular federal and Virginia state income taxes. Its secondary objective is preservation of capital.					










Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							08/14/1986



 


						CUSIP
						
					
							02630C 20 6

						Fund Number
						
					
							25












        Returns
        



	

LEARN ABOUT THE SYSTEM BEHIND OUR RESULTS















Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2016
			

















2007-2016
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS









2016








CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




01/29/16
02/01/16
$0.040286
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


02/29/16
03/01/16
$0.0390877
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.93


03/31/16
04/01/16
$0.0405419
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


04/29/16
05/02/16
$0.0407637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.01


05/31/16
06/01/16
$0.0409211
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.00


06/15/16
06/16/16
$0.0215362
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.11






2016 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.22313652


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.22313652




				 as of 6/17/16
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date










 













						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016




















Resources






            About Our Funds
        













Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Some of the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
		



This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested














Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .
















Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Thursday, August 14, 1986) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1986), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index
Lipper Virginia Municipal Debt Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns with sales charge for Class A shares reflect payment of the -32768.00% maximum sales charge.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Barclays Municipal Virginia Index did not exist prior to June 30, 1993. Therefore, results are measured from June 30, 1993, and are based on the corresponding value of the hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund on that date.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal: Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index is a market-value-weighted index that includes only investment-grade tax-exempt bonds that are issued from Virginia.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income




				Standard Deviation as of  (updated monthly). Annualized return as of  (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for TFVAX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.



































































































































































American Funds®






Home



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets












Welcome to American Funds

Contact Us
Preferences


Log In
LOG OUT





American Funds Investors







User Name or Account Number




Remember Me





Log in for the first time






Login Help







Login Help



New user?

Forgot password?
 
More help
 





























Forms


Search




















 
MY ACCOUNTS






										MY ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x









ACCOUNT INFORMATION





View Portfolio


Portfolio Value History


Statements & Tax Forms











FORMS


in Service & Support





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Prospectuses & Annual Reports











MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Symbols & Fund Numbers











OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products





Insurance Series

































 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global










 





Innovation


International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Taxable Bonds


United States










FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















READ















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















READ
















 
PRODUCTS






										PRODUCTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







INVESTMENT OPTIONS





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series



 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series













COLLEGE SAVINGS





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts










INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT





Traditional/Roth IRAs










EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS





401(k) Plans


403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs































 
PLANNING






										PLANNING
									
										
										See All

Close x







TOPICS





Investing Fundamentals


Mutual Fund Basics


Creating a Financial Plan


Retirement Planning


College Savings


Market Fluctuations










TOOLS





Retirement Planning Calculator


Retirement Roadmap


College Savings Calculator


Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer










 





Spend It or Save It Calculator


Investment Calculator


Payroll Deduction Analyzer


Taxes and Inflation Calculator










FEATURED












We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
SERVICE & SUPPORT






										SERVICE & SUPPORT
									
										
										See All

Close x







HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT





Buying Shares


Selling Shares


Managing Your Account


Changing Your Preferences






MORE






FORMS





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations










OTHER RESOURCES





Tax Center


Contact Us


Search for an Advisor






MORE










 


















Forms











MY ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


INSIGHTS


PRODUCTS


PLANNING


SERVICE & SUPPORT




































Investments


/ The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia                                                ®


















TAX-EXEMPT BOND FUNDS



The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia

				®  (TFVAX)

VIEW A DIFFERENT FUND 












Share Class
 


A
C
F-1
F-2





 
                                PRINT
                            












SUMMARY
RETURNS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
RESOURCES

























Closed Fund: The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia Fund Class A was closed on June 17, 2016, and its assets were merged into The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America. Visit  The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America Fund Class A page for fund information.
        









High & Low Prices
		            







For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for TFVAX through --.
            

 TFVAX




 







Description




						Fund Objective
					

The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income exempt from regular federal and Virginia state income taxes. Its secondary objective is preservation of capital.					










Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							08/14/1986



 


						CUSIP
						
					
							02630C 20 6

						Fund Number
						
					
							25












        Returns
        



	

LEARN ABOUT THE SYSTEM BEHIND OUR RESULTS















Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2016
			

















2007-2016
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS









2016








CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




01/29/16
02/01/16
$0.040286
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


02/29/16
03/01/16
$0.0390877
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.93


03/31/16
04/01/16
$0.0405419
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


04/29/16
05/02/16
$0.0407637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.01


05/31/16
06/01/16
$0.0409211
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.00


06/15/16
06/16/16
$0.0215362
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.11






2016 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.22313652


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.22313652




				 as of 6/17/16
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date










 













						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016




















Resources






            About Our Funds
        













Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Some of the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
		



This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested














Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .
















Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Thursday, August 14, 1986) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1986), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index
Lipper Virginia Municipal Debt Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns with sales charge for Class A shares reflect payment of the -32768.00% maximum sales charge.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Barclays Municipal Virginia Index did not exist prior to June 30, 1993. Therefore, results are measured from June 30, 1993, and are based on the corresponding value of the hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund on that date.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal: Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index is a market-value-weighted index that includes only investment-grade tax-exempt bonds that are issued from Virginia.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income




				Standard Deviation as of  (updated monthly). Annualized return as of  (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for TFVAX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.



































































































































































American Funds®






Home



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets












Welcome to American Funds

Contact Us
Preferences


Log In
LOG OUT





American Funds Investors







User Name or Account Number




Remember Me





Log in for the first time






Login Help







Login Help



New user?

Forgot password?
 
More help
 





























Forms


Search




















 
MY ACCOUNTS






										MY ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x









ACCOUNT INFORMATION





View Portfolio


Portfolio Value History


Statements & Tax Forms











FORMS


in Service & Support





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Prospectuses & Annual Reports











MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Symbols & Fund Numbers











OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products





Insurance Series

































 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global










 





Innovation


International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Taxable Bonds


United States










FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















READ















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















READ
















 
PRODUCTS






										PRODUCTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







INVESTMENT OPTIONS





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series



 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series













COLLEGE SAVINGS





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts










INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT





Traditional/Roth IRAs










EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS





401(k) Plans


403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs































 
PLANNING






										PLANNING
									
										
										See All

Close x







TOPICS





Investing Fundamentals


Mutual Fund Basics


Creating a Financial Plan


Retirement Planning


College Savings


Market Fluctuations










TOOLS





Retirement Planning Calculator


Retirement Roadmap


College Savings Calculator


Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer










 





Spend It or Save It Calculator


Investment Calculator


Payroll Deduction Analyzer


Taxes and Inflation Calculator










FEATURED












We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
SERVICE & SUPPORT






										SERVICE & SUPPORT
									
										
										See All

Close x







HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT





Buying Shares


Selling Shares


Managing Your Account


Changing Your Preferences






MORE






FORMS





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations










OTHER RESOURCES





Tax Center


Contact Us


Search for an Advisor






MORE










 


















Forms











MY ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


INSIGHTS


PRODUCTS


PLANNING


SERVICE & SUPPORT




































Investments


/ The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia                                                ®


















TAX-EXEMPT BOND FUNDS



The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia

				®  (TFVAX)

VIEW A DIFFERENT FUND 












Share Class
 


A
C
F-1
F-2





 
                                PRINT
                            












SUMMARY
RETURNS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
RESOURCES

























Closed Fund: The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia Fund Class A was closed on June 17, 2016, and its assets were merged into The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America. Visit  The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America Fund Class A page for fund information.
        









High & Low Prices
		            







For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for TFVAX through --.
            

 TFVAX




 







Description




						Fund Objective
					

The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income exempt from regular federal and Virginia state income taxes. Its secondary objective is preservation of capital.					










Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							08/14/1986



 


						CUSIP
						
					
							02630C 20 6

						Fund Number
						
					
							25












        Returns
        



	

LEARN ABOUT THE SYSTEM BEHIND OUR RESULTS















Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2016
			

















2007-2016
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS









2016








CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




01/29/16
02/01/16
$0.040286
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


02/29/16
03/01/16
$0.0390877
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.93


03/31/16
04/01/16
$0.0405419
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


04/29/16
05/02/16
$0.0407637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.01


05/31/16
06/01/16
$0.0409211
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.00


06/15/16
06/16/16
$0.0215362
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.11






2016 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.22313652


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.22313652




				 as of 6/17/16
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date










 













						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016




















Resources






            About Our Funds
        













Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Some of the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
		



This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested














Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .
















Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Thursday, August 14, 1986) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1986), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index
Lipper Virginia Municipal Debt Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns with sales charge for Class A shares reflect payment of the -32768.00% maximum sales charge.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Barclays Municipal Virginia Index did not exist prior to June 30, 1993. Therefore, results are measured from June 30, 1993, and are based on the corresponding value of the hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund on that date.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal: Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index is a market-value-weighted index that includes only investment-grade tax-exempt bonds that are issued from Virginia.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income




				Standard Deviation as of  (updated monthly). Annualized return as of  (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for TFVAX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.



































































































































































American Funds®






Home



OTHER SITES











Close x









Institutions & Consultants


Private Client Services







Individual Investors


Financial Advisors





Employers & Plan Sponsors


Third-Party Administrators




More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠


Capital Group sites







Close x









Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Canada
United States




Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other






More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Private Markets


American Funds sites





INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS



American Funds


Individual Investors
Financial Advisors
Employers & Plan Sponsors
Third-Party Administrators
Institutions & Consultants
Private Client Services


More Capital Group Sites

Capital Group Worldwide (corporate site)
Capital Ideas℠





Capital Group





Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe




Back
Canada
United States




Back
Australia & New Zealand
Singapore
Hong Kong
Taiwan
Japan
Rest Of Asia




Back
Austria
Luxembourg
Belgium
Netherlands
Denmark
Norway
Finland
Portugal
France
Spain
Germany
Sweden
Iceland
Switzerland
Ireland
United Kingdom
Italy
Other



More Capital Group Sites
Capital Group Worldwide
 (corporate site)

Private Markets












Welcome to American Funds

Contact Us
Preferences


Log In
LOG OUT





American Funds Investors







User Name or Account Number




Remember Me





Log in for the first time






Login Help







Login Help



New user?

Forgot password?
 
More help
 





























Forms


Search




















 
MY ACCOUNTS






										MY ACCOUNTS
									
										
										See All

Close x









ACCOUNT INFORMATION





View Portfolio


Portfolio Value History


Statements & Tax Forms











FORMS


in Service & Support





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations














 
INVESTMENTS






										INVESTMENTS
									
										
										See All

Close x








MUTUAL FUND RESEARCH





Daily Prices & Yields


Returns


Compare Funds


Prospectuses & Annual Reports











MUTUAL FUND RESOURCES





Historical Prices


Historical Distributions


Share Class Information


Symbols & Fund Numbers











OTHER INVESTMENTS


in Products





Insurance Series

































 
INSIGHTS






										INSIGHTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







CATEGORIES





Investment Insights


Market Commentary










TOPICS





The Capital Advantage


Currencies


Developed World


Dividends & Income


Emerging Markets


Global










 





Innovation


International


Macroeconomic Outlook


Taxable Bonds


United States










FEATURED












								2017 Outlook
								 

















READ















								The Capital Advantage℠
								 

















READ
















 
PRODUCTS






										PRODUCTS
									
										
										See All

Close x







INVESTMENT OPTIONS





Mutual Funds


Insurance Series



 Funds of FUnds 
Portfolio Series
Retirement Income Portfolio Series
Target Date Retirement Series

College Target Date Series













COLLEGE SAVINGS





CollegeAmerica 529 Plans


Coverdell Education Savings Plans


UGMA/UTMA Custodial Accounts










INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT





Traditional/Roth IRAs










EMPLOYER-SPONSORED RETIREMENT PLANS





401(k) Plans


403(b) Plans


SIMPLE IRAs


SEP Plans


Payroll Deduction IRAs































 
PLANNING






										PLANNING
									
										
										See All

Close x







TOPICS





Investing Fundamentals


Mutual Fund Basics


Creating a Financial Plan


Retirement Planning


College Savings


Market Fluctuations










TOOLS





Retirement Planning Calculator


Retirement Roadmap


College Savings Calculator


Traditional vs. Roth 401(k)/403(b) Analyzer










 





Spend It or Save It Calculator


Investment Calculator


Payroll Deduction Analyzer


Taxes and Inflation Calculator










FEATURED












We Believe in the Value of Advice
Discover how working with a financial professional could help improve your investment outcomes.












 
SERVICE & SUPPORT






										SERVICE & SUPPORT
									
										
										See All

Close x







HOW TO USE YOUR ACCOUNT





Buying Shares


Selling Shares


Managing Your Account


Changing Your Preferences






MORE






FORMS





Account Updates


Retirement Savings Accounts


College Savings Accounts


Beneficiary Designations










OTHER RESOURCES





Tax Center


Contact Us


Search for an Advisor






MORE










 


















Forms











MY ACCOUNTS


INVESTMENTS


INSIGHTS


PRODUCTS


PLANNING


SERVICE & SUPPORT




































Investments


/ The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia                                                ®


















TAX-EXEMPT BOND FUNDS



The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia

				®  (TFVAX)

VIEW A DIFFERENT FUND 












Share Class
 


A
C
F-1
F-2





 
                                PRINT
                            












SUMMARY
RETURNS
PRICES & DISTRIBUTIONS
RESOURCES

























Closed Fund: The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia Fund Class A was closed on June 17, 2016, and its assets were merged into The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America. Visit  The Tax-Exempt Bond Fund of America Fund Class A page for fund information.
        









High & Low Prices
		            







For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the high and low prices at NAV for TFVAX through --.
            

 TFVAX




 







Description




						Fund Objective
					

The fund's primary investment objective is to provide a high level of current income exempt from regular federal and Virginia state income taxes. Its secondary objective is preservation of capital.					










Fund Facts


 


						Fund Inception
						
					
							08/14/1986



 


						CUSIP
						
					
							02630C 20 6

						Fund Number
						
					
							25












        Returns
        



	

LEARN ABOUT THE SYSTEM BEHIND OUR RESULTS















Prices & Distributions








Historical Prices Month-End


Historical Prices Year-End




FIND HISTORICAL PRICES










			  2016
			

















2007-2016
























Historical Distributions






FIND HISTORICAL DISTRIBUTIONS









2016








CalculatedDate
Pay Date
Income DividendRegular
Income DividendSpecial
Cap. GainsLong-Term
Cap. GainsShort-Term
Reinvest NAV




01/29/16
02/01/16
$0.040286
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


02/29/16
03/01/16
$0.0390877
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.93


03/31/16
04/01/16
$0.0405419
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$16.95


04/29/16
05/02/16
$0.0407637
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.01


05/31/16
06/01/16
$0.0409211
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.00


06/15/16
06/16/16
$0.0215362
$0.00
$0.00
$0.00
$17.11






2016 Year-to-Date:


Dividends Subtotal: $0.22313652


Cap Gains Subtotal: $0.00


Total Distributions: $0.22313652




				 as of 6/17/16
		






						Daily Dividend Accrual
						
						for Pay Date 

Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016


















Record Date
Calculated Date
Payment Date










 













						Current Daily
						
						Dividend Accrual
					
Close 






Rate
As-of-Date




0.00000000
06/16/2016


0.00000000
06/17/2016




















Resources






            About Our Funds
        













Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.



Excludes certain securities in initial period of acquisition.
Includes short-term securities, accrued income and other assets less liabilities.
Prior to September 30, 2016, securities in the Real Estate sector were reported under the Financials sector.
Figures include convertible securities; totals may not reconcile due to rounding. Methodology notes: The equity breakdown by revenue reflects the fund’s publicly traded equity holdings and excludes cash (and fixed income securities, if applicable). Underlying revenue data were compiled by MSCI and account for disparities in the way companies report their revenues across geographic segments. MSCI breaks out each company’s reported revenues into country-by-country estimates. MSCI provides revenue data figures based on a proprietary, standardized model. Revenue exposure at the fund and index level was calculated by using FactSet, which takes these company revenue exposures and multiplies by the company’s weighting in the portfolio and index. In this breakdown, Israel has been included in Europe.
Calculated by American Funds. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by Morningstar.
Calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.
The months indicated for dividends and capital gains paid represent the anticipated current year ex-dividend date schedule for all share classes.
Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
Read more information about Morningstar Style Box methodology. The model for the fixed-income style box is based on the two pillars of fixed-income performance: interest-rate sensitivity and credit quality. The three interest sensitivity groups are limited, moderate and extensive and the three credit quality groups are high, medium and low. These groupings display a portfolio's effective duration and third party credit ratings to provide an overall representation of the fund's risk orientation given the sensitivity to interest rate and credit rating of bonds in the portfolio.



©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Some of the information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar, its content providers nor the American Funds are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Information is calculated by Morningstar. Due to differing calculation methods, the figures shown here may differ from those calculated by American Funds.





Terms and Definitions


Beta: Beta relatively measures a fund's sensitivity to market movements over a specified period of time. The beta of the market (represented by the benchmark index) is equal to 1; a beta higher than 1 implies that a fund's return was more volatile than the market. A beta lower than 1 suggests that the fund was less volatile than the market. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. 
Bond Statistic  Average Coupon: The average coupon is the weighted average coupon rate of all the bonds in the fund.
Bond Statistic  Average Duration in Years: Expressed in years, average duration is a weighted average of the estimated price sensitivity of the bonds in the fund's portfolio to a given change in interest rates. With respect to individual bonds, for example, a duration of 4 years indicates that the price of a bond will rise/fall by approximately 4% if rates in general fall/rise by 1%. Typically, bonds with a longer duration pay higher interest but are more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Bond Statistic  Average Life in Years: Expressed in years, average life is time weighting the expected principal payments, taking into consideration the impact of calls and prepayments. In general, it is a better measure than average maturity for bonds that have the ability to prepay principal before they reach maturity (e.g., mortgages, mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed securities). Data shown is a weighted average of the bond funds held in the fund's portfolio.
Bond Statistic  Average Yield to Maturity: A weighted average of all the fund's bond holding's yield to maturities. Yield to maturity is the return a bond earns if held to maturity, based on its price and coupon. Assumes that coupon payments can be reinvested at the yield to maturity.
Capture Ratio  Downside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Capture Ratio  Upside: Capture ratios reflect the annualized product of fund vs. index returns for all months in which the index had a positive return (upside capture) or negative return (downside capture).
Distribution rate  12-month: The income per share paid by the fund over the past 12 months to an investor from dividends (including any special dividends). The distribution rate is expressed as a percentage of the current price.
Historical  Long-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate. The information above classifies gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset held for more than one year as a long-term capital gain.
Historical  Regular Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
Historical  Short-Term Capital Gains: When a capital gain distribution is paid, the net asset value per share is reduced by the amount of the payment plus or minus any change in the value of the fund's holdings. Read our explanation of the effect of a capital gain on a fund's price for details. Two types of capital gains are realized by our funds — short-term and long-term. Net short-term capital gains are distributed to shareholders as income dividends and are taxed at ordinary income tax rates. Long-term capital gain distributions are taxed at a maximum 15% rate.
Historical  Special Dividend: The share prices of all of our equity funds decrease when a dividend is paid. The share price of only one of our fixed-income funds, Capital World Bond Fund, also decreases when a dividend is paid. A fund pays a special dividend when the investment income generated by the fund exceeds the income the fund has paid in the form of dividends throughout the year. Special dividends are distributed with the last dividend payment at the end of the calendar year. Prior to January 1, 2003, short-term capital gains distributed to shareholders as income dividends and special dividends paid to shareholders were included in the aggregate income dividend dollar amount.
R-Squared: R-squared is a measure of the correlation between a particular fund's return and that of its benchmark index. A measure of 100 indicates that all of the fund's return can be explained by movements in its benchmark. Generally the higher the R-squared measure, the more reliable the beta measurement will be. Calculated by Morningstar.
Standard Deviation: Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Calculated by Morningstar.

















×

Growth of $10K
 | 
			  				Annual Returns
 |
			  			  Volatility & Returns







Growth of a hypothetical $10,000 investment
		



This chart tracks a Class A share investment over the last 20 years, or, since inception date if the fund has been in existence under 20 years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)


Dividends Taken in Cash
Dividend Reinvested














Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .
















Annual Returns
	



Read important investment disclosures

For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the total returns since the fund's inception date (Thursday, August 14, 1986) through December 31, 2016.  Fund returns and, if available, index returns are for calendar years except for the inception year (1986), which may not be a full calendar year. In cases where the index was launched after the fund inception, the index returns are shown in calender years.


 The Tax-Exempt Fund of Virginia (TFVAX)
 
Index 




Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index
Lipper Virginia Municipal Debt Funds Average
















Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods. Current and future results may be lower or higher than those shown. Share prices and returns will vary, so investors may lose money. Investing for short periods makes losses more likely. View fund expense ratios and returns.
Returns shown at net asset value (NAV) have all distributions reinvested. If a sales charge had been deducted, the results would have been lower.
Returns with sales charge for Class A shares reflect payment of the -32768.00% maximum sales charge.
Investments are not FDIC-insured, nor are they deposits of or guaranteed by a bank or any other entity, so they may lose value.
Investors should carefully consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. This and other important information is contained in the fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses, which can be obtained from a financial professional and should be read carefully before investing.
The return of principal for bond funds and for funds with significant underlying bond holdings is not guaranteed. Fund shares are subject to the same interest rate, inflation and credit risks associated with the underlying bond holdings. Lower rated bonds are subject to greater fluctuations in value and risk of loss of income and principal than higher rated bonds.
For more information about the risks associated with each fund, go to its detailed fund information page or read the prospectus.
State-specific tax-exempt funds are more susceptible to factors adversely affecting issuers of their states' tax-exempt securities than more widely diversified municipal bond funds. Income from municipal bonds may be subject to state or local income taxes and/or the federal alternative minimum tax. Certain other income, as well as capital gain distributions, may be taxable.
There may have been periods when the fund(s) lagged the index(es). Certain market indexes are unmanaged and, therefore, have no expenses. Investors cannot invest directly in an index.
Investment results assume all distributions are reinvested and reflect applicable fees and expenses.
When applicable, investment results reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements, without which results would have been lower. Read details about how waivers and/or reimbursements affect the results for each fund. View results and yields without fee waiver and/or expense reimbursement
  .



Barclays Municipal Virginia Index did not exist prior to June 30, 1993. Therefore, results are measured from June 30, 1993, and are based on the corresponding value of the hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund on that date.
YTD (year-to-date return): the net change in the value of the fund's shares (in percentage terms) from January 1, 2017, to the current date shown above.
For bond funds, the maximum initial sales charge was 4.75% prior to 1/10/2000.








Terms and Definitions


Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal: Bloomberg Barclays Virginia Municipal Index is a market-value-weighted index that includes only investment-grade tax-exempt bonds that are issued from Virginia.









Volatility & Returns



For Class A Shares, this chart tracks the 10-year standard deviation  and 10-year annualized return of the  fixed income funds.


Fixed-Income




				Standard Deviation as of  (updated monthly). Annualized return as of  (updated monthly). 
			

Volatility & Return chart is not available for funds less than 10 years old.



















×
Download Data for TFVAX




Some statistics may not be available for all fund (e.g., Top Equity Holdings for Bond funds). Data presented in Excel .xls format.


In the unlikely event that a correction is made for fund data you are downloading, a notification will be sent to the e-mail address specified below.


Downloaded data for advisor use only.






How is my email used?


DOWNLOAD
Cancel



×

Why we need your e-mail address: This is a precautionary measure we are taking to ensure that we can notify you in the unlikely event that a correction is needed for the data you are downloading.
We value your privacy: The e-mail address you provide will only be used for communications from American Funds. We will not sell or rent your e-mail address to any third-party entity.
Changing your e-mail address: To change the e-mail address for data change notifications, delete the existing e-mail address and retype the new address in the text box. (Your e-mail address may be pre-filled if you have previously provided American Funds with this information.)
Note: Updating your e-mail address on this page will not affect your primary email address.


















































































Global Income Builder NextShares (EVGBC) | Eaton Vance Funds
































































Use of cookies by Eaton Vance Management (International) LimitedWe use cookies to deliver our online services. Details and instructions on how to disable those cookies are set out here. By continuing to use this website you agree to our use of our cookies unless you have disabled them.accept cookies














Go to:


Eaton Vance U.S. Home

Eaton Vance U.S. HomeU.S Institutions HomeEaton Vance U.S. FundsU.S. Charitable HomeOffshore HomeGlobal Home













InvestorAccount Access 
Investment Professional Sign In











Global Income Builder NextShares  



EVGBC
Symbol



$22.31
$-0.01


Net Asset ValueJul 21, 2017



$22.31
$0.02


Closing PriceJul 21, 2017


N/A
Intraday Indicative Value†Market Closed


Bid: N/A
Ask: N/A
Quoted Prices‡Market Closed





Relateddocuments



 Fact SheetMar 31, 2017









The Fund
The Fund invests in common stocks, income instruments, preferred stocks and hybrid securities around the globe that the portfolio managers believe may provide attractive levels of income. For its investments in common stocks, the managers may also seek t o invest in securities they believe have the potential to grow income and/or provide capital appreciation over time.



The Approach
Fund managers employ a bottom-up, research driven process to identify what they believe are attractive global securities up and down the capital structure. Management endeavors to invest in income producing instruments, coupled with investments in common  stocks that may have the potential for growth of income and capital appreciation over time. Overall asset allocation decisions are made collectively by the portfolio managers.



The Features
The global, multi-asset class approach may provide diversification benefits as management seeks to uncover opportunities across an array of income producing securities and common stock. A flexible mandate with broad discretion (within the specified inves tment ranges) to allocate across investment instruments may help navigate the challenges that face traditional sources of income.







 

 OverviewWhat are NextShares?
For important information about NextShares, click here.




Historical Returns (%)as of  Jun 30, 2017









Annualized




1 Month
3 Months
YTD
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Since Fund InceptionMar 30, 2016


 
Fund at NAV
0.27
5.01
10.04
13.92
4.99
10.13
2.57
11.73


Fund at Market Price
0.29
5.06
9.99
13.81
—
—
—
11.73


MSCI World Index1
0.38
4.03
10.66
18.20
5.23
11.38
3.96
14.94





Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Performance is for the stated time period only; due to market volat ility, the Fund's current performance may be lower or higher than indicated. The Fund's performance at market price will differ from its results at net asset value (NAV). The market price used to calculate the Market Value return is the midpoint between  the highest bid and the lowest offer on the exchange on which the shares of the Fund are listed for trading as of the time that the Fund's NAV is calculated. If you trade your shares at another time during the day, your return may differ. Returns are his torical and are calculated by determining the percentage change in NAV or market price (as applicable) with all distributions reinvested at NAV or closing market price (as applicable) on the payment date of the distribution, and are net of management fee s and other expenses. Performance less than one year is cumulative.The Fund pursues its investment objective by investing in a separate investment fund (the Portfolio). The returns at NAV for periods before the date the Fund commenced operations  are for a mutual fund that invests in the Portfolio (the Portfolio Investor). The performance during such period does not represent the performance of the Fund. The prior investment performance of the Portfolio Investor (rather than the Portfolio itself)  is shown because it reflects the expenses typically borne by a retail fund investing in the Portfolio. The Portfolio Investor returns are not adjusted to reflect differences between the total net operating expenses of the Fund and the Portfolio Investor  during the periods shown. If such an adjustment were made, the performance presented below would be higher, because the Fund's total net operating expenses are lower than those of the Portfolio Investor. Performance is for a share class of the Portfolio  Investor offered at net asset value.






Fund Factsas of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Inception
03/30/2016


Investment Objective
Total return


Total Net Assets2
$15.4M


Total Net Assets of Portfolio2
$380.7M


Exchange
NASDAQ


Shares Outstanding
700000


Expense Ratio (Gross)3
2.99%


Expense Ratio (Net)3,4
0.91%


CUSIP
27830G863







Top 10 Holdings (%)5,6,7as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Alphabet Inc - CL C



Johnson & Johnson



Wells Fargo & Co



Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group Inc



Interpublic Group of Cos Inc



JPMorgan Chase & Co



Facebook Inc



Chubb Ltd



CDW Corp/DE



Melrose Industries PLC



Total
11.14







Portfolio Management




 
Christopher M. Dyer, CFA


Managed Fund since inception


Michael A. Allison, CFA


Managed Fund since inception


John H. Croft, CFA


Managed Fund since inception


Jeffrey D. Mueller


Managed Fund since inception






Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund primarily invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund and may also invest d irectly. References to investments are to the aggregate holdings of the Fund and the Portfolio.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Changes in the dividend policies of companies could make it difficult to provide a predictable level of income. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volati lity than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other conditions. Dividend capture strategies may result in higher portfolio turnover, increased trading costs and potential for capital loss or gains.  When interest rates rise, the value of preferred stocks and other hybrid securities will generally decline. As interest rates rise, the value of certain income investments is likely to decline. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose m oney investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. MSCI World Index is an unmanaged index of equity securities in the developed markets. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverage, as applicable. It is not pos sible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund. MSCI indexes are net of foreign withholding taxes. Source: MSCI. MSCI data may not be r eproduced or used for any other purpose. MSCI provides no warranties, has not prepared or approved this report, and has no liability hereunder.
2. "Total Net Assets" are the net assets of the Fund. "Total Net Assets of Portfolio" are the net assets of the Portfolio, including the Fund's investment in it and any other investments.
3. Source: Fund prospectus.
4. Net expense ratio reflects a contractual expense reimbursement that continues through 2/28/18. Without the reimbursement, if applicable, performance would have been lower.
5. Top 10 Holdings excludes cash and equivalents.
6. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are to the Portfolio's holdings. Fund commenced operations on 3/30/16.
7. Percent of Portfolio total net assets.
 Performance

Historical Returns (%)as of  Jun 30, 2017


























Annualized




1 Month
3 Months
YTD
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Since Fund InceptionMar 30, 2016


 
Fund at NAV
0.27
5.01
10.04
13.92
4.99
10.13
2.57
11.73


Fund at Market Price
0.29
5.06
9.99
13.81
—
—
—
11.73


MSCI World Index1
0.38
4.03
10.66
18.20
5.23
11.38
3.96
14.94





Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Performance is for the stated time period only; due to market volat ility, the Fund's current performance may be lower or higher than indicated. The Fund's performance at market price will differ from its results at net asset value (NAV). The market price used to calculate the Market Value return is the midpoint between  the highest bid and the lowest offer on the exchange on which the shares of the Fund are listed for trading as of the time that the Fund's NAV is calculated. If you trade your shares at another time during the day, your return may differ. Returns are his torical and are calculated by determining the percentage change in NAV or market price (as applicable) with all distributions reinvested at NAV or closing market price (as applicable) on the payment date of the distribution, and are net of management fee s and other expenses. Performance less than one year is cumulative.The Fund pursues its investment objective by investing in a separate investment fund (the Portfolio). The returns at NAV for periods before the date the Fund commenced operations  are for a mutual fund that invests in the Portfolio (the Portfolio Investor). The performance during such period does not represent the performance of the Fund. The prior investment performance of the Portfolio Investor (rather than the Portfolio itself)  is shown because it reflects the expenses typically borne by a retail fund investing in the Portfolio. The Portfolio Investor returns are not adjusted to reflect differences between the total net operating expenses of the Fund and the Portfolio Investor  during the periods shown. If such an adjustment were made, the performance presented below would be higher, because the Fund's total net operating expenses are lower than those of the Portfolio Investor. Performance is for a share class of the Portfolio  Investor offered at net asset value.






Calendar Year Returns (%)







2007
2008
2009
2010
2011
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016


 
Fund at NAV
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—


Fund at Market Price
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—


MSCI World Index1
9.04
-40.71
29.99
11.76
-5.54
15.83
26.68
4.94
-0.87
7.51





See above note regarding performance calculations. There is no Fund at Market Price performance because the Fund has not completed a calendar year of operations.






Fund Facts




 
Expense Ratio (Gross)3
2.99%


Expense Ratio (Net)3,4
0.91%


Inception
03/30/2016


Distribution Frequency
Monthly







Yield Information8as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Distribution Rate at NAV
5.44%


Subsidized SEC 30-day Yield
2.19%


Unsubsidized SEC 30-day Yield
1.66%







NAV History






Date
NAV
NAV Change


 
Jul 20, 2017
$22.32
$0.05


Jul 19, 2017
$22.27
$0.07


Jul 18, 2017
$22.20
$0.03


Jul 17, 2017
$22.17
$0.00


Jul 14, 2017
$22.17
$0.10


Jul 13, 2017
$22.07
$0.05


Jul 12, 2017
$22.02
$0.10


Jul 11, 2017
$21.92
$0.00


Jul 10, 2017
$21.92
$0.01


Jul 07, 2017
$21.91
$0.03







Distribution History9






Ex-Date
Distribution


 
Jul 03, 2017
$0.10000


Jun 01, 2017
$0.10000


May 01, 2017
$0.10000


Apr 03, 2017
$0.05000


Mar 01, 2017
$0.05550


Feb 01, 2017
$0.04110


Jan 03, 2017
$0.09020


Dec 01, 2016
$0.07070


Nov 01, 2016
$0.04690


Oct 03, 2016
$0.04440





View All






No records in this table indicates that there has not been a distribution greater than .0001 within the past 3 years. Fund prospectus






Capital Gain History9






Ex-Date
Short-Term
Long-Term


 



No records in this table indicates that there has not been a capital gain greater than .0001 within the past 3 years. Fund prospectus





Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund primarily invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund and may also invest d irectly. References to investments are to the aggregate holdings of the Fund and the Portfolio.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Changes in the dividend policies of companies could make it difficult to provide a predictable level of income. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volati lity than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other conditions. Dividend capture strategies may result in higher portfolio turnover, increased trading costs and potential for capital loss or gains.  When interest rates rise, the value of preferred stocks and other hybrid securities will generally decline. As interest rates rise, the value of certain income investments is likely to decline. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose m oney investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. MSCI World Index is an unmanaged index of equity securities in the developed markets. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverage, as applicable. It is not pos sible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund. MSCI indexes are net of foreign withholding taxes. Source: MSCI. MSCI data may not be r eproduced or used for any other purpose. MSCI provides no warranties, has not prepared or approved this report, and has no liability hereunder.
3. Source: Fund prospectus.
4. Net expense ratio reflects a contractual expense reimbursement that continues through 2/28/18. Without the reimbursement, if applicable, performance would have been lower.
8. SEC 30-day yield is a standardized measure based on the estimated yield to maturity of a fund's investments over a 30-day period and is based on the maximum offer price at the date specified. The SEC 30-day yield is not based on the distributions made by  the fund, which may differ. Subsidized yield reflects the effect of fee waivers and expense reimbursements. Distribution Rate at NAV is calculated by dividing the last distribution paid per share (annualized) by NAV. The Fund's monthly distribution may  be comprised of ordinary income, net realized capital gains and returns of capital.
9. A portion of the Fund's returns may be comprised of return of capital or short term capital gains. The Fund will determine the tax characteristics of all Fund distributions after the end of the calendar year and will provide shareholders such information  at that time. Please consult your tax advisor for further information.
 Trading & Portfolio

Trade Data10as of Jul 20, 2017









vs. Prior Business Day
Change (%)


 
Closing Price
$22.29
+$0.02
+0.09%


Closing NAV
$22.32
+$0.05
+0.22%


Closing Bid/Ask





Midpoint (of bid/ask)
NAV+$0.00




Spread (between bid/ask)
$0.06




Intraday Price (vs. NAV)





High
NAV-$0.03




Low
NAV-$0.03




Average (Volume-Wtd)
NAV-$0.03




Closing
NAV-$0.03




Trading Volume (Shares)
24,700









Trading History11Inception through Jul 20, 2017



























Premium/Discount
Closing


Date
High
Low
Average (Volume-Wtd)
Closing Price
Closing Bid/Ask Midpoint
Bid/Ask Spread


 
Jul 20, 2017
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
$0.00
$0.06


Jul 19, 2017




$0.00
$0.06


Jul 18, 2017




$0.00
$0.08


Jul 17, 2017
-$0.04
-$0.04
-$0.04
-$0.04
$0.00
$0.08


Jul 14, 2017




$0.00
$0.06







Historical Premiums/Discounts and Trading Spreads12Inception through Jul 20, 2017









Premium/Discount
Closing


Range
Closing Price
Vol Wtd Ave Price
Closing Bid/Ask Midpoint
Bid/Ask Spread


 
 >1.00%






 +0.76% to +1.00%






 +0.51% to +0.75%



1%


 +0.26% to +0.50%
2%
2%
0%
16%


 -0.25% to +0.25%
94%
94%
100%
83%


-0.26% to -0.50%
5%
5%




-0.51% to -0.75%






-0.76% to -1.00%


















Asset Mix (%)6,7,13,14,15as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Foreign Common Stocks
30.83


U.S. Common Stocks
27.39


U.S. Corporate Bonds
19.44


Foreign Corporate Bonds
11.05


Cash
4.55


Floating-Rate Loans
3.37


Preferred Stock
3.30


Convertible Bond
0.08


Total
100.00







Portfolio Statistics6as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Average Market Cap
$101.8B


Price/Earnings Ratio
17.57


Number of Holdings
506


Number of Equity Holdings
141


Price/Book Ratio
2.39


Average Coupon
6.43%


Average Maturity
9.87 yrs.


Average Duration
1.25 yrs.


Average Price
$105.04







GICS Sector Breakdown (%)6,16as of  Jun 30, 2017
























Sector
Fund
MSCI World Index1


 
Consumer Discretionary
14.47
12.32


Consumer Staples
7.91
9.67


Energy
7.97
6.04


Financials
20.00
18.01


Health Care
10.29
12.55


Industrials
12.28
11.51


Information Technology
11.67
15.65


Materials
4.33
4.90


Real Estate
3.29
3.21


Telecom Services
1.93
2.95


Utilities
5.86
3.19







Credit Quality (%)6,17as of  Jun 30, 2017






















 
BBB
9.85


BB
37.69


B
42.70


CCC or Lower
6.33


Not Rated
3.42


Total
100.00





Ratings are based on Moody's, S&P or Fitch, as applicable. If securities are rated differently by the ratings agencies, the higher rating is applied. Ratings, which are subject to change, apply to the creditworthiness of the issuers of the underlying sec urities and not to the Fund or its shares. Credit ratings measure the quality of a bond based on the issuer's creditworthiness, with ratings ranging from AAA, being the highest, to D, being the lowest based on S&P's measures. Ratings of BBB or higher by  S&P or Fitch (Baa or higher by Moody's) are considered to be investment-grade quality. Credit ratings are based largely on the ratings agency's analysis at the time of rating. The rating assigned to any particular security is not necessarily a reflection  of the issuer's current financial condition and does not necessarily reflect its assessment of the volatility of a security's market value or of the liquidity of an investment in the security. Holdings designated as "Not Rated" are not rated by the nati onal ratings agencies stated above.






Maturity Distribution (%)6,17as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Less Than 1 Year
0.00


1 To 3 Years
4.88


3 To 5 Years
16.05


5 To 10 Years
64.48


10 To 20 Years
1.50


20 To 30 Years
0.52


More Than 30 Years
12.57


Total
100.00







Assets by Country (%)6,18as of  Jun 30, 2017






















 
United States
52.86


United Kingdom
9.08


France
5.52


Japan
4.25


Spain
3.67


Canada
3.54


Netherlands
2.59


Germany
1.84


Denmark
1.60


Cash & Other Assets
4.55


Total
100.00





View All








Geographic Mix (%)6,18as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
North America
56.40


Europe
31.80


Asia/Pacific
6.68


Latin America/Caribbean
0.57


Cash & Other Assets
4.55


Total
100.00







Portfolio Holdings6,7,19as of  May 31, 2017







Holding
% of Net Assets


 
US Dollars
2.22%


Alphabet Inc - CL C
1.81%


EV Cash Reserves Fund LLC
1.33%


Facebook Inc
0.94%


Deutsche Telekom AG
0.89%


Newell Brands Inc
0.87%


Amazon.com Inc
0.87%


Visa Inc
0.83%


Melrose Industries PLC
0.82%


Apple Inc
0.82%





View All








Basket Details20Jul 24, 2017







Holding
Shares


 



View All








Transaction Fees21,22,23Jul 24, 2017







No. of Creation Units
Fee per Creation Unit (bps)


 



View All







Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund primarily invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund and may also invest d irectly. References to investments are to the aggregate holdings of the Fund and the Portfolio.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Changes in the dividend policies of companies could make it difficult to provide a predictable level of income. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volati lity than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other conditions. Dividend capture strategies may result in higher portfolio turnover, increased trading costs and potential for capital loss or gains.  When interest rates rise, the value of preferred stocks and other hybrid securities will generally decline. As interest rates rise, the value of certain income investments is likely to decline. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose m oney investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. MSCI World Index is an unmanaged index of equity securities in the developed markets. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverage, as applicable. It is not pos sible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund. MSCI indexes are net of foreign withholding taxes. Source: MSCI. MSCI data may not be r eproduced or used for any other purpose. MSCI provides no warranties, has not prepared or approved this report, and has no liability hereunder.
6. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are to the Portfolio's holdings. Fund commenced operations on 3/30/16.
7. Percent of Portfolio total net assets.
10. All trade data is for the referenced trading day. All premiums/discounts and bids/asks are relative to NAV. Premium/discount data is from actual trades, while bid/ask midpoint and spread data use the bid and ask at market close. Closing bid and closing a sk can be used for establishing limits on trading costs in limit orders.
11. All values relative to NAV.
12. Each line in the chart shows the percentage of total trading days during the designated period in which the specified Fund trading parameter was within the indicated range.  Premiums/discounts shown are versus NAV.  Closing bid/ask spread is versus the c losing bid/ask midpoint. Past performance may not predict future results.
13. A delay in transaction settlement may result in a negative cash position.
14. Preferred stocks include both U.S. and foreign securities.
15. The Fund may obtain exposure to certain market segments through investments in Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs) and futures. For purposes of the asset breakdowns, allocations with respect to the Fund's investments in ETFs and futures are based on the underly ing portfolio composition of each ETF and future as of the calendar quarter end.
16. Percent of equity holdings.
17. Percent of bond holdings.
18. Percent of total net assets.
19. The following list reflects unaudited securities holdings (excluding derivatives positions).  Holdings information may differ if presented as of trade date.  Due to rounding, holdings of less than 0.005% may show as 0.00%. Portfolio information subject t o change due to active management.
20. The Basket includes securities, cash and/or other instruments designated by the Fund to be paid or received by Authorized Participants that transact directly with the Fund in Creation Unit transactions. The Basket is not intended to be representative of  the Fund's current holdings and may vary significantly from current portfolio positions.
21. For transactions directly with the Fund, the Fund imposes transaction fees on Creation Units issued and redeemed to offset the estimated cost to the Fund of processing the transaction and converting the Basket to or from the desired portfolio composition .
22. Basis points (bps) are a unit of percentage measure. 1 basis point is equal to 0.01%.
23. A fixed fee of $150 will also be charged for each creation or redemption event. If the fund substitutes cash for basket instruments, it will impose higher transaction fees on the substituted cash amount.
 Insights & Analysis  Commentary
No commentary information is currently available.


Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund primarily invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund and may also invest d irectly. References to investments are to the aggregate holdings of the Fund and the Portfolio.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Changes in the dividend policies of companies could make it difficult to provide a predictable level of income. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volati lity than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other conditions. Dividend capture strategies may result in higher portfolio turnover, increased trading costs and potential for capital loss or gains.  When interest rates rise, the value of preferred stocks and other hybrid securities will generally decline. As interest rates rise, the value of certain income investments is likely to decline. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose m oney investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.

  Attribution
No attribution information is currently available.


Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund primarily invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund and may also invest d irectly. References to investments are to the aggregate holdings of the Fund and the Portfolio.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Changes in the dividend policies of companies could make it difficult to provide a predictable level of income. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volati lity than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other conditions. Dividend capture strategies may result in higher portfolio turnover, increased trading costs and potential for capital loss or gains.  When interest rates rise, the value of preferred stocks and other hybrid securities will generally decline. As interest rates rise, the value of certain income investments is likely to decline. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose m oney investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



 Management
Biography


Christopher M. Dyer, CFA
Vice President, Director of Global Equity, Eaton Vance Management (International) Limited
Joined Eaton Vance 2015


Christopher Dyer is a vice president of Eaton Vance Management (International) Limited and director of global equity. He is responsible for building and leading a global equity investment team, and managing global and international equity portfolios. He  joined Eaton Vance in 2015.
Chris began his career in the financial services industry in 2001. Before joining Eaton Vance, he was managing director and head of European equity for Goldman Sachs Asset Management (GSAM), where he was affiliated since 2001.
Chris earned a B.S., cum laude, from Georgetown University and an MBA from The Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania. He is a CFA charterholder.


Education

B.S. Georgetown University
M.B.A. The Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania


Experience

Managed Fund since inception





 



Biography


Michael A. Allison, CFA
Vice President, Eaton Vance Management
Joined Eaton Vance 2000


Michael Allison is a vice president of Eaton Vance Management, a director of equity strategy implementation and a structured equity portfolio manager on a number of Eaton Vance’s global and domestic equity income and tax-managed equity portfolios.  On those funds, he is responsible for portfolio construction, tax oversight and risk management. He is a member of the firm’s Equity Strategy Committee. He joined Eaton Vance in 2000.
Mike began his career in the investment management industry in 1988. Before joining Eaton Vance, Mike was an equity analyst for Schroder Investment Management North America Inc. He was also affiliated with Fleet Investment Advisors and Phoenix Home Life  Mutual Fund Insurance Co.
Mike earned a B.S.B.A. from the University of Denver. He is a member of the Boston Security Analysts Society and is a CFA charterholder.


Education

B.S.B.A., The University of Denver


Experience

Managed Fund since inception





 



Biography


John H. Croft, CFA
Vice President, Eaton Vance Management
Joined Eaton Vance 2004


John Croft is a vice president of Eaton Vance Management and portfolio manager on Eaton Vance’s diversified fixed-income team. He is responsible for buy and sell decisions, portfolio construction and risk management for the firm’s diversified  fixed-income strategies. He joined Eaton Vance in 2004.
John began his career in the investment management industry in 1986. Before joining Eaton Vance, he was a credit analyst with Fidelity Management & Research Co.
John earned a B.A. from Colgate University and an MBA from the University of Chicago Graduate School of Business. He is a CFA charterholder.


Education

B.A. Colgate University
M.B.A. Booth School of Business, University of Chicago


Experience

Managed Fund since inception





 



Biography


Jeffrey D. Mueller
Vice President, Eaton Vance Management (International) Limited
Joined Eaton Vance 2015


Jeffrey Mueller is a vice president of Eaton Vance Management (International) Limited and a global portfolio manager on Eaton Vance’s high-yield team. He is responsible for buy and sell decisions, portfolio construction and risk management for the  firm's high-yield strategies. He leads investment management and credit research for all non-U.S. high-yield opportunities. He joined Eaton Vance in 2015.
Jeff began his career in the investment management industry in 2004. Before joining Eaton Vance, he was a high-yield portfolio manager with Threadneedle Asset Management. He was previously affiliated with Centaurus Capital Ltd. and Amaranth Advisors LLC.
Jeff earned a B.B.A. from the University of Wisconsin at Madison. He was named in Financial News’ high-profile "Rising Stars in Asset Management" list in 2016, which highlights the top 40 investment management professionals in Europe unde r the age of 40.


Education

B.B.A. University of Wisconsin at Madison


Experience

Managed Fund since inception





 




 
Literature
Literature

Fact Sheet
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 31, 2017



NextShares Brochure
Download
 - Last updated: Oct 21, 2016



Annual Report
Download
 - Last updated: Oct 31, 2016



Full Prospectus
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 1, 2017



Holdings-1st or 3rd fiscal quarters-www.sec.gov
Download




SAI
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 1, 2017



Semi-Annual Report
Download
 - Last updated: Apr 30, 2017



Summary Prospectus
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 1, 2017



XBRL
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 13, 2017

















 NextShares Calculator*

EVGBCGlobal Income Builder NextShares
I Plan To:
BuySell


Approx Trade Size:
$ DollarsEnter a dollar amount to the nearest cent.Shares NextShares do not trade in fractional shares.Enter a whole number without decimals.

Premium/Discount $ Enter premium or discount to the nearest whole cent.


Estimated Share Amt
0


Estimated Value
$0.00

Estimated Current Price Per Share


Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)Jul 21, 2017


AskLast Bid
NAV


The calculator is currently unavailable.
* This calculator provides an estimate and does not provide the actual price at which a transaction will be executed. Shares of NextShares funds are traded in the secondary market through a broker, and may not be individually purchased or redeemed from the fund. All transactions in NextShares are executed at the Fund's net asset value per share (NAV) calculated at the end of the day plus or minus a premium or discount. The Estimated Current Price per Share used in the calculation reflects (i) the Fund’s intraday indicative value (IIV) and (ii) offer or bid price is subject to a 15 minute delay and is as of the time noted. See information about IIVs below(†).  The calculator is available during normal market hours only.


 

Access Advisor Resources
Get exclusive access to timely materials:

Eaton Vance Thought Leadership
Insights and Conference Calls
Notifications of Document Updates

Sign In
    or Register 




 
Related Content
NextShares BrochureOct 21, 2016  







Twitter @EatonVance
Eaton Vance on LinkedIn
Eaton Vanceon Facebook
Subscriptions
EmailPrint
Site Survey






Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.



Remember Me



I Do Not Accept
Ok




Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.


I Do Not Accept
Ok





 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-800-836-2414. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this Eaton Vance website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-800-836-2414.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. Your subscriptions can be managed on your profile page. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all Eaton Vance email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Simply enter your e-mail address to register.


Company Email:


Cancel
Already have an account? Sign In.

If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Register for more access and control.

Elevate your business practice with materials from the Advisor Institute.
Learn more with exclusive videos, conference calls, and the latest insights.
Follow products, get product notifications, and manage your Eaton Vance communications.












Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from Eaton Vance.
Here's the link:Global Income Builder NextShares (EVGBC)
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://funds.eatonvance.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 






Site Disclaimer


You are about to enter the   website for .


This is your selected location and role:





This is your selected location:



Please select your role:







I Do Not Accept
I Accept






Disclaimer


The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
By clicking the box below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the Fund (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes).

GENERAL DISCLAIMER
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.
This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.
Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, administrative and service contracts, and other risks.
QIAIF DISCLAIMER
The Fund is an umbrella fund of the Eaton Vance Institutional Funds plc (the "Company"), a public limited company with variable capital with segregated liability between sub-funds incorporated in Ireland pursuant to the Companies Acts. The Company is authorised and regulated by the Central Bank of Ireland as a Qualified Investors Alternative Investment Fund (QIAIF) and solely intended for Qualified Investors (as defined in the Fund prospectus).
The Fund is currently authorised in Ireland only and as a QIAIF the Company may apply for recognition by other EU Member States. The QIAIF mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some countries.
This website is not intended to distribute or offer or solicit the sale of shares or units in the Fund and any jurisdiction in which such distribution, or offer or solicitation would be considered contrary to local law or regulation.
            


I Do Not Accept
I Accept






































NextShares.com - News









































News

Articles
|
Events











6/9/2017
Ignites

Featured News









NextShares Fits With 'Spirit of the DOL'
Bradley Saacks from Ignites, interviews Stephen Clarke, President of NextShares. Saacks and Clarke discuss NextShares distribution and Department of Labor regulation.







 



Media Inquiries

Robyn Tice
Vice President
                                        Director of Media Relations
                                        rtice@nextshares.com
617-672-8940














Filter





Date Range:
FROM

TO

Apply dates


Type:


Clear








No results were found. Please try a wider date range, additional sources, or additional formats.
                    





6/9/2017
Ignites




NextShares Fits With 'Spirit of the DOL'
Bradley Saacks from Ignites, interviews Stephen Clarke, President of NextShares. Saacks and Clarke discuss NextShares distribution and Department of Labor regulation.






2/7/2017
ETF Advisor




Gabelli Funds Launches Food of All Nations NextShares
Gabelli Funds, LLC, announced that Gabelli Food of All Nations NextShares will list and commence trading on Nasdaq Stock Market LLC on February 14, 2017.






12/15/2016
Business Wire




Causeway Capital Management to Introduce NextShares
“Causeway is a trusted investment manager and we’re proud to begin partnering with them,” said Stephen W. Clarke, president of NextShares Solutions.






11/30/2016
Nationwide




Nationwide Funds to Introduce NextShares
“We're proud to add Nationwide Funds as a NextShares partner,” said Stephen W. Clarke, president of NextShares Solutions. “We're pleased to expand the distribution of NextShares to Nationwide Funds investors.”






11/29/2016
Business Wire




Gabelli Funds Launches Gabelli Media Mogul NextShares
Gabelli Funds, LLC, announced today that Gabelli Media Mogul NextShares will list and commence trading on Nasdaq Stock Market LLC on December 1, 2016.






10/31/2016
Business Wire




Interactive Brokers Group Announces the Availability of Eaton Vance NextShares™ with No Transaction Fees
Interactive Brokers Group, Inc., announced today the availability of Eaton Vance NextSharesTM exchange-traded managed funds through its investing and trading platforms on a no-transaction fee (NTF) basis.






10/21/2016
Ignites




Ivy First Licensee to Go Live With NextShares
Ivy Investments launched three strategies using the NextShares exchange-traded managed fund structure, becoming the first licensee of the Eaton Vance affiliate to launch any of the products.






10/18/2016
Business Wire




Ivy Launches its First Three NextShares™
Ivy Investment Management Company today introduced its first three Ivy NextShares as part of a planned lineup of NextShares exchange-traded managed funds. Ivy is among the first to offer the new structure.






8/25/2016
Forbes




NextShares Targets Lower Fund Fees
Julie Cooling from RIA Channel, interviews Jonathan Isaac, Managing Director of Product Strategy at NextShares. Cooling and Isaac discuss the launch of one of the most innovative financial platforms of our time.






7/27/2016
STRUCTUREDRETAILPRODUCTS.COM




UBS Beefs up ETF offering in the US via partnership with Eaton Vance subsidiary
The $910 billion Boston-based institutional investment consultant is working with the global asset manager to identify new NextShares™ exchange-traded managed fund (NextShares) sub-advisers.






7/18/2016
Press Release




NEPC Engaged by Eaton Vance for NextShares™ Sub-Adviser Search







7/13/2016
Ignites




UBS First Wirehouse to Ink Eaton Vance NextShares Deal
Eaton Vance signed an agreement with UBS Wealth Management to distribute NextShares through its financial advisor network. The distributor is the first wirehouse to accommodate the new investment wrapper on its platform.






7/13/2016
Press Release




UBS Plans to Offer NextShares Exchange-Traded Managed Funds







5/18/2016
Fund Action




Early Adopters of NextShares Set To Benefit
“There’s an economic advantage in terms of pricing,” Stephen Clarke, president of Eaton Vance subsidiary NextShares Solutions, told FA.






5/13/2016
Ignites




NextShares Inks Second Distribution Deal
Interactive Brokers Group said Thursday that it plans to offer NextShares exchange-traded managed funds to retail investors and financial pros through its platforms, making it the second distributor through which the products can be sold.






4/20/2016
Ignites




Ivy Funds Preps NextShares for Launch
Ivy Funds is lining up to be the first third-party manager to launch NextShares non-transparent exchange-traded products. NextShares is an Eaton Vance subsidiary.






4/20/2016
Press Release




Ivy NextShares to Launch Late Summer 2016
Ivy NextShares, managed by Ivy Investment Management Company, a subsidiary of Waddell & Reed Financial, Inc., has filed a registration statement with the Securities & Exchange Commission to register three Ivy NextShares exchange-traded managed funds (NextShares).






3/29/2016
ETF Express




Eaton Vance to launch two additional NextShares funds
Eaton Vance Corp is to launch two additional NextShares exchange-traded managed funds, the Eaton Vance Global Income Builder NextShares (:EVGBC) and Eaton Vance TABS 5-to-15 Year Laddered Municipal Bond NextShares (EVLMC).






3/4/2016
ThinkAdvisor.com




Neither ETF Nor Mutual Fund, Behold the Exchange-Traded Managed Fund
Eaton Vance launched NextShares in late February; other investment advisors have pending deals for their own exchange-traded managed fund.






3/3/2016
Ignites




Eaton Vance CEO: NextShares Launch to Create Domino Effect
Eaton Vance CEO Tom Faust is counting on the recent launch of NextShares to build momentum for the non-transparent exchange-traded products.






3/1/2016
Press Release




Stephen Clarke, President of NextShares Solutions LLC Scheduled to Present at Citi 2016 Asset Management and Broker Dealer Investor Conference
Eaton Vance Corp. (NYSE: EV) announced that Stephen Clarke, President of NextShares Solutions LLC, is scheduled to speak at the Citi 2016 Asset Management and Broker Dealer Investor Conference on Thursday, March 3, 2016.






2/29/2016
Nasdaq




Eaton Vance Stock NextShares Rings the Nasdaq Stock Market Opening Bell
Eaton Vance, a leading global asset manager whose history dates to 1924, will visit the Nasdaq MarketSite in Times Square in celebration of launching Eaton Vance Stock NextShares (Nasdaq:EVSTC).






2/25/2016
ETF.com




Eaton Vance’s NextShares Finally Debuts
Exchange-traded managed funds—the new structure patented by Eaton Vance that falls somewhere between an ETF and an open-ended mutual fund—are coming to market.






2/25/2016
Ignites




On Verge of NextShares Launch, Eaton Vance Preaches Patience
Eaton Vance CEO Tom Faust had a single message for NextShares skeptics during Wednesday’s earnings call: Have patience.






1/15/2016
Mutual Fund Wire




Don't Call Them ETMFs
When it comes to the new type of funds that Eaton Vance is creating, call them NextShares or exchange-traded managed funds but don't use the abbreviation.






11/25/2015
Ignites




B-Ds Want NextShares 'Proof'; 2016 Could Deliver It
Eaton Vance’s plans to launch the first swath of NextShares this year may be off the table, but officials are hoping a successful 2016 debut will convince distributors and asset managers to set aside their reservations and make the products a priority.






10/19/2015
Pensions & Investments




Managers finding new ETF niches to stake their claims
Over the past several months, U.S. money managers traditionally associated with active portfolio management for both retail and institutional clients have made their exchange-traded fund aspirations more pronounced.






10/1/2015
ThinkAdvisor




New Providers in U.S. ETF Space Set Record: ETFGI
Asset managers are tripping over themselves to get into the U.S. exchange-traded funds and products space, according to a report released Thursday by ETFGI, a London-based research and consultancy firm.






9/29/2015
Ignites




Columbia Threadneedle Plots Multi-Front ETF Expansion
Columbia Threadneedle plans to build on its small lineup of active ETFs with both index-based strategies and non-transparent exchanged-traded managed funds.






9/28/2015
The Wall Street Journal




Columbia Management Seeks Permission to Launch NextShares, Index ETFs
Columbia Management Investment Advisers LLC, a Boston subsidiary of Ameriprise Financial Inc., is seeking permission from regulators to launch a version of exchange-traded managed funds, a new breed of fund planned by Eaton Vance Corp.






9/9/2015
ETF Express




Eaton Vance's NextShares gets its first custodian on board
ALPS has entered into a preliminary agreement with Navigate Fund Solutions LLC (Navigate), a subsidiary of Eaton Vance Corp., to support the launch of a family of ALPS NextShares exchange-traded managed funds (ETMFs).






9/9/2015
Investment News




Eaton Vance's NextShares gets its first custodian on board
NextShares, the new fund structure from Eaton Vance Corp. designed to reduce the costs of active management, has won its first broker-dealer partner. Two investing platforms managed by Foliofn Investments Inc. will offer the funds to financial advisers and other investors.






9/9/2015
Ignites




NextShares Touts First B-D Distribution Deal
Eaton Vance has found a broker-dealer to allow its brokerage and RIA custody clients to buy and sell NextShares exchange-traded managed funds.






9/8/2015
The Wall Street Journal




Online Brokerage Folio Investing to Offer NextShares
Online brokerage services Folio Investing and Folio Institutional plan to offer a new type of fund created by a unit of Eaton Vance Corp. that may start trading later this year.






9/8/2015
Press Release




ALPS Announces Initiative to Launch NextShares
ALPS, a DST Company providing products and services to the financial services industry, today announced it has entered into a preliminary agreement with Navigate Fund Solutions LLC, a subsidiary of Eaton Vance Corp., to support the launch of a family of ALPS NextShares™ exchange-traded managed funds.






9/8/2015
Press Release




Folio Announces Plans to Offer NextShares
Folio Investing and Folio Institutional, leading online brokerage services for individual investors, financial advisors, institutions and their clients, today announced plans to be the first broker-dealer to offer NextShares™ exchange-traded managed funds directly to individual investors, advisors and institutions.






8/19/2015
The Wall Street Journal




Envestnet Plans to Offer NextShares
“Envestnet’s decision may make it easier for other companies to step forward to offer the exchange-traded managed funds.” - CEO Tom Faust






8/18/2015
Press Release




Envestnet Announces Initiative to Offer NextShares
Envestnet, Inc. today announced plans to make NextShares™ exchange-traded managed funds available to financial advisors through the Envestnet wealth management platform as part of its advisor-as-portfolio-manager tools as well as through Fund Strategist Portfolios (FSPs).






8/3/2015
WealthManagement.com




Ten to Watch 2016: Stephen Clarke
Stephen Clarke is among the 10 influencers and innovators expected to impact the advisory industry in 2016.






6/29/2015
Institutional Investor




Eaton Vance's NextShares: The Best of Two Worlds?
Tom Faust, CEO of Eaton Vance, is credited with launching NextShares, a new exchange-traded product that he hopes will help active money managers stem the tide of money flowing into cheaper index funds.






5/20/2015
Financial Times




NextShares in Financial Times: ETF model puts active managers to the test
The SEC has cleared a new vehicle developed by Eaton Vance. It will carry the brand name NextShares, and might just be the biggest innovation for the investment industry since the ETF 25 years ago.






5/7/2015
Boston Business Journal




Pioneer Investments offers NextShares in Boston Business Journal: Eaton Vance's new product could revolutionize
“Having big ambitions and tremendous respect for the value added of this structure, I would like to have more fund companies signed up.” - CEO Tom Faust






4/14/2015
The Wall Street Journal




Tom Faust on NextShares Developments
Eaton Vance got approval for a new thing called NextShares. It enhances performance, saves on taxes and delivers active strategies more efficiently.






4/14/2015
Ignites




Eaton Vance Cuts Costs, Preserves Margins With NextShares
“Lower costs relative to active mutual funds is a key selling point to advisors.”






4/1/2015
Ignites




Victory Capital Signs Up for NextShares
Victory Capital Management is the latest firm to sign with Eaton Vance to develop and launch NextShares.






3/10/2015
Traders Magazine




Eaton Vance NextShares Carves Out a New Space
Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Jason Crosby said, “We are working through the operational requirements to offer NextShares exchange-traded managed funds to our clients when available.”






3/8/2015
Investment News




 Seeing through the ETF argument in favor of transparency
Transparency promotes marketplace competition, supports better investor decision-making and exposes suspect market practices.






3/5/2015
The New York Times




Eaton Vance Charts Exchange-Traded Future
“We are changing the social contract with mutual fund investors. This really can be transformational.” - CEO Tom Faust






2/4/2015
Mutual Fund Wire




Active Fundsters Hear ETFs Calling, Even During the Price War
Active managers American Beacon and Gabelli Funds sign up for NextShares.






1/5/2015
Ignites




Executives Who Got the Job Done in 2014
“When this [idea] came up it was apparent it could be a game-changer. NextShares have the potential to broadly improve the performance and tax efficiency of active fund strategies …” - Navigate CEO Stephen Clarke






12/3/2014
Press Release




Availability of New White Paper Examining Avoidable Structural Costs of Actively Managed Mutual Funds and Their Impact on Fund Performance 
NextShares have the ability to sidestep significant fund costs, asset custody charges and the cost of portfolio trades to implement managers’ buy and sell decisions.






11/7/2014
Bloomberg




Eaton Vance Invented a New Flavor of Mutual Fund
Eaton Vance got approval for a new thing called NextShares. It enhances performance, saves on taxes, and delivers active strategies more efficiently.

























 
 














 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-877-341-9255. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this NextShares website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-877-341-9255.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with NextShares, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all NextShares email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.










Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from NextShares.
Here's the link:NextShares.com - News
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://www.nextshares.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 










 













NextShares.com - Introducing NextShares











































                        Introducing
                    




                            NextShares exchange-traded managed funds are a new way to invest in actively managed strategies.    
                    








■Because they are actively managed, NextShares offer the potential for benchmark-beating returns by applying their manager’s proprietary investment research.
■Because they trade on an exchange, NextShares may offer cost and tax efficiencies that can enhance shareholder returns.

Bottom line: NextShares are the next evolution of fund investing™.













■Because they are actively managed, NextShares offer the potential for benchmark-beating returns by applying their manager’s proprietary investment research.
■Because they trade on an exchange, NextShares may offer cost and tax efficiencies that can enhance shareholder returns.

Bottom line: NextShares are the next evolution of fund investing™.












                                Overview















                                How do the costs of NextShares compare?
                            

















Fund costs explained.

        NextShares, mutual funds and ETFs are subject to different fund costs that impact investor returns.
    

What are distribution and service (12b-1) fees?
Fund payments to support the distribution of fund shares and the provision of shareholder services under Rule 12b-1 of the Investment Company Act of 1940. A fund’s 12b-1 fees are typically paid to the fund’s distributor and generally pass through to intermediaries that sell fund shares. Permitted 12b-1 fees are limited to one percent of average fund net assets annually. Mutual funds are often subject to 12b-1 fees that vary by share class. NextShares, and most ETFs, do not pay 12b-1 fees. A fund’s 12b-1 fees are disclosed in its prospectus and included in its total expense ratio.
What are transfer agency expenses?
The fees paid by a fund to its transfer agent and other intermediaries to process shareholder transactions and maintain shareholder accounts. Transfer agency costs are normally the largest component of mutual fund expenses other than management fees and 12b-1 fees. NextShares and ETFs typically have minimal transfer agency expenses. Transfer agency fees are characterized as "other expenses" in a fund's prospectus and are included in its total expense ratio.
What are flow-related trading costs? 
The trading costs a fund incurs to purchase and sell investments in connection with shareholder inflows and outflows, including commissions, bid-ask spread (i.e., difference between the best offer price to sell a security and the best bid price to buy the security) and market impact (i.e., the effect of a purchase or sale of a security on its trading price) costs. Flow-related trading costs are not disclosed in a fund's prospectus or reflected in its total expense ratio.

NextShares keep flow-related trading costs low by issuing and redeeming shares primarily in kind (using securities and other noncash payments) and by charging transaction fees to "Authorized Participants" (professional investors who transact directly with the fund). Most mutual funds do not issue or redeem shares in kind or charge transaction fees. 

What is cash drag? 
The impact on fund performance of holding cash. Cash drag hurts fund performance when the returns of the fund's noncash investments exceed cash returns, and helps fund performance when the opposite is true. Cash drag is not disclosed in a fund's prospectus or reflected in its total expense ratio.

NextShares that transact with Authorized Participants primarily in kind may experience less cash drag than mutual funds, which often need to hold cash to meet shareholder redemptions.
What is a fund’s total expense ratio (TER)?
A fund's total annual expenses expressed as a percentage of the fund's average net assets for the year, as stated in its prospectus. Fund TERs include management fees, 12b-1 fees, custody charges, transfer agency fees and other operating expenses of the fund. TERs do not include flow-related trading costs or cash drag. TERs also do not reflect fund sales charges or other costs borne by buyers and sellers of shares. Compared to mutual funds that can be purchased and sold at net asset value, NextShares and ETFs may be more expensive to buy and sell. 






    Compared to a mutual fund with the same strategy and portfolio management, a NextShares fund can offer cost advantages that can translate into improved fund performance.



No distribution and service (12b-1) fees. Unlike many mutual funds, NextShares offer investors a single share class with no embedded distribution and service fees.



Lower fund transfer agency expenses. Because NextShares are exchange-traded, their transfer agency expenses – the costs of administering shareholder accounts – are lower than for most mutual funds.



Lower flow-related trading costs. NextShares can keep the trading costs associated with shareholder
inflows and outflows low.




Less cash drag. NextShares generally don’t need to hold a significant reserve of cash to accommodate shareholder withdrawals. That means more of an investor’s money can be put to work in pursuit of returns.
    

For more detailed information comparing Nextshares to mutual funds, click here.

Learn more.

    Bottom line: NextShares' cost savings offer the potential for improved investor outcomes.








    Compared to a mutual fund with the same strategy and portfolio management, a NextShares fund can offer cost advantages that can translate into improved fund performance.



No distribution and service (12b-1) fees. Unlike many mutual funds, NextShares offer investors a single share class with no embedded distribution and service fees.



Lower fund transfer agency expenses. Because NextShares are exchange-traded, their transfer agency expenses – the costs of administering shareholder accounts – are lower than for most mutual funds.



Lower flow-related trading costs. NextShares can keep the trading costs associated with shareholder
inflows and outflows low.




Less cash drag. NextShares generally don’t need to hold a significant reserve of cash to accommodate shareholder withdrawals. That means more of an investor’s money can be put to work in pursuit of returns.
    

For more detailed information comparing Nextshares to mutual funds, click here.

Learn more.

    Bottom line: NextShares' cost savings offer the potential for improved investor outcomes.







Fund costs explained.

        NextShares, mutual funds and ETFs are subject to different fund costs that impact investor returns.
    

What are distribution and service (12b-1) fees?
Fund payments to support the distribution of fund shares and the provision of shareholder services under Rule 12b-1 of the Investment Company Act of 1940. A fund’s 12b-1 fees are typically paid to the fund’s distributor and generally pass through to intermediaries that sell fund shares. Permitted 12b-1 fees are limited to one percent of average fund net assets annually. Mutual funds are often subject to 12b-1 fees that vary by share class. NextShares, and most ETFs, do not pay 12b-1 fees. A fund’s 12b-1 fees are disclosed in its prospectus and included in its total expense ratio.
What are transfer agency expenses?
The fees paid by a fund to its transfer agent and other intermediaries to process shareholder transactions and maintain shareholder accounts. Transfer agency costs are normally the largest component of mutual fund expenses other than management fees and 12b-1 fees. NextShares and ETFs typically have minimal transfer agency expenses. Transfer agency fees are characterized as "other expenses" in a fund's prospectus and are included in its total expense ratio.
What are flow-related trading costs? 
The trading costs a fund incurs to purchase and sell investments in connection with shareholder inflows and outflows, including commissions, bid-ask spread (i.e., difference between the best offer price to sell a security and the best bid price to buy the security) and market impact (i.e., the effect of a purchase or sale of a security on its trading price) costs. Flow-related trading costs are not disclosed in a fund's prospectus or reflected in its total expense ratio.

NextShares keep flow-related trading costs low by issuing and redeeming shares primarily in kind (using securities and other noncash payments) and by charging transaction fees to "Authorized Participants" (professional investors who transact directly with the fund). Most mutual funds do not issue or redeem shares in kind or charge transaction fees. 

What is cash drag? 
The impact on fund performance of holding cash. Cash drag hurts fund performance when the returns of the fund's noncash investments exceed cash returns, and helps fund performance when the opposite is true. Cash drag is not disclosed in a fund's prospectus or reflected in its total expense ratio.

NextShares that transact with Authorized Participants primarily in kind may experience less cash drag than mutual funds, which often need to hold cash to meet shareholder redemptions.
What is a fund’s total expense ratio (TER)?
A fund's total annual expenses expressed as a percentage of the fund's average net assets for the year, as stated in its prospectus. Fund TERs include management fees, 12b-1 fees, custody charges, transfer agency fees and other operating expenses of the fund. TERs do not include flow-related trading costs or cash drag. TERs also do not reflect fund sales charges or other costs borne by buyers and sellers of shares. Compared to mutual funds that can be purchased and sold at net asset value, NextShares and ETFs may be more expensive to buy and sell. 










                                Learn how











                                How can NextShares potentially reduce fund capital gains distributions?












Mutual fund investors can get hit with big tax bills, whether or not their funds increase in value.
Mutual funds are frequently forced to sell securities they own to meet withdrawals by fund shareholders. Sales of fund positions at a gain can trigger capital gains
distributions – and associated taxes – for the fund's remaining shareholders. In fact, sales to meet investor outflows are often a leading cause of fund capital
gains distributions.1

NextShares work differently. When NextShares investors sell their shares, they don’t normally transact with the fund; instead, they trade through a broker to sell their
shares to someone else. Buyers may include other longterm investors or professional traders acting as market makers in the fund's shares. Because the NextShares fund itself is not involved in these transactions, the fund isn't required to sell securities to raise cash – so no capital gains distributions are triggered for remaining fund shareholders.

When market makers and other large investors accumulate sufficient shares of a NextShares fund, they can redeem their shares from the fund by transacting
through intermediaries called Authorized Participants. Here too, NextShares work differently than mutual funds. Like ETFs, most NextShares funds meet redemptions
through Authorized Participants primarily in kind, 2 meaning that the fund distributes current portfolio
holdings of securities rather than cash. By avoiding the sale of securities to meet redemptions, NextShares can potentially reduce fund capital gains distributions
and associated shareholder taxes. The enhanced tax efficiency that NextShares may provide can be a meaningful source of improved investor outcomes.

    Bottom line: NextShares can reduce fund taxable gains.



A fund’s investment strategy and portfolio turnover rate are other important determinants of the frequency and amount of its capital gains distributions. Fund distributions of net short-term capital gains are generally taxable as ordinary income; distributions of net gains from investments held by the fund for more than one year are generally taxable at long-term capital gains rates. The tax character of fund
distributions is determined and provided to shareholders after the end of each calendar year. In addition to capital gains distributions, fund distributions may include nonqualified ordinary dividends (taxed at ordinary income tax rates), qualified dividends (taxed at rates applicable to long-term capital gains if holding period and other requirements are met), exempt-interest dividends (not subject to regular federal income tax) and nondividend, or return of capital, distributions, which are not subject to current tax.
A NextShares fund’s redemptions may be effected partially or entirely in cash when in-kind delivery is not practicable or deemed not in the
best interests of fund shareholders.
As of March 31, 2016. Based on the mutual funds included in the Lipper large-cap, multicap, midcap and small-cap domestic equity categories and using the highest individual federal income tax rates in effect each year. Actual after-tax returns depend on a shareholder’s tax situation and may differ from those shown. After-tax returns are not relevant for shareholders who are not subject to tax or hold fund shares in tax-deferred accounts.
Source: Morningstar, Inc. Includes all domestic, international and global U.S.-registered equity mutual funds tracked by Morningstar.





Tax efficiency can have a meaningful impact on investor returns.

■
According to recent Lipper data, shareholder income and capital gains taxes resulting from fund distributions reduced annual returns of actively managed U.S. equity mutual funds by an average of 1.15% over the past 10 years and 2.23% over the past three years for individual investors in the highest tax bracket.3 That excludes state and local taxes and the taxes paid when shareholders sell their positions.
■
            Average capital gains distributions for equity mutual funds equaled 8.5% of fund net assets in 2015 — more than twice the 3.9% incurred in 2012.4







Mutual fund investors can get hit with big tax bills, whether or not their funds increase in value.
Mutual funds are frequently forced to sell securities they own to meet withdrawals by fund shareholders. Sales of fund positions at a gain can trigger capital gains
distributions – and associated taxes – for the fund's remaining shareholders. In fact, sales to meet investor outflows are often a leading cause of fund capital
gains distributions.1

NextShares work differently. When NextShares investors sell their shares, they don’t normally transact with the fund; instead, they trade through a broker to sell their
shares to someone else. Buyers may include other longterm investors or professional traders acting as market makers in the fund's shares. Because the NextShares fund itself is not involved in these transactions, the fund isn't required to sell securities to raise cash – so no capital gains distributions are triggered for remaining fund shareholders.

When market makers and other large investors accumulate sufficient shares of a NextShares fund, they can redeem their shares from the fund by transacting
through intermediaries called Authorized Participants. Here too, NextShares work differently than mutual funds. Like ETFs, most NextShares funds meet redemptions
through Authorized Participants primarily in kind, 2 meaning that the fund distributes current portfolio
holdings of securities rather than cash. By avoiding the sale of securities to meet redemptions, NextShares can potentially reduce fund capital gains distributions
and associated shareholder taxes. The enhanced tax efficiency that NextShares may provide can be a meaningful source of improved investor outcomes.

    Bottom line: NextShares can reduce fund taxable gains.



A fund’s investment strategy and portfolio turnover rate are other important determinants of the frequency and amount of its capital gains distributions. Fund distributions of net short-term capital gains are generally taxable as ordinary income; distributions of net gains from investments held by the fund for more than one year are generally taxable at long-term capital gains rates. The tax character of fund
distributions is determined and provided to shareholders after the end of each calendar year. In addition to capital gains distributions, fund distributions may include nonqualified ordinary dividends (taxed at ordinary income tax rates), qualified dividends (taxed at rates applicable to long-term capital gains if holding period and other requirements are met), exempt-interest dividends (not subject to regular federal income tax) and nondividend, or return of capital, distributions, which are not subject to current tax.
A NextShares fund’s redemptions may be effected partially or entirely in cash when in-kind delivery is not practicable or deemed not in the
best interests of fund shareholders.
As of March 31, 2016. Based on the mutual funds included in the Lipper large-cap, multicap, midcap and small-cap domestic equity categories and using the highest individual federal income tax rates in effect each year. Actual after-tax returns depend on a shareholder’s tax situation and may differ from those shown. After-tax returns are not relevant for shareholders who are not subject to tax or hold fund shares in tax-deferred accounts.
Source: Morningstar, Inc. Includes all domestic, international and global U.S.-registered equity mutual funds tracked by Morningstar.



Tax efficiency can have a meaningful impact on investor returns.

■
According to recent Lipper data, shareholder income and capital gains taxes resulting from fund distributions reduced annual returns of actively managed U.S. equity mutual funds by an average of 1.15% over the past 10 years and 2.23% over the past three years for individual investors in the highest tax bracket.3 That excludes state and local taxes and the taxes paid when shareholders sell their positions.
■
            Average capital gains distributions for equity mutual funds equaled 8.5% of fund net assets in 2015 — more than twice the 3.9% incurred in 2012.4








                                Learn how















                                How do NextSharesinvest?















Trusted managers and proven strategies
Each of the below companies has entered into a preliminary licensing and services agreement to permit the offering of NextShares. Additional fund managers are also expected to offer NextShares. Learn more.


ALPS Advisors
American Beacon
Broms Asset Management
Causeway Capital Management
Columbia Threadneedle Investments
Eaton Vance
Gabelli Funds, LLC
Hartford Funds Management Company
Ivy Investment Management Company
Nationwide
Nile Capital Management
Pioneer Investments
Principal Management Corporation
UBS Asset Management
Victory Capital





    NextShares can invest in all the same strategies and asset classes as mutual funds. NextShares funds may include equity, income, alternative and multi-asset funds managed in a wide range of active styles.


NextShares may replicate the strategies of their managers’ mutual funds or employ strategies offered exclusively as NextShares. Different from most ETFs, NextShares are actively managed and seek to exceed the returns of their performance benchmark and peer funds.

NextShares are designed for long-term investors who seek active portfolio management with structural cost and tax efficiencies.

    Bottom line: Investors will have access to a broad range of investment strategies.

NextShares, mutual funds and ETFs are purchased and sold differently and have varying costs. These and other distinctions may result in significant differences in investor returns.







    NextShares can invest in all the same strategies and asset classes as mutual funds. NextShares funds may include equity, income, alternative and multi-asset funds managed in a wide range of active styles.


NextShares may replicate the strategies of their managers’ mutual funds or employ strategies offered exclusively as NextShares. Different from most ETFs, NextShares are actively managed and seek to exceed the returns of their performance benchmark and peer funds.

NextShares are designed for long-term investors who seek active portfolio management with structural cost and tax efficiencies.

    Bottom line: Investors will have access to a broad range of investment strategies.

NextShares, mutual funds and ETFs are purchased and sold differently and have varying costs. These and other distinctions may result in significant differences in investor returns.






Trusted managers and proven strategies
Each of the below companies has entered into a preliminary licensing and services agreement to permit the offering of NextShares. Additional fund managers are also expected to offer NextShares. Learn more.


ALPS Advisors
American Beacon
Broms Asset Management
Causeway Capital Management
Columbia Threadneedle Investments
Eaton Vance
Gabelli Funds, LLC
Hartford Funds Management Company
Ivy Investment Management Company
Nationwide
Nile Capital Management
Pioneer Investments
Principal Management Corporation
UBS Asset Management
Victory Capital








                                Learn how











                                How do I buy and sell NextShares?
                            














    There is nothing complicated about investing in NextShares.

    NextShares list and trade on Nasdaq and are priced at the fund’s next end-of-day net asset value (NAV), plus or minus a trading cost determined when the trade executes.1 Trading costs are fully transparent and can be controlled using limit orders.


Transactions in NextShares may be subject to selling commissions and other trading costs. As a new type of fund, NextShares may be offered initially by a limited number of brokers.





    Bottom line: Buying and selling NextShares is straightforward.



Buyers and sellers of share amounts of NextShares will not know the value of their purchases and sales until after the fund’s NAV is determined at the end of the trading day.
Not all broker-dealers offering NextShares may accept dollar-based orders. In share-based orders, you specify the number of fund shares to buy or sell.











Know what you pay to buy and sell

        Investor trading costs are the costs you pay to buy and sell a fund. These include the commissions, sales charges and other fees in connection with the transaction, and the difference between the executed trade price and the corresponding fund value (the amount of premium/discount) when the trade is priced.
    

        Because all NextShares trading prices are directly linked to NAV, buyers and sellers of NextShares always know exactly what they pay in trading costs. By contrast, ETF investors typically cannot measure their trading costs because they don’t have access to a reliable measure of underlying fund value at the time of trade execution.
    










    There is nothing complicated about investing in NextShares.

    NextShares list and trade on Nasdaq and are priced at the fund’s next end-of-day net asset value (NAV), plus or minus a trading cost determined when the trade executes.1 Trading costs are fully transparent and can be controlled using limit orders.


Transactions in NextShares may be subject to selling commissions and other trading costs. As a new type of fund, NextShares may be offered initially by a limited number of brokers.





    Bottom line: Buying and selling NextShares is straightforward.



Buyers and sellers of share amounts of NextShares will not know the value of their purchases and sales until after the fund’s NAV is determined at the end of the trading day.
Not all broker-dealers offering NextShares may accept dollar-based orders. In share-based orders, you specify the number of fund shares to buy or sell.









Know what you pay to buy and sell

        Investor trading costs are the costs you pay to buy and sell a fund. These include the commissions, sales charges and other fees in connection with the transaction, and the difference between the executed trade price and the corresponding fund value (the amount of premium/discount) when the trade is priced.
    

        Because all NextShares trading prices are directly linked to NAV, buyers and sellers of NextShares always know exactly what they pay in trading costs. By contrast, ETF investors typically cannot measure their trading costs because they don’t have access to a reliable measure of underlying fund value at the time of trade execution.
    








                                Learn how














                                What kinds of investors
                                are NextShares designed for?
                            





























NextShares are designed for investors who seek:

■
        Professional, active portfolio management
■
        Long-term investments
■
        The potential for better performance through structurally lower costs
■
        The potential for lower capital gains taxes

NextShares are not suitable for frequent traders.

    Bottom line: NextShares have wide investor appeal.



        Comparing NextShares to mutual funds and ETFs
    


 
            PDF Download
        









                                Learn more







 
 














 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-877-341-9255. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this NextShares website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-877-341-9255.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with NextShares, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all NextShares email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.










Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from NextShares.
Here's the link:NextShares.com - Introducing NextShares
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://www.nextshares.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 









 



Stock NextShares (EVSTC) | Eaton Vance Funds
































































Use of cookies by Eaton Vance Management (International) LimitedWe use cookies to deliver our online services. Details and instructions on how to disable those cookies are set out here. By continuing to use this website you agree to our use of our cookies unless you have disabled them.accept cookies














Go to:


Eaton Vance U.S. Home

Eaton Vance U.S. HomeU.S Institutions HomeEaton Vance U.S. FundsU.S. Charitable HomeOffshore HomeGlobal Home













InvestorAccount Access 
Investment Professional Sign In











Stock NextShares  



EVSTC
Symbol



$24.85
$0.01


Net Asset ValueJul 21, 2017



$24.85
$0.04


Closing PriceJul 21, 2017


N/A
Intraday Indicative Value†Market Closed


Bid: N/A
Ask: N/A
Quoted Prices‡Market Closed





Relateddocuments



 Fact SheetMar 31, 2017









The Fund
The Fund leverages the skill, experience and knowledge of Eaton Vance's equity research organization. Charlie Gaffney oversees the investment process – assembling some of the equity analysts best research ideas in one fund.



The Approach
The investment approach is grounded in hands-on fundamental research, which involves finding companies with consistent earnings growth and leading business franchises. We believe these companies may offer more consistency of returns over the long haul. S ector diversification is achieved by allocating assets across sectors represented in the S&P 500 Index.



The Features
Provides investors with a foundation of research-driven investments picked by an experienced research staff. Style-neutral framework including both value and growth investments can help lessen exposure to the value/growth cycle over time. Stock selection  and active industry allocation decisions generally serve as the primary driver of the Fund's comparative performance.







 

 OverviewWhat are NextShares?
For important information about NextShares, click here.




Historical Returns (%)as of  Jun 30, 2017









Annualized




1 Month
3 Months
YTD
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Since Fund InceptionFeb 25, 2016


 
Fund at NAV
1.16
4.15
9.19
14.16
8.18
14.34
7.44
16.28


Fund at Market Price
1.18
4.19
9.19
14.16
—
—
—
16.28


S&P 500 Index1
0.62
3.09
9.34
17.90
9.60
14.62
7.18
20.94





Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Performance is for the stated time period only; due to market volat ility, the Fund's current performance may be lower or higher than indicated. The Fund's performance at market price will differ from its results at net asset value (NAV). The market price used to calculate the Market Value return is the midpoint between  the highest bid and the lowest offer on the exchange on which the shares of the Fund are listed for trading as of the time that the Fund's NAV is calculated. If you trade your shares at another time during the day, your return may differ. Returns are his torical and are calculated by determining the percentage change in NAV or market price (as applicable) with all distributions reinvested at NAV or closing market price (as applicable) on the payment date of the distribution, and are net of management fee s and other expenses. Performance less than one year is cumulative.The Fund pursues its investment objective by investing in a separate investment fund (the Portfolio). The returns at NAV for periods before the date the Fund commenced operations  are for a mutual fund that invests in the Portfolio (the Portfolio Investor). The performance during such period does not represent the performance of the Fund. The prior investment performance of the Portfolio Investor (rather than the Portfolio itself)  is shown because it reflects the expenses typically borne by a retail fund investing in the Portfolio. The Portfolio Investor returns are not adjusted to reflect differences between the total net operating expenses of the Fund and the Portfolio Investor  during the periods shown. If such an adjustment were made, the performance presented below would be higher, because the Fund's total net operating expenses are lower than those of the Portfolio Investor. Performance is for a share class of the Portfolio  Investor offered at net asset value.






Fund Factsas of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Inception
02/25/2016


Investment Objective
Long-term capital appreciation


Total Net Assets2
$13.4M


Total Net Assets of Portfolio2
$628.1M


Exchange
NASDAQ


Shares Outstanding
550000


Expense Ratio (Gross)3
1.49%


Expense Ratio (Net)3,4
0.65%


CUSIP
27830G608







Top 10 Holdings (%)5,6,7as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Apple Inc



JPMorgan Chase & Co



Alphabet Inc - CL C



Wells Fargo & Co



Chubb Ltd



Facebook Inc



Verizon Communications Inc



Zimmer Biomet Holdings Inc



First American Financial Corp



FedEx Corp



Total
24.87







Portfolio Management




 
Charles Gaffney


Managed Fund since inception






Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are  to the Portfolio's holdings.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volatility than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other con ditions. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. S&P 500 Index is an unmanaged index of large-cap stocks commonly used as a measure of U.S. stock market performance. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverag e, as applicable. It is not possible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund.
2. "Total Net Assets" are the net assets of the Fund. "Total Net Assets of Portfolio" are the net assets of the Portfolio, including the Fund's investment in it and any other investments.
3. Source: Fund prospectus.
4. Net expense ratios reflect a contractual expense reimbursement that continues through 4/30/18. Without the reimbursement, if applicable, performance would have been lower.
5. Top 10 Holdings excludes cash and equivalents.
6. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are to the Portfolio's holdings. Fund commenced operations on 2/26/16.
7. Percent of Portfolio total net assets.
 Performance

Historical Returns (%)as of  Jun 30, 2017


























Annualized




1 Month
3 Months
YTD
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Since Fund InceptionFeb 25, 2016


 
Fund at NAV
1.16
4.15
9.19
14.16
8.18
14.34
7.44
16.28


Fund at Market Price
1.18
4.19
9.19
14.16
—
—
—
16.28


S&P 500 Index1
0.62
3.09
9.34
17.90
9.60
14.62
7.18
20.94





Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Performance is for the stated time period only; due to market volat ility, the Fund's current performance may be lower or higher than indicated. The Fund's performance at market price will differ from its results at net asset value (NAV). The market price used to calculate the Market Value return is the midpoint between  the highest bid and the lowest offer on the exchange on which the shares of the Fund are listed for trading as of the time that the Fund's NAV is calculated. If you trade your shares at another time during the day, your return may differ. Returns are his torical and are calculated by determining the percentage change in NAV or market price (as applicable) with all distributions reinvested at NAV or closing market price (as applicable) on the payment date of the distribution, and are net of management fee s and other expenses. Performance less than one year is cumulative.The Fund pursues its investment objective by investing in a separate investment fund (the Portfolio). The returns at NAV for periods before the date the Fund commenced operations  are for a mutual fund that invests in the Portfolio (the Portfolio Investor). The performance during such period does not represent the performance of the Fund. The prior investment performance of the Portfolio Investor (rather than the Portfolio itself)  is shown because it reflects the expenses typically borne by a retail fund investing in the Portfolio. The Portfolio Investor returns are not adjusted to reflect differences between the total net operating expenses of the Fund and the Portfolio Investor  during the periods shown. If such an adjustment were made, the performance presented below would be higher, because the Fund's total net operating expenses are lower than those of the Portfolio Investor. Performance is for a share class of the Portfolio  Investor offered at net asset value.






Calendar Year Returns (%)







2007
2008
2009
2010
2011
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016


 
Fund at NAV
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—


Fund at Market Price
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—
—


S&P 500 Index1
5.49
-37.00
26.46
15.06
2.11
16.00
32.39
13.69
1.38
11.96





See above note regarding performance calculations. There is no Fund at Market Price performance because the Fund has not completed a calendar year of operations.






Fund Facts




 
Expense Ratio (Gross)3
1.49%


Expense Ratio (Net)3,4
0.65%


Inception
02/25/2016


Distribution Frequency
Annually







Risk Measures (3 Year)8as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Alpha (%)
-0.73


Beta
0.94


R-Squared (%)
95.18


Standard Deviation (%)
9.92


Sharpe Ratio
0.80







NAV History






Date
NAV
NAV Change


 
Jul 20, 2017
$24.84
-$0.01


Jul 19, 2017
$24.85
$0.17


Jul 18, 2017
$24.68
$0.00


Jul 17, 2017
$24.68
$0.00


Jul 14, 2017
$24.68
$0.11


Jul 13, 2017
$24.57
$0.07


Jul 12, 2017
$24.50
$0.16


Jul 11, 2017
$24.34
-$0.03


Jul 10, 2017
$24.37
$0.03


Jul 07, 2017
$24.34
$0.17







Distribution History9






Ex-Date
Distribution


 
Dec 13, 2016
$0.12820





No records in this table indicates that there has not been a distribution greater than .0001 within the past 3 years. Fund prospectus





Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are  to the Portfolio's holdings.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volatility than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other con ditions. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. S&P 500 Index is an unmanaged index of large-cap stocks commonly used as a measure of U.S. stock market performance. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverag e, as applicable. It is not possible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund.
3. Source: Fund prospectus.
4. Net expense ratios reflect a contractual expense reimbursement that continues through 4/30/18. Without the reimbursement, if applicable, performance would have been lower.
8. Alpha measures risk-adjusted performance, showing excess return delivered at the same risk level as the benchmark. Beta measures the volatility of a fund relative to the overall market. R-Squared represents the percentage of the portfolio's movement that  can be explained by the general movement of the market. Standard deviation measures the historic volatility of a fund. Sharpe Ratio uses standard deviation and excess return to determine reward per unit of risk.
9. A portion of the Fund's returns may be comprised of return of capital or short term capital gains. The Fund will determine the tax characteristics of all Fund distributions after the end of the calendar year and will provide shareholders such information  at that time. Please consult your tax advisor for further information.
 Trading & Portfolio

Trade Data10as of Jul 20, 2017









vs. Prior Business Day
Change (%)


 
Closing Price
$24.81
-$0.04
-0.16%


Closing NAV
$24.84
-$0.01
-0.04%


Closing Bid/Ask





Midpoint (of bid/ask)
NAV+$0.00




Spread (between bid/ask)
$0.06




Intraday Price (vs. NAV)





High
NAV-$0.03




Low
NAV-$0.03




Average (Volume-Wtd)
NAV-$0.03




Closing
NAV-$0.03




Trading Volume (Shares)
24,900









Trading History11Inception through Jul 20, 2017



























Premium/Discount
Closing


Date
High
Low
Average (Volume-Wtd)
Closing Price
Closing Bid/Ask Midpoint
Bid/Ask Spread


 
Jul 20, 2017
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
$0.00
$0.06


Jul 19, 2017




$0.00
$0.06


Jul 18, 2017




$0.00
$0.06


Jul 17, 2017
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
-$0.03
$0.00
$0.06


Jul 14, 2017




$0.00
$0.06







Historical Premiums/Discounts and Trading Spreads12Inception through Jul 20, 2017









Premium/Discount
Closing


Range
Closing Price
Vol Wtd Ave Price
Closing Bid/Ask Midpoint
Bid/Ask Spread


 
 >1.00%






 +0.76% to +1.00%






 +0.51% to +0.75%






 +0.26% to +0.50%



3%


 -0.25% to +0.25%
98%
98%
100%
97%


-0.26% to -0.50%
2%
2%




-0.51% to -0.75%






-0.76% to -1.00%


















Asset Mix (%)6,7as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
U.S. Common Stocks
95.60


Foreign Common Stocks
4.39


Cash
0.02


Total
100.00







Portfolio Statistics6as of  Jun 30, 2017





 
Average Market Cap
$137.4B


Price/Earnings Ratio
18.09


Number of Holdings
81


Price/Book Ratio
2.84







GICS Sector Breakdown (%)6,7as of  Jun 30, 2017
























Sector
Fund
S&P 500 Index1


 
Consumer Discretionary
12.41
12.27


Consumer Staples
9.27
9.05


Energy
5.90
6.01


Financials
14.49
14.55


Health Care
14.41
14.51


Industrials
10.14
10.28


Information Technology
22.18
22.26


Materials
2.96
2.85


Real Estate
2.84
2.93


Telecom Services
2.21
2.14


Utilities
3.19
3.16


Cash
0.02
—







Portfolio Holdings6,7,13as of  May 31, 2017







Holding
% of Net Assets


 
Apple Inc
4.89%


Alphabet Inc - CL C
3.10%


Johnson & Johnson
2.72%


JPMorgan Chase & Co
2.69%


Facebook Inc
2.36%


Wells Fargo & Co
2.35%


Chubb Ltd
2.30%


Verizon Communications Inc
2.22%


Amazon.com Inc
1.99%


First American Financial Corp
1.99%





View All








Basket Details14Jul 24, 2017







Holding
Shares


 



View All








Transaction Fees15,16,17Jul 24, 2017







No. of Creation Units
Fee per Creation Unit (bps)


 



View All







Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are  to the Portfolio's holdings.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volatility than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other con ditions. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



1. S&P 500 Index is an unmanaged index of large-cap stocks commonly used as a measure of U.S. stock market performance. Unless otherwise stated, index returns do not reflect the effect of any applicable sales charges, commissions, expenses, taxes or leverag e, as applicable. It is not possible to invest directly in an index. Historical performance of the index illustrates market trends and does not represent the past or future performance of the fund.
6. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are to the Portfolio's holdings. Fund commenced operations on 2/26/16.
7. Percent of Portfolio total net assets.
10. All trade data is for the referenced trading day. All premiums/discounts and bids/asks are relative to NAV. Premium/discount data is from actual trades, while bid/ask midpoint and spread data use the bid and ask at market close. Closing bid and closing a sk can be used for establishing limits on trading costs in limit orders.
11. All values relative to NAV.
12. Each line in the chart shows the percentage of total trading days during the designated period in which the specified Fund trading parameter was within the indicated range.  Premiums/discounts shown are versus NAV.  Closing bid/ask spread is versus the c losing bid/ask midpoint. Past performance may not predict future results.
13. The following list reflects unaudited securities holdings (excluding derivatives positions).  Holdings information may differ if presented as of trade date.  Due to rounding, holdings of less than 0.005% may show as 0.00%. Portfolio information subject t o change due to active management.
14. The Basket includes securities, cash and/or other instruments designated by the Fund to be paid or received by Authorized Participants that transact directly with the Fund in Creation Unit transactions. The Basket is not intended to be representative of  the Fund's current holdings and may vary significantly from current portfolio positions.
15. For transactions directly with the Fund, the Fund imposes transaction fees on Creation Units issued and redeemed to offset the estimated cost to the Fund of processing the transaction and converting the Basket to or from the desired portfolio composition .
16. Basis points (bps) are a unit of percentage measure. 1 basis point is equal to 0.01%.
17. A fixed fee of $150 will also be charged for each creation or redemption event. If the fund substitutes cash for basket instruments, it will impose higher transaction fees on the substituted cash amount.
 Insights & Analysis  Commentary
No commentary information is currently available.


Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are  to the Portfolio's holdings.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volatility than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other con ditions. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.

  Attribution
No attribution information is currently available.


Portfolio profile subject to change due to active management. Percentages may not total 100% due to rounding. Fund invests in an affiliated investment company (Portfolio) with the same objective(s) and policies as the Fund. References to investments are  to the Portfolio's holdings.


†Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)The IIV is an estimate of the real-time value of the Fund's underlying holdings based on current market prices and should not be viewed as a projection of NAV, which is determined at the end of the day . Because IIVs will generally differ from the end-of-day NAV of the Fund, they cannot be used to calculate with precision the dollar value of a prescribed number of shares to be bought or sold. Investors should understand that share transaction prices ar e based on closing NAVs, and that NAVs may vary significantly from IIVs during periods of intraday market volatility. Neither the Fund, the Trust nor any of their affiliates are involved in, or responsible for, the calculation or dissemination of IIVs no r make any warranty as to their accuracy. An inaccuracy in an IIV could result from various factors, including difficulty pricing portfolio instruments on an intraday basis. The IIV is disseminated every 15 minutes during normal trading hours and is as o f the time noted above. An IIV is not available when the market is closed.


‡Bid and AskThe bid and ask prices shown are as of the time noted and may not reflect current quotations. The Fund's NAV normally is determined as of 4:00 p.m. each business day.


About Risk: 
Fund performance is sensitive to stock market volatility. Investments in foreign instruments or currencies can involve greater risk and volatility than U.S. investments because of adverse market, economic, political, regulatory, geopolitical or other con ditions. No fund is a complete investment program and you may lose money investing in a fund. The Fund may engage in other investment practices that may involve additional risks and you should review the Fund prospectus for a complete description.



 Management
Biography


Charles Gaffney
Vice President, Eaton Vance Management
Joined Eaton Vance 2003


Charles Gaffney is a vice president of Eaton Vance Management and portfolio manager on Eaton Vance’s global core team. He is responsible for buy and sell decisions, portfolio construction and risk management for a number of the firm’s global  core equity strategies. He is a member of the firm’s Equity Strategy Committee. He joined Eaton Vance in 2003.
Charlie began his career in the investment management industry in 1996. Before joining Eaton Vance, he was affiliated with Brown Brothers Harriman as a sector portfolio manager and Morgan Stanley Dean Witter as a senior equity analyst.
Charlie earned a B.A. from Bowdoin College in 1995 and an MBA from Fordham University in 2002.


Education

B.A. Bowdoin College
M.B.A. Graduate School of Business, Fordham University


Experience

Managed Fund since inception





 




 
Literature
Literature

Fact Sheet
Download
 - Last updated: Mar 31, 2017



NextShares Brochure
Download
 - Last updated: Oct 21, 2016



Annual Report
Download
 - Last updated: Dec 31, 2016



Full Prospectus
Download
 - Last updated: May 1, 2017



Holdings-1st or 3rd fiscal quarters-www.sec.gov
Download




SAI
Download
 - Last updated: May 1, 2017



Semi-Annual Report
Download
 - Last updated: Jun 30, 2016



Summary Prospectus
Download
 - Last updated: May 1, 2017



XBRL
Download
 - Last updated: May 10, 2017

















 NextShares Calculator*

EVSTCStock NextShares
I Plan To:
BuySell


Approx Trade Size:
$ DollarsEnter a dollar amount to the nearest cent.Shares NextShares do not trade in fractional shares.Enter a whole number without decimals.

Premium/Discount $ Enter premium or discount to the nearest whole cent.


Estimated Share Amt
0


Estimated Value
$0.00

Estimated Current Price Per Share


Intraday Indicative Value (IIV)Jul 21, 2017


AskLast Bid
NAV


The calculator is currently unavailable.
* This calculator provides an estimate and does not provide the actual price at which a transaction will be executed. Shares of NextShares funds are traded in the secondary market through a broker, and may not be individually purchased or redeemed from the fund. All transactions in NextShares are executed at the Fund's net asset value per share (NAV) calculated at the end of the day plus or minus a premium or discount. The Estimated Current Price per Share used in the calculation reflects (i) the Fund’s intraday indicative value (IIV) and (ii) offer or bid price is subject to a 15 minute delay and is as of the time noted. See information about IIVs below(†).  The calculator is available during normal market hours only.


 

Access Advisor Resources
Get exclusive access to timely materials:

Eaton Vance Thought Leadership
Insights and Conference Calls
Notifications of Document Updates

Sign In
    or Register 




 
Related Content
Full ProspectusMay 1, 2017SAIMay 1, 2017Summary ProspectusMay 1, 2017NextShares BrochureOct 21, 2016

Newsworthy

Eaton Vance to Ring Nasdaq Opening Bell to Mark Launch of First NextShares FundFeb 29, 2016 

 







Twitter @EatonVance
Eaton Vance on LinkedIn
Eaton Vanceon Facebook
Subscriptions
EmailPrint
Site Survey






Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.



Remember Me



I Do Not Accept
Ok




Disclosure - Restricted content

The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. 
                If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not 
                be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management 
                (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not 
                intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in 
                any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important 
                that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making 
                any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party 
                information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. 
                Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of 
                overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. 
                A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in 
                securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, 
                administrative and service contracts, and other risks.All information in this section are for "Professional Client ONLY". To access this website users must qualify as a "Professional 
                client". Any person who does not fall into the categories listed above should not rely on the information contained in this website.
By clicking the Okay button below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the 
                Fund or Strategies (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that 
                jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes) and that you are a Professional Client.


I Do Not Accept
Ok





 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-800-836-2414. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this Eaton Vance website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-800-836-2414.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. Your subscriptions can be managed on your profile page. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all Eaton Vance email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-800-836-2414.





Simply enter your e-mail address to register.


Company Email:


Cancel
Already have an account? Sign In.

If you are an individual investor and have an account with Eaton Vance, sign into your account here.


Register for more access and control.

Elevate your business practice with materials from the Advisor Institute.
Learn more with exclusive videos, conference calls, and the latest insights.
Follow products, get product notifications, and manage your Eaton Vance communications.












Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from Eaton Vance.
Here's the link:Stock NextShares (EVSTC)
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://funds.eatonvance.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-800-836-2414.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 






Site Disclaimer


You are about to enter the   website for .


This is your selected location and role:





This is your selected location:



Please select your role:







I Do Not Accept
I Accept






Disclaimer


The information contained in this section of the website is designed solely for professional clients. If you are not a professional client you should not proceed any further. The content should not be looked at or distributed to retail clients.
By clicking the box below, you confirm that you are from an eligible jurisdiction to review material relating to the Fund (or are authorised to conduct investment business in the jurisdiction within which you are resident and under the law of that jurisdiction, you are authorised to view material relating to collective investment schemes).

GENERAL DISCLAIMER
Certain products and services mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some states or countries and they may not be suitable for all types of investors. This website does not constitute an offer or solicitation and is not directed at you if Eaton Vance Management (International) ltd (EVMI) is prohibited by any law of any jurisdiction from making the information on this website available to you and is not intended for any use that would be contrary to local law or regulation. No products and services mentioned on this website must be promoted in any jurisdiction where this would not be permitted.
This website does not constitute investment, legal or tax advice with respect to our products and services and it is important that you do not rely on its content when making an investment decision. You should obtain relevant and specific professional advice before making any decision to enter into an investment transaction. EVMI does not represent that the information on this website, including any third party information, is accurate or complete and it should not be relied upon as such. Past performance is not a guide to future returns.
The value of investment funds and the income therefrom may go down as well as up and you may not get back the original amount invested. Your capital could be at risk. You are not certain to make money from your investments and you may lose money. Exchange rates may cause the value of overseas investments and the income therefrom to rise and fall.
Information in this section may contain statements that are not historical facts, referred to as forward-looking statements. A Fund’s future results may differ significantly from those stated in forward-looking statements, depending on factors such as changes in securities or financial markets or general economic conditions, the volume of sales and purchases of Fund shares, the continuation of advisory, administrative and service contracts, and other risks.
QIAIF DISCLAIMER
The Fund is an umbrella fund of the Eaton Vance Institutional Funds plc (the "Company"), a public limited company with variable capital with segregated liability between sub-funds incorporated in Ireland pursuant to the Companies Acts. The Company is authorised and regulated by the Central Bank of Ireland as a Qualified Investors Alternative Investment Fund (QIAIF) and solely intended for Qualified Investors (as defined in the Fund prospectus).
The Fund is currently authorised in Ireland only and as a QIAIF the Company may apply for recognition by other EU Member States. The QIAIF mentioned on this website may not be eligible for sale in some countries.
This website is not intended to distribute or offer or solicit the sale of shares or units in the Fund and any jurisdiction in which such distribution, or offer or solicitation would be considered contrary to local law or regulation.
            


I Do Not Accept
I Accept






































NextShares.com - Resources






































Resources



        Literature and More
      


White papers


            “Avoidable Structural Costs of Actively Managed Mutual Funds”
          

Download


 


            “Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Products at Age Seven”
          

Download




Brochure


            NextShares: Unleash the active.
          

Download


Commentary


Choosing the simplicity of NextShares


Download







        Video Library
      



The next evolution of fund investing™



 
NextShares are the first funds to combine the benefits of exchange trading with the potential for market-beating returns using proprietary active management.


What are NextShares?





NextShares exchange-traded managed funds are a new way to invest in actively managed strategies.





Designed for active management





NextShares may offer cost and tax efficiencies that can enhance shareholder returns.


Are NextShares right for you?




NextShares have wide appeal for long-term investors.





How do I buy and sell NextShares?




 
NextShares are bought and sold on an exchange through a brokerage account, much like exchange-listed stocks and ETFs.






Everything you always wanted to know about NextShares*
*BUT WERE AFRAID TO ASK


NextShares are new. And somewhat different. But new and different doesn't have to mean complicated or confusing. These questions and answers are intended to help potential users of NextShares get up to speed on this exciting investment product.

NextShares at a glance
NextShares terms and phrases
Comparing NextShares to ETFs
Comparing NextShares to mutual funds
Comparing NextShares to closed-end funds
Buying and selling NextShares
Creations and redemptions
Investor information
Owning NextShares
Master-feeder structure
Special considerations and risks
Regulation
Tax treatment
Competition
Intellectual property
Transparency
Misperceptions and myths





        Regulatory and Technical Documents
      


NextShares Regulatory Documents

            NextShares-related SEC filings and approvals.
          


Portfolio-Protected Active ETF Regulatory Documents

            SEC filings and related documents.
          


Issued U.S. Patents

            Issued patents underpinning NextShares.
          


NASDAQ Updates and Specifications

            Summaries of changes to trading protocols, feeds and services, with links to detailed specifications.
          






 
 














 


We apologize for the inconvenience but we are experiencing a technical issue.We are working on a solution. Please try again later.If you require further assistance, please call:1-877-341-9255. 

You have already upgraded your account. Please login using the link at the top of the page. 



Your download will begin when this window is closed.
Manage your subscriptions



You have successfully un-subscribed from .


As a subscriber, you are one step away from getting more access and control. Register now by simply creating a password below.


Create Password:

Confirm Password:

Passwords must be 8 to 20 alphanumeric characters, including a special character:! @ # $ % ^ & * ( ) - _ = + , < . > ?.

Cancel
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.



Congratulations! You are registered.
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your account and complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Congratulations!
We are pleased to grant you access to this NextShares website.Please click here to be logged in with your username .


A verification email has been sent.
You have requested a change to your password. In order to process this request, a verification email has been sent to . When you receive this email, please click the link contained within the email to start the password reset process.
Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This account is restricted.

Your account has limited access.

If you need further assistance, please call 1-877-341-9255.



This account has been updated.

Your account has been updated to use your new email address .
We have sent a verification email to  with a verification link to confirm the change.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.



This email account has not been verified.

Your account has not yet been activated. We have sent a verification email to . If you'd like us to resend this, please click the Resend Email button below.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.

Cancel



Thank you.
An e-mail verification has been re-sent to . Please check your e-mail and follow the instructions to complete the registration process.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


An email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Re-verification Required
For security purposes we could not complete your request. Please click here to receive a new link to access the requested content.
A new email has been sent to the email address  containing a link to re-verify your credentials. Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to complete your request.
Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.


Verification Accepted
You have been granted access to the requested content.

Remember Me
Click here to remain recognized on this device for future visits to EatonVance.com


Do Not Remember Me
Click here if you are using a Public Computer or Shared Device.

Trouble receiving the verification email? Call 1-877-341-9255.





Company Email:

Password:



Remember Me                          |                          Forgot your password?  Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 
If you are an individual investor and have an account with NextShares, sign into your account here.


Please check the Fund Literature that you would like to subscribe to. 
Subscribe All




Subscribe

Cancel



Thank you for downloading 
If your download did not start automatically, please click here.

Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.


Close


Stay on top of your game.
Receive email notifications when the  is updated by clicking the subscribe button.



Company Email:


Close
Subscribe to new content: Register                    Already have an account? Sign In.



Thank you for subscribing
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your subscription.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Un-subscription request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-In Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Opt-Out Request
We have sent a verification email to . Please check your e-mail and click on the secured link to verify your request.
Subscribe to new content: Register Want to manage your subscriptions? Sign In.


Stay on top of your game.
You have selected to receive email notifications for:


Enter your Email


Cancel
Subscribe to new content: Register 


Stay on top of your game.
You are currently "Opted Out" of all NextShares email communications. If you would like to be alerted of updates to your new subscription, please Opt In:

Close



Enter your e-mail address to reset your password.


Company Email:



Already have an account? Sign In.
Subscribe to new content: Register
Trouble registering? Call 1-877-341-9255.










Your Name *



My Contact Email Address *



Recipient's Name



Recipient's Email *



Prepared on *



 Link to webpage  
                                
                                Link to PDF                            

Message

I thought you'd be interested in this information from NextShares.
Here's the link:NextShares.com - Resources
Copy Link
For more information, visit http://www.nextshares.com/

Cancel Send Email

 





            Please wait while the data is being prepared for download.This message will automatically close when your file is ready.



Please enter a new email.


New Email:



Trouble signing in? Call 1-877-341-9255.







Investment Professionals
Get more access and control.
Register Now Already have an account? Access.






Investment Professionals

Access
Subscribe to new content: Register. 



Get PDF Now
Subscribe 
You are already subscribed to 
Manage your subscriptions

Unsubscribe 








 
 Symbol:  


                    NAV as of  

 
 




 
 








 